Racing Horses  
       Long ago, China was divided into states. The states were often at war, so good military leaders were important. One such leader was Tian Ji, a general in the State of Qi.
      Tian Ji's best friend was Sun Bin. Sun Bin had been a military official in the State of Wei. After he was unfairly fired from his job, he moved to the State of Qi. Sun Bin taught Tian Ji a lot about military strategy. 
      At that time, horse racing was the most popular entertainment for the rich. People bet money on the races. Tian Ji was a fan of horse racing, but he wasn't very good at betting.
      One day, Tian Ji again lost money at the races. He went home feeling sorry for himself. When Sun Bin saw how sad Tian Ji was, he said, “Take me with you next time. Maybe I can help you win!"
      A week later, Tian Ji did just that. Sun Bin very quickly learned how the races worked.  He saw that the horses were divided into three types according to their speed. First-class horses were the fastest, and third-class horses were the slowest. Each type had its own race, and people bet on each race. In order to win the overall bet, a person only needed to win two of the three races. Sun Bin also noticed that each type had a different saddle color. This was to tell the different horses apart. Soon, Sun Bin developed a strategy to help Tian Ji.
“Trust me," he told Tian Ji. “I know exactly how you can win!"
Tian Ji got so excited that he challenged the king to a race. 
Tian Ji did everything that Sun Bin told him to do. For the first race, he put the first-class saddle on his third-class horse. The king's first-class horse easily beat Tian Ji's third-class horse.
For the second race, Sun Bin told Tian Ji to put the second-class saddle on his first-class horse. And sure enough, Tian Ji won the second race. His first-class horse was better than the king's second- class horse.
Finally, for the third race, Tian Ji used his second-class horse. Once again, he won. This time it was against the king's third-class horse. The king was shocked. Tian Ji was the overall winner.
The king congratulated Tian Ji, but he was curious.
“Tian Ji, where did you get such good horses?" he asked.
“Your Majesty," Tian Ji replied," I did not win because I found great horses. I won because of the strategy I used. It was Sun Bin's strategy, and it worked!"
“Really?" said the king. “What exactly was this strategy?"
Tian Ji told the king all about how he switched horses. He explained how Sun Bin knew that even. when two opponents were unevenly matched, a strategy could be used to minimize losses. In this case, losing only once meant that Tian Ji was still the overall winner.
Hearing this, the king immediately made Sun Bin the military adviser for the whole army. Sun Bin's strategies and Tian Ji's leadership led the State of Qi to many military victories.
The idiom “General Tian Ji's horse race" means to use your strength against another's weakness in order to win.
                       Question
How did people know one type of horse from another?
1. Each type had different markings.
2. Each horse wore a different color saddle; no two were alike.
3. Numbers one, two, or three were written on each saddle.
4. Each type had a different color saddle.
             Better Late Than Never
A farmer named Ah Chao and his wife, Yu Qing, lived and worked on their family farm in a remote village. Farming was hard work.  Ah Chao was not fond of work at all!
Every day, Yu Qing had to remind her husband to get to work. 
 “Ah Chao, the chickens need to be fed!"
“Ah Chao, the field needs to be tilled!"
One day, Ah Chao received news that he had inherited 20 sheep from his uncle.
“What good fortune!" Yu Qing shouted. "We can earn more money with 2O sheep. But we don't have a fence to keep the sheep safe from foxes. You'd better build one, Ah Chao!"
Ah Chao was lazy, but he wasn't dumb. He knew that Yu Qing was right. So he went looking for wood to build a fence. He found a pile of old wood nearby. Some pieces were shorter than others. Luckily there was enough wood to build a fenced-in pen. There was just one problem. In the section of the fence with the shorter pieces, there was a gap at the bottom.
Ah Chao looked at his handiwork and said, "The fence goes all around. It looks good to me. Time to call it quits."
He took a nap under a shady tree. And then he went home to enjoy dinner and rest some more.
“Ah Chao!” Yu Qing hollered. "The fence is not finished. There's a gap under that section!" She pointed out from the window.
"It's good enough," Ah Chao replied. "The fence is closed off. It's just a small gap. I'm done for the day."
“The sheep arrive tomorrow!" Yu Qing cried, exasperated. "You'd better fix the fence!"
The next day, 2O sheep arrived at the farm. Ah Chao herded all the sheep into the new pen. Then he enjoyed a long nap under the shady tree.
Every afternoon after that, Ah Chao would herd his grazing sheep. Then he would guide them back inside the fence. Afterward, he always took a nap under the shady tree.
One day, a neighbor, Lao Chen, woke up Ah Chao from his nap. “Hey, Ah Chao. I think you're missing a sheep. I count only 19," Lao Chen said.
"What?" asked Ah Chao sleepily. "'There are 20. Leave me alone. I need my 40 winks more than my 20 sheep." 
 Ah Chao fell back asleep.
Lao Chen shook his neighbor again.
“Ah Chao, count your sheep," he insisted. "I think there are only 19. The fox may have slipped through that gap and stolen one of your sheep! You should fix the fence."  
Ah Chao paid Lao Chen no mind. “Oh, it's just one sheep," Ah Chao yawned. “Not much I can do about it now. It is gone."
A few days later, Yu Qing rushed into the house with a huff.
"Ah Chao!” she shouted. “Why do we only have 18 sheep? I thought you only lost one. Now I count 18 inside the fence! You should have fixed that fence when Lao Chen told you about the fox."
"Lao Chen only guessed it was a fox," said Ah Chao. "Anyway, there's not much I can do about it now. The sheep are gone."
Yu Qing stormed out of the room, frustrated.
The following week, Lao Chen woke Ah Chao from his nap again.  “Neighbor, you're missing another sheep. You are down to l7 now. At this rate, you will have none left in a few weeks."
“You are making bad fortune by  being lazy," his neighbor added. “Stop worrying about your 40 winks! Start worrying about your 20 sheep and fix that fence!"
Yu Qing was standing behind Lao Chen. She repeated his words.
“Ah Chao, you are bringing us bad fortune! Stop being lazy and fix the fence now!"
Ah Chao shrugged. He was lazy, but he wasn't dumb. He could see that his laziness had indeed brought them bad fortune.
So he gathered new wood and repaired the fence.
Better late than never! He realized it was better to lose a little sleep than lose any more sheep.
The idiom “Mend the fence after the sheep have been stolen" means to correct your mistakes to prevent more losses.
                           Question 
What do you think Ah Chao would do if he inherited 20 more sheep?
             The Forest of Plum Trees
A long, long time ago, there was a Chinese warlord named Cao Cao. He was a good fighter and an even better leader. His army knew he was wise and knowledgeable, so they trusted him.
One summer day, Cao Cao was leading his army to battle with his rival, Zhang Xiu. It was a truly hot day, The sun burned brightly.
The soldiers struggled in the heat. It didn't help that they were walking up and down hills. Even worse, they had no water. They were already carrying heavy military supplies, so there was no room for water.
Cao Cao looked out across the crowd of soldiers. He saw tired faces staring back. Their eyes were blank, their faces shiny with sweat. They were slowing down. They looked like they were about to fall over!
Cao Cao knew if the soldiers walked slowly, it might make them lose the battle. He quickly called over his head navigator.
"Is there any water nearby?" Cao Cao asked quietly. He didn't want the soldiers to hear him and worry. "No sir," the navigator replied. “The nearest water is a lake on the other side of that mountain. It is many miles out of our way. If we go to the lake, it will take at least an hour longer to reach the battle." 
 An hour? An hour was much too long! By that time his rival Zhang Xiu would have already set up his army. Cao Cao couldn't let his enemy gain the upper hand. He knew his own army could win the battle if they were prepared.  
Cao Cao thought for a moment. What else could he do? Giving up was not an option. But getting drinking water wasn't an option either. So what's almost as good as drinking water?
And that's when he had an idea. Of course! He needed to give his soldiers motivation to continue! And he knew just how to do that.
“Soldiers," he yelled, "I know it has been a hard day. But there will be an end to your thirst soon! There is a forest of plum trees ahead. The trees are full of ripe, juicy, fat, delicious plums. And they are just waiting to be eaten! The forest is just beyond that hill. Think of the plums and how happy you'll be when we get there!"
Hearing this, the soldiers' mouths began to water. They all imagined the plums. Wanting to get to the plums quickly, the army quickened its pace.
Of course, there was no forest of plum trees. But because Cao Cao had given them something to strive for, the soldiers were able to carry on.
Today, Chinese people use the idiom “Ending thirst by wishing for plums” to mean making yourself feel better by imagining something you want.
                      Question  
Why couldn't Cao Cao bring his army to the lake?
1. Because the lake was on the other side of a desert.
2. Because the lake was on the other side of a mountain.  
3. Because the soldiers were too tired to walk to the lake.
4. Because the enemy was waiting for them at the lake.
            Mengzi's Good Advice  
Liang Hui Wang was the ruler of the Liang State during the Warring States Period in ancient China, from 371-335 BCE. Liang Hui Wang sent his army into many wars with nearby states. It felt like there were endless battles. Many people died. The people of Liang became fearful. Many ran away because they did not want to go to war.
The great thinker Mengzi visited Liang Hui Wang. They sat together by a pond to watch the swimming geese and grazing deer. The ruler was worried about his people running away, so he asked Mengzi for advice.
“Mengzi, I think I am a good ruler. I care for my people. I look after them when there is a bad harvest. If the crops fail to grow in the south, I move the people to the north. If there is a bad harvest in the north, I move the people south," Liang Hui Wang said.
He continued, “The rulers of other states are not like me. They don't care about their people like I care about mine. They don't help them when they are hungry. Yet their people don't run away. The number of people in their states is growing. The number of people in Liang has not grown at all. Why is this?"
“My lord," Mengzi began, “You like battles, yes? Let me use the battlefield to show you."
“Two states are at war. Foot soldiers with swords and spears race toward each other," Mengzi began. "There is fighting. There is bloodshed. One side is winning. The other side falls back. Soldiers on the losing side begin to run away. They don't want to get captured. Some soldiers run fast. Others run slower."
“Yes,” said Liang Hui Wang as he listened intently.
“A fast soldier runs 100 steps. A slower soldier runs 50 steps," Mengzi continued. "The soldier running 50 steps looks ahead. He sees the soldier running 100 steps He laughs at the faster soldier and calls him a coward."
"Do you think the slower soldier is right to judge the other?" asked Mengzi.
"No, not at all," Liang Hui Wang replied. "The soldier that runs 5o steps is running away too."
“So you see?" Mengzi asked.  
"I do," Liang Hui Wang replied. “The soldier running 50 steps is just slower. He has not reached 100 steps yet. He is not doing anything differently. They are both running away."
"Exactly," said Mengzi. "The soldier that runs 50 steps has no right to judge the soldier that runs 100 steps. He is no better .
"“You are right, my lord," said Mengzi. "And you are also right about the other rulers. They may not care for their people during hard times the way you do. But you send your people into battle all the time. When you do this, you are not caring for your people either," Mengzi explained.“50 steps should not laugh at 100 steps."
The idiom “50 steps laughing at 100 steps” ridicules people who are unaware of their own flaws and feel superior to others.
                    Question  
 Why do you think Mengzi used a battle story to explain things to the ruler?
 
                 Wen Tong's Bamboo
Way, way back during the Song Dynasty, there was a famous artist named Wen Tong. He was known for his paintings of bamboo. His paintings were so good that they almost looked real! Everyone wanted one to hang up in their house. No one else in all of China could draw bamboo like Wen Tong did.
But why was he so good at drawing bamboo? Well, he loved bamboo! He planted only bamboo in his garden. He even had a few bamboos inside his house.
But he didn't just grow bamboo. He also loved to study bamboo. He studied bamboo to see how it moved and how it grew in different weather. He went outside to his bamboo garden, come rain or shine!
One day in spring, a storm moved into the village. Everyone rushed home to get inside. But Wen Tong rushed outside to his bamboo garden. He had to study the bamboo! He wanted to see how the rain bounced off the bamboo. This way, he could see what water on bamboo leaves looked like. Sure, he got very wet, but to him, it was all worth it.
One day in summer, the sun was high in the sky, and the air was hot and humid. Most people were inside their home, trying to stay cool. But Wen Tong was outside in his bamboo garden. He had to study the bamboo! He wanted to see the bamboo clearly in the strong sunlight. This way, he could see every detail of every leaf. Sure, he got super sweaty, but to him, it was all worth it.
One day in fall, it got very windy. It was so windy that some people fell over when they stepped outside. But Wen Tong went outside to his bamboo garden. He had to study the bamboo! He wanted to see the bamboo leaves swaying in the wind. This way, he could see how the bamboo moved. Sure, he almost fell over a couple of times, but to him, it was all worth it.
 One day in winter, it started to snow. All the other villagers were inside their home, staying warm. But of course, there was Wen Tong outside in his bamboo garden. He had to study the bamboo! He wanted to see the snow on the bamboo. This way, he could see how the ice sat on the leaves. Sure, he was very, very cold, but to him, it was all worth it.
After many, many days just like these, he memorized all there was to know about bamboo. He knew what frozen bamboo looked like. He knew what burnt bamboo looked like. He knew what newly planted bamboo looked like. He knew what dying bamboo looked like. He knew what bamboo looked like in all seasons, in all weather, and at all ages.
So when it was time to paint, he remembered everything he had seen. He knew the bamboo so well that one of his friends said, “When Wen Tong draws bamboo, he has its image in his mind."
In modern Chinese, you can say that someone has an image of bamboo in his or her mind. This means that the person plans ahead, just like Wen Tong planned ahead by always going outside to study his bamboo. Although it was inconvenient at the time, studying the bamboo meant that he could later create amazing paintings.
                        Question  
Are you planning ahead for anything right now? What are you planning ahead for?
   
                     Answers
  Answer to the question on page 17 
 Q: How did people know one type of horse from another?
A: 4.Each type had a different color saddle.
Answer to the question on page 44 
 Q: Why couldn't Cao Cao bring his army to the lake?
A: 2.Because the lake was on the
other side of a mountain.
      
              Missing the Bigger Picture
       Once upon a time, in ancient China, there lived a poor scholar. He dreamed of becoming rich. He dreamed about it all day long, every day. Reading at his desk, he imagined himself relaxing in a grand palace. Having dinner with his wife, he would pretend there was a feast on the table, instead of one measly dish.
       WHACK! His wife slapped the side of his head.
“Wake up! Stop daydreaming!" she scolded him. "It's time to clean the dishes."
One day, the scholar was reading a book under the big willow tree outside. His wife was weeding the vegetable garden nearby.
Suddenly, he jumped up so high that he bumped his head on the branch above him.
“Wah!" he cried. "'I'm going to be rich!"
His wife looked up, startled. “It says here," he said excitedly, “there is a leaf once used by the mantis to help him catch the cicada. The leaf is a screen. It made the mantis invisible. The cicada never saw him coming!"
“And how will that make you rich?" his wife scoffed.
“I will find this leaf. It will make me invisible too!" cried the scholar.  
His wife rolled her eyes, shook her head, and went back to gardening.
From that moment on, the scholar was determined to find the leaf.  “Could it be this one?" he wondered, climbing high on a branch.
“Maybe this one?" he said, swinging through another tree. "Maybe that one?" he hoped, crawling to the highest branch.  
Early one morning, he climbed up the giant willow tree in front of the house. He carefully crawled out on a high branch.
Suddenly, he spotted a mantis and a cicada near the end of the branch.
“Whoa! This must be the tree!" he whispered excitedly.
As he got closer to the mantis, a drop of dew on a leaf caught the sunlight. The scholar examined the leaf.
“That must be the one!"
He stretched out his hand and grabbed hold of the glistening leaf. “Got it!" he cried. The scholar was so excited he almost fell off the branch.
“Wife! I found it! I shall be rich!" he cried, rushing down the tree and running toward his wife.
His wife ran out of the house to see what her husband was yelling about. "I found it, Wife! Here it is!" he said, excitedly showing her the leaf. "We're going to be rich!"
He held up the leaf in front of his eyes.“Can you see me?" he asked excitedly. "I'm invisible, right?"  
His wife shook her head in disbelief. This time, she did not whack him across the head, though. A waste of energy, she thought. 
 Instead, she said mockingly, “Where are you? I can't see you at all."
“Waahh!! It works! It works! I'm invisible!" the scholar cried. "I'm going to be rich!"
With that, he turned and ran to the market. His wife shook her head at her husband's foolishness and went back inside.
At the market, the scholar walked over to the vendor selling buns. They smelled delicious.
As he got closer, he held the leaf in front of his eyes.
“No one can see me now," he snickered. "Heh, heh."
With his other hand, he reached for a steamed bun. He put the bun in his mouth. It tasted so good! He smiled and began to walk away. “Stop! Thief!" cried the vendor. He came around the stand and chased the scholar.
“What? You can see me?" asked the confused scholar. “But I'm invisible."
“Right, you're invisible, and so is your money," scoffed the vendor.  “Pay up. You can't just steal my buns."
“But...but... you can't see me!" the scholar stammered.
“Stop your foolishness and pay up. If you don't, I will haul you in front   of the judge," yelled the vendor. 
The scholar couldn't pay.  so the vendor took him to the courthouse. 
 The judge listened to the story. Then he looked at the scholar, shook his head and said, “A 1eaf before your eyes makes you blind to Mount Tai!"
The idiom “One leaf obstructs sight" refers to people who have their view of important things blocked by small matters. They fail to see the whole or the big picture.
                  Question  
 Why do you think the scholar's wife didn't tell him the truth when he asked if she could see him?

            A Quick Glance Can Be Misleading  
                
Long ago in ancient China, a man named Ji Liang was desperate to find a wife. Liang had many good qualities, but one handicap. His left leg was shorter than his right and so he walked with a limp.
 Ji Liang eagerly met potential wife after potential wife, only to find disappointment every time. “Ah! Rejected again!" Ji Liang cried to his best friend, Zhou. “This will be my 85th bad meeting! My mother matched me up with her friend's aunt's cousin's best friend's daughter. Miss Chen and I had barely sat down at the tea house when she said she felt sick and left."
“Maybe she drank bad tea?" Zhou suggested.
“She barely sat down, never mind drank tea!" Liang snapped. "It must be my appearance. I'm not much to look at, especially with this limp.  ”
"I have an idea," said Zhou. “Let's find a real matchmaker. My mother's best friend's aunt's sister-in-law's niece's godmother knows one."
A few days later, Liang went to the matchmaker's house. He noticed a parrot flying about Mr. Hua's home.
“So, you want to find a wife. One that is a suitable match?" asked Mr. Hua.
“Oh, yes! A good match. A beautiful wife!" Liang replied anxiously.
“Well, let's see who we have," said Mr. Hua. Then he nodded to his parrot.
The parrot flew to a tall Chinese medicine cabinet lined with many  drawers. He chirped, “Good match. Good match. Good match."
He opened one drawer, but shook his head, then closed it. He few three levels higher, opened another drawer, and pulled out a card. 
The parrot handed the card to Mr. Hua, repeating," Good match. Good match. Good match."
Mr. Hua looked at the card and nodded, “Ah, a good match indeed."
“Oh, a match! A beautiful lady. Just my type!" exclaimed Liang. "When can I meet her?"
“Let me see what I can do," replied Mr. Hua.
Mr. Hua asked the lady to stand at her doorway with a rose. When Liang passed by her house, he would get a glimpse of her.
"“I'm going to meet the match of my life, Zhou!" Liang said to his friend. “'I can't mess up. I don't want the lady to turn away from me because of' my limp What should I do?" He thought for a moment, then answered himself. "I know!"  Liang shouted. "I shall meet her riding a horse. That will hide my limp. Nobles ride horses. I will look noble and majestic."
The next week, Mr. Hua and Ji Liang rode horses over lo the lady's village. They spotted a lady sniffing a rose as she stood in a doorway. Her pretty eyes were cast downward, shyly. As Liang rode by, she batted her eyelashes. He was lovestruck. She was the lady for him. He was not going to let this one get away! The bride's head was covered by a heavy red veil. At the end of the evening, the groom pulled the veil away from his bride's face. 
“Ah! You have a giant wart on your nose! You hid it with that rose!" a shocked Ji Liang shouted. He limped around the room anxiously.
The bride retorted, “Well, I didn't know you have a limp! You hid it by riding a horse!
Ji Liang and his bride were indeed a perfect match. He was a “running horse looking at flowers" who found out that if you don't look at something carefully, you will miss important details.
                    Question  
Do you think the matchmaker did a good job finding a match for Ji Liang? Why or why not?
       Measure Me for New Shoes
   
Long ago, in the state of Zheng, there lived a farmer who was always working. He walked all day long, every day. He trudged through the sticky mud fields. He hurried on the dirt roads. He walked into the chicken coop… out the barn door... and then to pick up eggs, fetch water, and more! If you close your eyes, you can almost picture him walking quickly around his farm, like a speedy robot.
One day, the farmer's shoes broke. It was sure to happen, all the walking they did! The strings that tied each shoe together had been frayed for months. Finally, they snapped off. There was no way to fix them.
The farmer scowled, knowing he would have to make a trip to the village market for a new pair. The shops would soon close for the New Year holiday, so he would have to hurry.
He searched for a rope to measure his shoes. He planned to give the rope to the shop owner instead of having his feet measured. It ought to save him time in the shoe shop. And the farmer was a busy man. The farmer cut the rope to the same length as his broken shoes.
Then, he set off to the market six kilometers away. His bare feet became very dirty and muddy as he walked on the path. Ants and other bugs crawled around on his toes. They tickled so much! He ran the rest of the way, but he couldn't run away from the bugs.
He arrived at the shoe shop and went inside, huffing and puffing.  “Shopkeeper, I need new shoes, ” he said.
“I see that," said the shopkeeper, as he looked at the farmer's blackened feet. “What size are you?"
“Oh, yes, size.  Here's my size," replied the farmer. He put his hand inside his left pocket to grab the measured rope.
He searched around deep into the left pocket. He found nothing. He reached into the right pocket. Nothing. He searched both sides again. Nothing. Then he felt the back of his pants to check if there were any pockets hiding there.  “Huh? Where's the rope? Where could it be?" he wondered.
“Oh no!" he gasped. "'I must have left the rope at home!"
The shopkeeper repeated, “What size are you, mister? Do you need your feet measured? I can do it easily,"
“No, no," the farmer replied. "I already measured them with a piece of rope."
Before the shopkeeper could say any more, the farmer ran out of the shop. He huffed and puffed as he ran back home.
He found the rope. Then he huffed and puffed back to the market.
It was dusk when the farmer finally arrived at the market. He raced to the shoe shop, out of breath, and eager to get his new shoes. Then he read the sign on the shoe shop door. "Shop Closed," it read. "Happy New Year!"
The idiom “Zheng man buys shoes" is used to tease those who stay true to their beliefs instead of using common sense. The farmer could not see the simplicity of using his own feet to measure his shoe size. He was stuck on the idea of using a pre-measured rope.
                            Question
What could the farmer have done to get his new shoes before the shop closed?
            Eight Immortals Cross the Sea
              
Happy birthday, Queen Mother of the West! It is the third day of the third month of the moon, plus 6,000 years. Finally, the peaches of immortality are ripe. Eat one and live to enjoy many more of the Queen Mother's birthdays every 6,000years!
Immortals and gods from all across the land gather at the Queen Mother's palace. They each arrive on speedy clouds. They are here to celebrate her. And celebrate they do! They feast on delicious food- even better than mother's cooking! They drink a lot of wine. And, of course, they eat peaches. And eat a few more.
As the party comes to an end late at night, the guests begin to leave the palace. There is one group in particular that is especially unruly. They are the eight immortals. They may have had a little too much of the wine. They burp a little too loudly. The Queen Mother shoos them out the door. She's glad to have some peace and quiet. Thank goodness this party only happens every 6,000 years!
Outside, the eight immortals begin their journey home. Soon, they reach the East Sea. Their home is on the other side of the East Sea. Normally, they speed across the sky on clouds. But tonight is not a normal night. Tonight, they're going to have some fun.
“Hey!" yells Lv Dongbin to the other seven. "Let's use our special powers to cross the ocean!" 
The others nod and laugh and cheer. “You go first!" says Han Xiangzi.
"Watch and learn!" replies Li Dongbin. He pulls out his sword and drops it into the sea. When the sword hits the water, it changes before their eyes. It becomes a boat! He rows across the waves. Han Xiangzi goes next. He plays his flute and bobs over the waves. Next, He Xian'gu, the beautiful woman, and Cao Guojiu, the white- nosed man, stand on the beach. He Xian'gu tosses her magical lotus on the water and watches it expand. Then she steps onto the flower and crosses the sea. Cao Guojiu throws down his jade tablet. He hops aboard and surfs out to sea. 
The fifth immortal is red-faced and chubby. His name is Han Zhongli. He always has a fan in his hand. He drops it in the water, making a raft. Then Lan Caihe throws a basket of flowers on the water. The basket grows and grows and grows. Lan Caihe hops in, and the basket floats across the sea. The next immortal is Zhang Guolao. He likes to joke around, stroking his white beard as he laughs. He takes out a little paper donkey that he keeps hidden in his robes. It turns into a real donkey! He gets on the donkey's back and rides into the water.
Last is Tieguai Li, the leader of the Eight Immortals. He doesn't really look like an immortal. He has the body of a frail old beggar. He throws his iron crutch into the waves. The moment the crutch touches the water, it transforms into a dragon! The dragon flies over the waves, carrying Tieguai Li on its back.
The friends' laughter and songs flow across the waves. From underwater, the Dragon King and his shrimp soldiers hear the commotion. They surface and watch the parade of immortals, cheering the Eight Immortals' distinctive styles. “Come on!"
Today, the phrase “The eight immortals cross the sea" describes a group in which each person uses his or her unique skills to reach the same goal.
                       Question
Describe a time when you and your friends each used your own special skills to get something done together.

                 The Master Archer 
                 
Long, long ago, there was a famous archer named Yang Youji. He lived in China during the Spring and Autumn Period. People from all over China came to see his skills with the bow and arrow. What other people needed two arrows to do, Yang Youji only needed one.
But there was another famous archer during this time. His name was Pan Dang. He was known for always hitting the bull's-eye of the target. The two archers had heard a lot about one another over the years, but they had never met.  One summer day, the two men finally met at an archery competition.
"I'm a perfect archer," Pan Dang bragged. "I always hit the bull's- eye, no matter what! My arrow has never ever missed."
"I also always hit the bull's-eye," replied Yang Youji. "However, my friend, that is not the true test of a master archer."
“Oh, really?" asked Pan Dang, surprised. No one had ever said that his archery skills weren't good enough. “Show me, then, what makes a perfect archer. Whatever it is, I'm sure l can do it too!"
"A perfect archer can hit a leaf of a willow tree from one hundred steps away," said Yang Youji.
"Impossible! Willow leaves are so thin, no one could do it! Show me!" cried Pan Dang. He doubted that Yang Youji could do such a thing. “All right, I will," replied Yang Youji. He pointed to a nearby willow tree. "Go mark three leaves on that tree for me to shoot."
Pan Dang carefully chose three leaves that would be extra hard to hit. He painted them with the numbers one, two, and three. This was to show the order in which Yang Youji had to shoot them. “All right, Yang Youji," said Pan Dang. "I'm ready to see if you can really do this!"
Yang Youji smiled and walked one hundred steps away from the tree. As he lifted his bow and took aim, pan Dang held his breath. Would Yang Youji really be able to hit the three leaves? It seemed impossible! 
Whoosh! The first arrow flew past Pan Dang and ... hit the first leaf! Pan Dang's mouth hung open in shock. But Yang Youji was just really lucky, right? There was no way he could hit two more leaves. 
 Whoosh! Wrong! The second arrow also found its target, hitting the second leaf exactly in the middle. Pan Dang stared in disbelief as Yang Youji took aim at the last leaf. He drew the arrow back slowly, and …
Whoosh! The third arrow hit its leaf!
“I-I'm speechless!" Pan Dang confessed. "You were right, Yang Youji, I am no master archer. But you are!"
The story of Yang Youji and Pan Dang's meeting has been passed down through the ages. The idiom “A hundred shots, a hundred bull's-eyes" is used to describe someone who is well prepared, and very successful in whatever they  do, just like Yang Youji was.
                  Question  
What is something that you are very, very good at?

               The Big Pot of Porridge Laba Festival
              
      Grandpa is in the kitchen.  He is stirring a very big pot on the stove.
      Lily and Lu join him.
     “Yay!" Lily claps her hands
     “Grandpa's cooking! What is in the big pot?"
“Is it soup?" asks Lu.
"No," says Grandpa.
"Is it rice?" asks Lily.
“There is rice in the pot," says Grandpa. “But there are many other things in the pot, too."
“I know!" says Lily. "It's porridge!" 
 “That's right!" says Grandpa. “It's Laba porridge. We will eat it today and celebrate sharing."
"It looks good," says Lily. “Can I stir it?"
“Sure!" says Grandpa.
“Why do we eat this holiday porridge?" asks Lu.
“That's a good question," Grandpa says. "I will tell you the story. Long ago, the Buddha was a monk. Like the others, he meditated. He meditated and forgot to eat!" 
 “Wow!" says Lu. "I never forget to eat. What happened next?"
“He meditated for a long time,"  says Grandpa. "He didn't eat at all. He didn't even move. One day, a girl found him. He was very thin. He looked sick. The girl tried to wake him. But he didn't wake up." Lu puts his hand over his mouth. “Oh, no!"
“What did she do?" asks Lily. 
“She went home," says Grandpa. 
 “She left him?" asks Lily.
“Not quite," says Grandpa. “When she got home, she looked in her rice pot. It was nearly empty. She found some red beans, fruit, and seeds. She put them all into the pot." 
 "Just like your pot!" says Lu  
“That's right," says Grandpa. He helps Lu pour red beans into the pot. Lily stirs.
“The girl took a bowl of food to the Buddha," says Grandpa. “She helped him eat. She saved his life!"  
“Wow!" says Lily. “She gave him the first Laba porridge?"
“Yes, Lily," says Grandpa. “She shared her food.  And now, we share it with our family every year."
“Is it ready?" asks Lu. “It smells great! Can we share it now?"
“Yes!" says Grandpa. They sit at the table together.
“Look at all the colors in my bowl!" says Lily.
“It tastes great!" says Lu. “I like this holiday!"
                    Question 
 What food do you like to share with your family?
         
           The Monster Nian New Year's Eve 
On the last night of the year, a monster comes out of the sea. The monster's name is Nian. The monster is hungry! It goes to a village near the sea. It eats the animals in the village. The villagers hide in the mountains.
Mrs. Chen is leaving the village.  
“Wait!” says an old man. “Where are you going?"
“The monster Nian is coming!" says Mrs. Chen. “Everyone hides in the mountains. We wait for the new year. Come with me!"
“I can scare the monster away,"  says the man. "Can I stay at your house tonight?"
“You may stay here," says Mrs. Chen. "But be careful!"
“I will be fine," says the man. 
 He puts red paper on Mrs. Chen's door. He lights lanterns. He makes the house very bright.
He puts on a red coat. He waits for the monster.
That night, Nian walks out of the sea. Nian is very hungry. It looks around the dark village. It sees the red door of Mrs. Chen's house. It sees the lanterns.
The bright lights hurt Nian's eyes. It roars loudly!
"ROAR!"
The man hears the monster. He throws the door open.
BANG!
He shouts at the monster. He waves his arms in the air. He lights firecrackers.
POP! POP! POP! 
 The monster sees the man in the red coat. It hears the loud noises and sees the fire. The monster is scared!
The man shouts,
"GO AWAY! 
 Nian turns and runs back to the sea.
The people come back to the village. Their animals and houses are safe. They run to Mrs. Chen's house.
“Nian is gone," says the man. 
 “How did you do it?" asks Mrs. Chen.
“It was easy," says the man." Nian is scared of fire. It doesn't like the red color, and it doesn't like loud noises."
Now, on the last day of the year, the villagers put up red paper and red lanterns. They light loud firecrackers. They have a party for the new year. They know Nian will never come back!
              Question 
How do you celebrate the last night of the year? Who do you celebrate with?
 
        The Red Envelope Hunt Spring Festival
Li Mei loves Spring Festival. Every year, she watches the fireworks with her sister Lily. They watch the dragon dances. But Li Mei's favorite thing about Spring Festival is the Red Envelope Hunt.  
The night before Chinese New Year, Li Mei's father puts lucky money into a red envelope. He hides it in the house for Li Mei to find. Li Mei loves to hunt for the red envelope. It is so much fun! 
 On New Year's Day, Li Mei wakes up early. She is very excited. Where is her red envelope?
Li Mei gets dressed. She puts on her favorite jeans and a red sweater. She looks in the closet. Where is her red envelope?
She looks under the blanket.  She looks under the pillow. Where is her red envelope?
Li Mei looks in her desk. She looks behind the curtains. She looks under the bed. Where is her red envelope?
Li Mei says hello to her pet bird. "Happy New Year!" she says. “Have you seen my red envelope?"
Li Mei looks into Lily's bedroom. “Happy New Year!" she says. “Have you seen my red envelope?"
“Did you look under your pillow? That's where I found mine!" Lily holds up her red envelope.
Li Mei goes to the living room. She looks under the sofa. She looks on the coffee table. Where is her red envelope?
Li Mei's father is making breakfast in the kitchen. "Happy New Year, Mei Mei!" he says.
“Happy New Year, Daddy!" says Li Mei. “Have you seen my red envelope?"
“Of course I have!" he says. “Should I give you a clue?" 
 “Yes, please!” says Li Mei. “I looked everywhere!"
“Well, you might sit on it, says Dad.
“Oh!” says Li Mei. She looks on the chairs. She looks on the sofa. She looks on the beds. She even looks on the toilet! Where is her red envelope?
Li Mei goes back to the kitchen. “I can't find it!" she says. She sits down on a chair. Something feels strange. She stands up. Li Mei puts her hand into the back pocket of her jeans. She pulls out her red envelope!
“Here it is!" she says.
“I said you might sit on it!" says her father. "Happy New Year, Mei Mei!"
            Question
What is your favorite thing to do during Spring Festival? Why?
             The Fire in the Village Lantern Festival  
-A big, beautiful bird flies over a village in China. The bird belongs to the Jade Emperor. Three men in the village watch the bird. They want to catch it.
The first man takes a knife. The second man takes a sword. The third man takes a bow. They chase the bird. The bird flies faster. The men run up a mountain.
The bird flies higher. The first man throws his knife. The second man swings his sword. They both miss the bird. The third man shoots an arrow from his bow. 
 It hits the bird! The bird falls down the mountain. The men can't reach it. They walk back to the village.
The Jade Emperor waits for his bird. Night comes, but his bird does not.
The Jade Emperor is worried. He looks down from heaven and sees his bird, lying at the bottom of the mountain.
The Jade Emperor is angry. He wants to punish the men. He calls his daughter, the princess.
“I will burn the village!" he yells.
“Yes, father," says the princess. The princess goes to the village. She talks to the three men.
“My father is angry," she says. "He will destroy your village with fire!  He will do it on the fifteenth day of this month."
The three men don't know what to do. The people in the village are scared.
The three men ask a wise woman for help. The wise woman thinks. She looks at the village. She looks up the mountain. She looks up at heaven. 
 “For three days, there must be fire in the village," the wise woman says.
"You must light lanterns. You must light fires. You must light firecrackers. The village must be full of fire and noise. The Jade Emperor will see the fire. He will think the village is destroyed."  
The men thank the wise woman. They find red lanterns, firewood, and firecrackers.
The fourteenth day of the month comes. The villagers light the lanterns. They light fires around their houses. They light the firecrackers.
POP! POP! POP!
For three days, the village is full of fire and noise. The Jade Emperor and the princess look down from heaven. They see the fire, and they hear the noise.
“Thank you, daughter," says the Jade Emperor. “You have destroyed the village!"
The princess smiles at her father. She knows the three men and their village are safe.
That month was the first month of the year. The festival lasted three nights. Now people celebrate on the fifteenth. Their lanterns fly!
                          Question
  The princess helped the village. Have you helped someone? How did you help?
    Remembering Grandpa Qingming Festival
Hi! My name is Jiakai. Today is a very important day. Qingming Festival. Today we are going to visit the grave of my Yeh Yeh. 
Yesterday, we got everything ready. My mom, my Ah Mah, and I folded some paper to make it look like gold money from ancient China. Meanwhile, my dad and my little sister made some of my Yeh Yeh's favorite foods, like dumplings and pork char siu. 
 Today we are all up early, getting ready to go to the cemetery where Yeh Yeh is buried. My job is to gather all the paper money that we are going to burn. Aha! After looking for almost fifteen minutes, I finally find a plastic bag in the kitchen that I can put the money in.
We make sure we have everything before Mom, Dad, Ah Mah, my sister, and I all pack into the car. 
The drive to the cemetery is long and I take a short nap. There's a lot of traffic as we get closer to the cemetery. All the other families are also coming to pay respects to their ancestors.
Dad parks the car. I'm the first one out. I run ahead, holding tightly to the paper money. I quickly find Yeh Yeh's grave. By the time the rest of my family catches up, I'm already brushing leaves aside with my hands.
The first step of Qingming Festival is to sweep the tomb. My mom hands me a broom and I continue to clean the grave. Soon, all the dirt is cleared away, and the area looks as good as new!
Next, my dad brings out the food. He sets it in front of the tombstone as an offering to Yeh Yeh. Ah Mah pours out some rice wine in a cup and places it next to the food.  
Now comes the most important part! My dad takes out a big, old bowl. We put the paper money in the bowl and Dad lights it.
As the money burns, the ash rises and goes to my Yeh Yeh. You always need money, even after life!  
After we burn all the paper money, we light some incense and leave it at the grave.
We then take turns bowing three times in front of the tomb.
“Why do we bow three times, Dad?" I ask.
“Well, Jiakai, we bow three times to honor Yeh Yeh," my dad replies.  
Afterward, we walk over to the entrance of the cemetery. There, we find a table full of food. Everybody in our community comes together every Qingming Festival to honor their ancestors and enjoy the day outside. That, of course, has to include food!
Mom puts our food on the table for everyone to enjoy. I grab a plate and start piling food onto it. Everything looks so yummy! My sister and I eat together. Our tummies full we join the other children and play.
Soon, Mom tells us it's time to leave. On the ride back, my dad and Ah Mah tell us some stories about Yeh Yeh. Dad says this is how we will always remember him, by telling stories.
When we get home, I'm so tired from the long day that I go to bed without dinner. I fall asleep dreaming of Yeh Yeh, remembering the good times we had together.
                    Question
How does your family celebrate Qingming Festival?
    
                           The Three Monks  
                               Part 1
     The handsome young monk looked across the wooden bridge. "Can I be lost if I'm not supposed to be anywhere?" he asked himself.
"Well, that's a tough one," he answered himself. "I'd like to ask a friend." Usually things worked out well when one of his friends gave him advice. He had been missing his friends since leaving the monastery a few days before. 
 He continued his conversation with himself. "Should I cross the bridge?" he asked aloud.
      "Oh, that's another tough one!" he answered himself. "Why do I keep asking myself such hard questions! Geez! Lighten up, Jun!"
A family of goats clattered onto the bridge, interrupting Jun's argument with himself. Trusting in the wisdom of goats, Jun followed them over the river and up a mountain path.
Then they all walked together to a rundown temple at the end of the path.
“Hello?" Finding the building empty of people and noticing that the goats seemed to be at home, Jun thought he might as well move in too. He was grateful to the goats, so when they started to eat his straw hat, he let them.
The next morning, Jun was awakened by a kid goat nibbling the sock on his left foot. “You're right," he told the goat. “We need food." He and the goats went outside. They picked fruit from the orchard next to the temple. After breakfast, Jun grabbed one of two big buckets. Then he and the goats hiked down to the river for a drink. Jun filled the bucket and lugged it back to the temple. As he did stretches near the altar, one of the goats climbed on his back.
Every day passed in much the same way. Jun became more confident. He even started to make his own decisions, instead of always watching what the goats did. He decided to wash the statues in the temple and weave a new straw hat. It was the goats' decision that Jun should be barefoot. His socks were too tasty.
One hot day, a tall, thin monk arrived while Jun was in silent meditation. Jun's eyes were closed, and he was as still as the beautiful Buddha on the altar. The tall monk looked around and thought he was alone. He quenched his thirst with most of the water in the big bucket. 
 Jun finished his meditation and, smiling, turned to greet his visitor.  “ACK! You startled me!” the monk cried, jumping backward. "I thought you were a statue!"
“No," said Jun. “I'm real. Welcome! My name is Jun. Would you like a drink of water or a piece of fruit?"  
"I would like more water, thank you," said the monk. "It's really hot outside. Nice to meet you by the way. My name is Chang."
Jun leaned into the bucket to get the last bit of water for his visitor. “What's going on?" he exclaimed, frowning. “I just filled the bucket."  
Chang blushed. “I drank the water. I was about to fall over from thirst."
“I bet you're still thirsty," said  Jun.
"I am," said Chang.
“Here you go!" Jun hung both big buckets on a long pole, surprising himself with his decisiveness. “You can fill up these buckets at the river."
     Question  
Can someone be lost if he or she is not supposed to be anywhere? Explain your answer.
    
            The Three Monks  
                 Part 2
   
Chang bent his back to balance the two big buckets on the long pole.  He staggered out the door. By the time he reached the edge of the orchard, he was tired and very thirsty. He sat down to regain his strength. A goat came over and nibbled Chang's hat, which was as tasty as Jun's hat. After shooing away the goat, Chang decided it was unfair that he should carry two big buckets. He had drunk only part of one bucket!
He turned back. As he hiked uphill, he stepped to the rhythm of Not fair! Not fair! A line of goats followed him, parading. The tallest goat marched behind Chang, butting him with its horns. This did not improve Chang's mood.
“You," Chang called to the  younger monk. "I'm not going to fill up two buckets! It's not fair! I didn't even drink one! You should carry at least one!"
“Well, I guess you're going to be thirsty then," said Jun, shrugging. Wow! He thought proudly. What a hothead I am! I really told him off! No one's going to push me around!
The two monks faced away from each other at the altar, chanting. Chang found Jun's chanting to be too slow. Jun tried not to be distracted by Chang's whiny voice.
As they chanted, two goats scampered into the room. They trotted around, then butted heads and laughed. Both monks wondered if the goats were laughing at them!
Jun got up. He slid one bucket off the pole. Then he measured the pole and marked the center. “Chang," he said. “Let's carry one bucket together."
“Good idea," Chang quickly agreed, embarrassed. As they filed out of the temple to get water, neither man would look at the goats.
Jun, Chang, and the goats settled into a daily routine. The kid goat found Chang's socks to be as tasty as Jun's. The orchard and garden became a little farm. The goats climbed over both monks as they stretched in the morning. The walk to the river never got easier. 
 It was an even hotter day when a monk named Zhuang came uphill, panting. He was an older, big-boned fellow and very thirsty. The kid goat welcomed him to the temple by sniffing his left sock. “Got any water for a thirsty monk?" he asked Jun.
“Welcome!" Jun answered. “Sure we do!""
Before Chang could hand him the cup, Zhuang grabbed a big bucket. In a show of great strength, he downed all the water in one gulp! “Shifu," said Jun, trying to be respectful. "How can you drink that fast!"
Zhuang grabbed the second bucket and drank all of it. "It's a talent," he bragged. "I can drink like a camel!"
“You just drank all our water!" complained Chang. He put the two big buckets on the pole. “You've got to go to the river and fill up the buckets."
Jun said, “Thanks in advance for filling our buckets." He fist- bumped the tallest goat to congratulate himself on being so decisive. Well, fist and horn bumped.
“Not gonna happen," said Zhuang. “As my name is Da Zhuang, I am too strong to be bossed around. You can get your own water!" 
 Now here's where modern life really wins over life long ago. If this had happened today, a guy on a scooter would have delivered water. The goats would have nibbled his hat. Easy-peasy. There would have been no need for a quarrel.
But there was no scooter. What was there? A food fight! When Zhuang refused to fill the buckets, Chang grabbed an orange. He threw it at Zhuang, yelling, “Guess you'll have to squeeze some juice then!" The orange bounced off Zhuang's tummy!
“YOU can squeeze juice!" yelled Zhuang. He hurled a bunch of bananas at Chang. He got him on the chin, ears, and bald head. Chang threw a peach and accidentally hit Jun straight on the nose.
“Not my nose!" cried Jun. “It's my most handsome feature! How dare you!" He scooped up the smashed peach. Zhuang and Chang grabbed oranges and apricots. Everybody threw. It was a flurry of flying fruit! Some very happy and hungry goats cleaned up the mess in the temple. But the monks looked like walking fruit smoothies.
             Question
 In the original folktale, goats are not a part of the story. Why do you think the writer added goats to this telling of The Three Monks?
    
             The Three Monks 
                 Part 3
        
Jun's strongest, most heart-felt wish was to get clean. He got a small bucket from the closet and stepped outside. But to go to the river, get water, and scrub ... Well, wouldn't the others think he had given in to them? He put away the bucket.
The monks looked up at the sky, pleading for rain. It looked like it would rain. Didn't it? But no rain came!
Without water, the three monks got thirstier, more tired, and smellier. Even the goats, not known for being fussy, began to stay away. They started living outside.
One day, as the monks snored, a rat sneaked onto the altar. It too wanted water. It found none but did find an oil lamp. It sipped the oil from the lamp, then leaned in to drink it all. It knocked over the oil lamp. The altar cloth caught fire! Flames ran up the wooden altar. The rat ran down the altar and across Jun's toes.
Jun coughed and opened his eyes. “Pardon me, you two," he said to his older friends. He gently tapped them on the shoulders.
“You may want to get up. There's a fire. We need to get water right away.  
“What?" said Zhuang, rubbing sleep out of his eyes. Chang snored.
Jun said, “We need water."  
Zhuang closed his eyes. “I'm not your water delivery service, "he said in a dry, raspy voice. 
Jun leaned over. “"The room is on fire!" he shouted into Zhuang's ear.
Zhuang's eyes bugged out! “Why didn't you say so?" he yelled.  
He nudged Chang with his foot. “Get up! Get up! You want to die? Get up!" He shook him. The skinny monk leaped to his feet.
“Hey, what's the big deal?" Chang asked.
“The altar's on fire!" Zhuang yelled in his face.
“We've got to get water!" Chang yelled back. "Grab the buckets!" 
 The three monks ran to the bucket closet. They all got there at once, so they jammed into the doorway. No one could move. Zhuang started to yell at the others but thought better of it and wiggled instead. Chang, the skinniest monk, broke free and pushed into the closet. He grabbed the two big buckets and two small ones.
The monks ran downhill. Jun slipped on the trail. Chang and Zhuang lifted him up. At the river, they helped each other scoop up the water. Then Zhuang raced uphill with one big bucket, Chang carried the other big bucket, and Jun tucked each small bucket under an arm.
They ran back and forth to the river and the temple until they finally doused the fire. Then they congratulated one another, nodding at their smoky, fruit- stained faces. Handsome Jun, in particular, looked disgusting! They laughed.
From that day onward the three monks were best friends. They never refused to help one another with their chores. They also learned to make socks... for the kid goat's breakfast!
              Question
How much water should Chang and Zhuang carry, if they are to be fair  to Jun? Why?
              
              Yu and the Flood
              Part 1
The snow had been heavy that winter and spring had just begun to green the fields. The Yellow River roared like a dragon. Water raced down the slopes. It leapt over the walls my father had built. My new wife and I raced away and up the mountain.
The river was white with fury and power. The waves chased us. we kept moving upward. At last we reached a dry ridge.
The river flooded valleys and washed away homes. It drowned crops. Hungry people and animals searched for safety on treetops and boulders. Many never found safety.
When we returned to our village, I learned that my father's dams had broken. Many people had died. So the king ordered that my father should die too. Along with that terrible news, I learned that I was to take my father's place. It became my job to stop the floods. I said goodbye to my pregnant wife and headed to the capital.
At the capital, I asked for new ideas from the elders who had worked with my father. They nervously told me what they thought I wanted to hear.
“There were successes," said one, stroking his beard. “Remember the year with little rain?" They all nodded. “There were no floods that year!"
I waited and listened. Finally, one of the elders quietly said, "It seems the river has no place to go, young Yu. It has too much water and not enough room to run."
"Here's what you ought to do," another one advised. He leaned in. “Find He Bo, the god of the Yellow River. He hates the river! He drowned in it years ago. He might help you."
I gathered a large army of workers, and we began digging flood channels. I hoped the channels would guide any overflow water away from the main river.  The channels would send the water downhill toward the ocean. Next, I waded in the shallow waters of the Yellow River, leading another army of people to deepen and widen it.
As I dug, I tried to remember my wife's sweet face. But the only memories that came to me were of the last flood. Those memories urged me on, and I worked harder.  
The channels and other changes we made to the river had some good results. However, we hadn't stopped the floods. People were still suffering. We needed to know the river better and make changes more quickly.
We traveled past my family's home as we worked on the river nearby. I knew my wife had just given birth to our son. I heard his cry as I dug a flood channel near our house. I longed to be with them both, but I couldn't go see them.  Their safety was more important. I had to continue working to make the channel safe for them.
Months later, as we were nearing the end of our work on that part of the river, I heard my son call for his mama. Hearing him inspired me to work all night. The lantern's light on the water at midnight was almost as bright as the sun. Or so I told myself, because I wanted to keep working.
Over time, I all but became a river creature. I lost my toenails, and my hands and feet wrinkled from being underwater. But I didn't mind. If I could stop more people from dying, my life would have meaning. And my father's life and death would have meaning.
                Question 
How do channels stop rivers from flooding?
1. They make the rivers deeper, so they can hold more water.
2. When the rivers are moving too fast, they slow them down. 
3. When there is too much water, some of the water flows into the channels.
4. The channels use gravity to move the water uphill.
   
        Yu and the Flood
        Part 2  
I was working late one night, downriver from my home. I had gotten used to getting little sleep. I told myself I could live on water and work. The calm river and the feeling of fish nibbling on my toes were almost like a dream.
The moon and the lantern were shining brightly. I adjusted my bamboo hat and swung my axe into the cliff beside the water. I heard a splash behind me. I kept working. Another splash. I kept working. Another splash! This one drenched my entire back, and I heard laughter. I turned around, ready to tell the jokester to let me work. 
To my surprise, I came face to face with He Bo, the god of the yellow River. He looked older, more wrinkled, and soggier than anyone I had ever seen. I might have mistaken him for an old carp if I hadn't noticed he was holding something in his hand.
“I've been looking for you!" he said. His mouth curled up into a smile. His whiskers curled down like a carp's. "Is your name Yu?" 
 I bowed. “Immortal He Bo," I said respectfully. “I have been looking for you too. 
 Water ran down him like many rivers heading toward his feet. With a twinkle in his eye, he sang, “I have something that you want!” Then he became serious. "I'll give it to you if you promise to control this troublesome river! Do you know it drowned me? And it never apologized to me!"
“I'm sorry," I said. "And I promise we will control it.” I bowed again.  “We are trying, but we need to know more.  ”
“I was almost a god," he said. “I needed to drink the juice of only one more daffodil to become immortal. Then this crazy river drowned me! Anyway, I got the last laugh! I became a god anyway!" He batted a water bug out of his whiskers and handed me a scroll. I unrolled the scroll. It was a map of the river! The map showed where the water was shallow, where it was deep, and where big boulders parted its path. There were notes and suggestions about how to control the river.
“Thank you!" I cried. "This is exactly the information we need to stop the flooding!"
But He Bo never heard me. He was gone, and had vanished underwater.  The army of workers and I traveled along nine different rivers in China, making changes that stopped the flooding. We passed my house once again. By this time, my son Qi was ten years old.  He ran outside and threw himself into my arms. “Father, you're home!" he cried.
I'm sorry, Son," I told him. 'But my work isn't done I'm not coming home yet." It broke my heart to see his sad face. I hoped he would understand some day.
After thirteen years of work, we stopped the flooding. Al last, China was safe! I was appointed an advisor to the king because of my success in controlling the rivers. When the king grew old, he chose me to become the next king. I became known as Yu the Great. After my time as king ended, my devoted son, Qi, became the founder of the Xia Dynasty.
 Question
What sort of problem would inspire you to work as hard as Yu in order to solve it?

            Hou Yi and the Happily Ever After 
                       Part l
The glowing sunbird fluffed its feathers and sang a song of morning. It spread its wings, sending sparks shooting like fireworks. Then it took flight. It was both sun and sunbird at once, bringing daylight to the world. 
 The nine other sunbirds watched their brother and squawked and seethed. They burned with envy. When would they finally get their turns to fly? In nine days? In three days? It was too hard to wait! The nine remaining sunbirds fumed. They shifted uncomfortably in the burnt tree in the middle of the Taklimakan Desert. They were jealous. They were bored.
One sunbird flitted from branch to branch, flying a little higher each time.
"Dad will be mad!" another sunbird called. "You're not supposed to fly! It's not your turn!"  
Their father, Jade Emperor, had made a promise to each of them. Every sunbird would have plenty of chances to be the Sun. Each day, a fiery sunbird took a turn flying across the sky as the Sun. It was so FUN! They wanted to fly every day! But since there were ten sunbirds, it took a long time to get another chance to show off. They wanted to have fun all day, every day, forever!
Everyone thought the sunbirds were the most beautiful things in heaven or on Earth. Everyone but Hou Yi. He loved the Moon. He loved her cool light, the way she was different every night, yet still the same. Sometimes she glowed.  Sometimes she hid her face behind the blackness of the night.
To Hou Yi, the Sun resembled a target, a bull's-eye for one of his arrows. Oh, he wanted to shoot it! To be fair though, Hou Yi was always looking for target practice. Since he had been a toddler playing with a toy bow and arrows, he had never grown tired of practice. That was nearly twenty years ago. After years of practice, he even looked like a bow. He kept his hair in a pointed topknot on his head and had long, lean arms and legs.
Wherever he went, he practiced archery. As he walked to the market, he placed an arrow on his bow. He watched a cloud chased by the wind. He shot an arrow through it. He saw an orange at the market and wanted to eat it. He slid a tongqian on his arrow. He took aim. "All right!" he cheered. "Chose my orange and paid for it all with one shot!" The fruit seller slid the coin off the arrow, his hands shaking with fear.
As Hou Yi bit the orange, the sky suddenly brightened. What was going on? Hou Yi slipped an arrow onto his bow. He squinted. Were there two suns in the sky? A low cloud burned up from the heat.
He heard terrible squawking! A flock of sunbirds rose into the air. Hou Yi closed his eyes tight, blinded by the sudden brightness. The sunbirds circled in the sky, unaware of anything below. 
They played a game of chase. They were so happy! They wanted to fly forever! A few swooped in the air, flames shooting off their wings and tails. Others admired their reflections in a nearby lake until it boiled away from the heat.
The sunbirds were finally having their fun! But it was not fun for anyone on Earth. It was terrifying! Hou Yi heard frightened horses running. Then he felt the heat. It was like wave after wave of fire. Hou Yi breathed in smoke and coughed. Covering his eyes and mouth, he ran to the shade of the fruit seller's stand. He bumped into the grape bin. All the grapes had turned to raisins!
“You're the best with a bow and arrow," said the fruit seller. "You've got to do something." "I will," Hou Yi said. He left the fruit seller's stand. He had to get closer to the sunbirds to stop them. He headed to Kunlun Mountain. The hot air attacked him at every step. The scorched ground cracked under his feet.
when he finally reached the top of Kunlun Mountain, Hou Yi slid an arrow onto his bow. He squinted at the nearest sunbird, pulled the bow back, and let the arrow fly. Then he quickly shot eight more arrows. He hit each bird and sent it zooming away from Earth into space.
There was only one sunbird left. It soared above Hou Yi's head. He readied his bow. Then, he stopped to think. If the last sunbird were gone, he could watch the lovely Moon all the time. But what about the plants, animals, and people that needed the Sun? Hou Yi put away the last arrow.
The last sunbird set below the horizon. Far, far away in space, the nine arrows slowed. The nine sunbirds became star-birds, flying forever in the night sky.
They shine every night for all to admire. They shoot across the sky when they want to travel. They have their happily ever after.
                    Question 
Describe what would happen if the sun never set.
            Hou Yi and the Happily Ever After
                    Part 2
Hou Yi slept under the light of millions of stars and nine star-birds. The next morning he walked off the mountain, the sunshine warming his back. As he neared the village, everyone came to see him. People bowed and asked to study archery with him. Birds sang to him. Rabbits hopped in circles by his feet. Even bugs wanted to express their thanks. He finally had to run away from a tiny group of very grateful dung beetles and their gifts!
It was a long day. Being a hero was really tiring! At last, sunset arrived. The sunbird drove west below the horizon.  Hou Yi hid beside a pond. He looked into the water and aimed at the reflection of the star-birds.
“why are you shooting at the water?"
Hou Yi spun around to see a young woman laughing. She had hair as dark as midnight, skin as pale as the moon, and eyes that shone like star-birds. You know how this goes It was a beautiful night by the lake. Nine stars were shining extra bright. The man and woman were young. Well, of course Hou Yi and Chang'e fell in love!
They lived happily ever-No! This isn't a fairy tale! Hou Yi and Chang'e got married and lived happily together. And that was enough for Chang'e. But it was not enough for Hou Yi. He wanted them to be together forever. He wanted his happily ever after. He looked for a special medicine that could defeat death. He found nothing. He asked everyone he met if they knew the secret of life. 
He taught many people to shoot arrows. But no one could teach him what he wanted to know. Then one day, he met a young man named Peng Meng. Peng Meng always had an arrow ready. But unlike Hou Yi, Peng Meng didn't care what he shot with his arrows. He didn't mind that his arrows hurt others. He practiced every day, shooting birds, bees, rabbits, and whatever else he could find. He only wanted to beat Hou Yi, but Hou Yi did not know that.
One day, Hou Yi invited Peng Meng over to his house for mooncakes. Peng Meng refused to leave his bow and arrows outside. He thought it would be funny to play a trick on Hou Yi and Chang'e. He pretended he was reaching for a mooncake. He let loose an arrow It smashed into a vase filled with water! The vase crashed to the floor! Water splashed everywhere! Chang'e's pet bunny raced out of the room, scared. And the mooncakes were ruined. Peng Meng smirked. “Sorry," he said. “Never mind," said Hou Yi, not knowing that Peng Meng had done it on purpose. “Training to be an archer is dangerous."
"Let me make it up to you," offered Peng Meng. “I shouldn't tell you-"
"Then don't," interrupted Chang'e. She looked at Peng Meng with suspicion.
Peng Meng continued. “I know how you might get your happily ever after."
Chang'e answered quickly. “We are happy."
Hou Yi added. “But we don't have a happily ever after. We're missing our ever after. Please tell me, Peng Meng, what do you know?"
“The Queen of Heaven has a magic pill." Peng Meng said. “If you find her, maybe she will give it to you. They say if you swallow the pill, you will rise to heaven and become a god."
"I'll find the Queen of Heaven!" said Hou Yi. “I'll ask her! But why should she give me the magic pill?" "You saved the world!" said Peng Meng. “That's worth something!" He went on. "I've heard that the Queen of Heaven sometimes visits Kunlun Mountain. I live near there.  Why don't you come home with me?"
Hou Yi followed Peng Meng out, blowing a kiss to Chang'e as he left.  When they neared the mountain, Peng Meng ran ahead. “My house is a mess!" he explained. "I want to tidy it up before you see it!" He hurried away.
Thick fog hung around the base of the mountain. Hou Yi smelled the fresh scent of rain. He heard the sound of birds singing. He turned to look and saw someone hidden in the clouds. She almost seemed to be part of the clouds.  Stunned, he dropped his arrows. He bowed, afraid and filled with wonder all at once.
She lifted his chin and placed a pill in his hand. Then she disappeared.
                    Question 
There are many different ways to tell this story. You may have read this story as a holiday tale for Mid- Autumn Festival. Talk about one difference between two versions of this story.
             
          Hou Yi and the Happily Ever After
                 Part 3
Hou Yi stared into the fog for a moment. He could hardly believe he had met the Queen of Heaven. He looked down at the pill in his hand. It was all true! Not a dream! He hurried home, forgetting all about his plan to visit Peng Meng. He forgot about everything but his hope, his bow and arrows, and Chang'e. It was so easy to become a god! He thought. Just shoot nine suns from the sky and wah-Lah! Get the happily ever after! Easy!
It was not so easy for him when he told Chang'e. “One pill You got one pill," she said. "'Let's not do it."  "We can split it?" suggested Hou Yi. He nervously twirled an arrow between his fingers.
"What happens if we split it?" she asked. “We live halfway between heaven and Earth? On the Moon? Is that where you want to live?"
“I get it," said Hou Yi, crestfallen. "I’ll ask her for another one." He and Chang'e locked the pill in a wooden box.
Hou Yi promised to return with another pill and left. He passed Peng Meng, who was practicing nearby.
After the sun had set, Chang'e was startled by a knock at the door. It was Peng Meng. "You're welcome to come in," said Chang'e, hesitantly. "But please leave your bow and arrows at the door with your shoes."
Suddenly Peng Meng grabbed her by the hair and jerked her forward. She felt the sharp arrow press against her chin. ‘Don't make a sound," he hissed. "You're not a goddess yet. You can still die." 
 Chang'e looked past him down the road. Hou Yi was long gone. “Give me the pill," Peng Meng demanded. Chang'e led him to the locked box, her mind racing. She couldn't let this awful person get the powers of a god! She shuddered.  "J have to bend down to unlock the box," she said. "You can point the arrow at the back of my neck." As she unlocked the box, Chang'e hunched her back so Peng Meng couldn't see what she was doing. She slipped her hand inside the box.  Quickly, she popped the pill into her mouth, then she spun around to face Peng Meng.
She swallowed the pill She shot upward and hit her head on the ceiling. “What?!” yelled Peng Meng, grabbing her foot.
Chang'e kicked with her newfound strength, knocking Peng Meng to the
 floor. She crawled along the ceiling, aiming for a window.
He grabbed his bow and arrows. “I'll get that pill one way or another!" he yelled, aiming at her. "I don't care that you've already swallowed it!"
With a strong push, Chang'e reached a window. Peng Meng shot an arrow. Chang'e pushed out into the night. The arrow bounced off the wall Peng Meng chased Chang'e outside.
Chang'e kicked her legs to rise faster. She willed herself to reach the low-hanging clouds above her She had to hide. Peng Meng shot arrows one after the other. An arrow scratched her leg. Another tangled in her long hair.
She hid behind a cloud. "'Help! Hou Yi” she cried, with the booming voice of a goddess. “Coming," answered Hou Yi, running down the mountain. 
 Peng Meng ran away when he heard Hou Yi's voice, never to be seen again.
Chang'e now struggled to stop her rise to heaven. There was nothing to hold onto, only air. There was no way to stop.
Hou Yi stared at the sky, trying to find Chang'e, but it was too cloudy. Then a shooting star lit the night. He saw her, flying upward like a night heron.
“Take the pill!." Chang'e yelled. 
 Hou Yi answered, “She wouldn't give me another."
"I love you," Chang'e called, sadly. 
 Hou Yi answered, "I love you." 
 Chang'e didn't want to be a goddess. She wanted happiness, but she didn't want an ever after. Heaven would not be heaven without Hou Yi. Better to be closer to him than live in heaven. She stretched out like an arrow and aimed for the moon. Then she gave a strong kick. Her aim was true. She landed on the Moon.
How could Hou Yi get Chang'e back? He slid an arrow onto his bow. He could shoot down the Moon! Then Hou Yi reconsidered An arrow would only push Chang'e farther away, just as it had the nine sunbirds.
setting down his bow and arrows, Hou Yi looked up at the Moon he had always loved, and loved it more. Loved her more.
                  Question 
What do you love about the Sun or the Moon? Why?
           
           Magic, Gold, and an Old Ding
                  Part l 
The old man bent over the rice plants struggling to grow in the muddy rice paddy. "I guess shouldn't mind that Wang Bapi keeps taking more of our land," he said to his grandson Lu. "The bigger the farm, the more we have to work. And the more we have to give the magistrate. But I wish we had more rice." "Me too," said Lu. "I'm tired of us being hungry." Lu's real name was Zhang Lu, but everyone called him Lu for short.
As they walked back to the house, Grandpa Zhang stepped on something hard. "I think it might be a big piece of rock salt," he told Lu. "That would explain why the rice has been dying." They tried digging it up with their hands. 
“The mud keeps covering it up!" said Lu.
“What?" asked Grandpa. He cupped his ears with his muddy hands.
"The mud, it' all over!" complained Lu.
"What?" asked Grandpa. He rubbed his ears with his muddy hands.  
"Grandpa, you have mud in your ears!" said Lu.
"What?" said Grandpa, wiping his ears. "I can't hear you. I've got mud in my ears."
“Grandpa," laughed Lu. "Let's finish the house chores. Then we can get the shovel and try again."  
After cleaning up, they headed inside to the family shrine. They dusted it and bowed to their ancestors.
"I'm sorry, Grandpa, Great Grandpa, and all the family," said Grandpa Zhang. "We don't have any fruit to share with you today. But we have a little bit of rice and cool water." His grandson lit the incense and candles.
“Do you really think I'm like your great grandpa?" asked Lu.
“Just as smart," said the old man, smiling. "And just as big a nose. And if you are just as hardworking, then you'll be a great man like he was." Great Grandpa's portrait hung over the shrine. He had a serious expression, but bis eyes seemed to twinkle in the candlelight.
Wang Bapi was Lu and Grandpa Zhang's neighbor. His fields began on the other side of their yard. The fields stretched all the way to the river. In his big home, Wang Bapi stacked up the gold yuanbao in front of his family shrine.  
"You would be proud of me," he said to the pictures of his ancestors. “You gave me a nice farm, and I've turned it into a big farm!" He lit a candle. “My neighbors' farms have all gotten smaller because I am so clever. I move the fences a little bit each night! If anyone notices and complains, I salt their fields. Then nothing grows!" The ancestors' portraits glimmered darkly in the golden light.
On the other side of the river from Wang Bapi's fields was the border of the magistrate's land. His land stretched from the river across a wide valley. It went over a mountain and to the end of another valley. In that green valley, the magistrate lived with his old father.
“Son!" said the magistrate's father. " You didn't take care of the shrine while I was sick! The ancestors' portraits are covered in dust. This peach has a worm in it!" "Father," said the magistrate. "I said I'd take care of it. Give me time. You don' need to nag me!" "Are you waiting for the rotten peach to become a tree? For the worm to become a butterfly?" scolded the magistrate's father. He tapped his son with his walking cane.
The magistrate threw away the rotten fruit and rolled his eyes. When his father was sick, the maid had taken care of him. The magistrate had enjoyed a few peaceful days to do as he wished. The magistrate eyed the large pot, called a ding, sitting in front of the shrine. What if his father were to bend over and hit his head on the ding? That would be a shame. However, the maid would have to take care of him again. Perhaps for a week or more this time! The magistrate was pulled out of his daydream by his father's harsh voice.
“Son, go get some fresh fruit and drink for our ancestors. You'll have to go to the store for more incense and candles."
As the magistrate rode to the store, he went past Grandpa Zhang's small plot of land. He noticed Grandpa Zhang and his grandson in the rice paddy, working. The rice didn't look healthy. "Oh no," he grumbled." I bet they won't want to pay their full share to me next harvest." 
 In the rice paddy, Grandpa Zhang and Lu struggled to dig. "Whatever it is, it's big and heavy!" said Lu.
                    Question  
What do you think they found?
            Magic, Gold, and an Old Ding
                Part 2  
After digging the entire afternoon, Grandpa Zhang and Lu pulled a huge clay pot from the mud. "It's a ding," said Grandpa. “Very old. Let's clean it up and put it in front of our shrine. The ancestors will like it."
Later that evening, Grandpa Zhang boiled water and cooked their last bi of rice. "Well share it with the ancestors," he said to Lu. He scooped out three portions: two for them and one for the ding.
“Grandpa, do we have anything left?" asked Lu after he finished a few bites. "I' till hungry." 
 Grandpa Zhang took the last bit of rice from the ding and put it in Lu's bowl. "I'm sorry, Ancestors," he said. “But the boy is hungry." 
 He thought he heard a voice near the shrine say, "Poor thing." He shook his head. He was hearing things!
When he reached to grab the incense sticks on the shrine, he looked down and noticed something white. There was more rice in the ding! Shaking his head, he muttered, “Getting old, my memory's starting to go." He scooped out the rice and gave it to his grandson.
“Grandpa," said Lu. “You already gave me more rice. I'm not hungry anymore."
Grandpa Zhang shook his head again and looked in the ding. He saw a big mound of rice! "Lu, come here!" he called. With his grandson watching, Grandpa Zhang filled a couple of bowls with rice. More rice filled the ding!
"Lu," he said to his grandson. "It's time to have a party! Invite the neighbors! Dinner's on us!"
Everyone in the village came to the house with a rice bowl. They thanked the ancestors and ate their fill. The ding never ran out of rice! They played rice and dice games and laughed together.
After everyone said goodbye, their neighbor Wang Bapi arrived. “Give me the ding," he demanded. Big men with big knives pushed their way into the house.
Grandpa Zhang and Lu lifted the heavy ding over their heads. "I will break the pot if you try to take it!" threatened Grandpa Zhang. Wang Bapi and his gang left. Grandfather and grandson lowered the ding to. the floor, their arms shaking.
                 Question 
If your bowl of rice never became empty, what do you think the cause would be? Would it be because your parent keeps filling your bowl, due to a magic pot, because you never eat it all, or another reason? Explain.
            Magic, Gold, and an Old Ding
The next day, Wang Bapi told the magistrate that Grandpa Zhang had stolen the ding from him. The magistrate ordered the two neighbors to bring the pot to him and tell their stories. Grandpa Zhang and Lu placed the magical ding in front of the magistrate's family shrine.
After the magistrate heard the stories, he tossed a gold yuanbao into the pot. The pot filled with gold and his eyes bugged out. Everyone gazed in amazement and clapped. Even the eyes of the ancestors in the portraits above the shrine seemed to grow wide with wonder and amusement. 
 "My lost ding!" cried the magistrate I's been in my family for generations! At last you have found it!" he lied, nodding to Grandpa Zhang. He tossed him a gold yuanbao in thanks.
The magistrate congratulated himself. He would be able to hire many maids to watch his father and take care of the shrine! He was rich and soon to be free of his nagging father!
Walking slowly with his cane, the magistrate's father headed toward the shrine. "I want to try it!" he said.
"Father! Let me help you!" the magistrate cried. 
 "Don't try to fool me, Sonny!" the old man said, laughing bitterly. He staggered forward, his cane leading the way. “You want all the gold for yourself!" The old man moved with surprising speed to the family shrine. “You don't want to share it with your poor old dad!" he said.
The magistrate hurried to stop his father. The old man lifted his cane and pushed it against his son's chest. The magistrate stumbled backward and fell on his bottom.  
Laughter erupted from the family shrine. Were the ancestors mocking him? The magistrate wondered. In shock, he looked at the paintings of his grandfather, great-grandfather, and great-great-grandfather. The fat one was holding his stomach and bouncing with laughter. The skinny one threw his head back, chuckling. The one with the long beard was slapping his knee with glee.
The magistrate's father cradled a gold yuanbao that he had just taken from the shrine. The old man struggled to carry it and use his cane. He stumbled. Did an unseen hand give him a push? The old man fell head first into the big, magical clay ding. The gold yuanbao clattered onto the floor. The ancestors in the paintings cackled with triumph. The magistrate didn't rush to see if his father was all right. Instead, he rubbed his face with his hands and groaned. He knew what was going to happen. His mouth flapped open in dismay as his life got worse before his eyes.
His smiling father stepped out of the huge pot, swinging his cane and doing a happy dance. Then another father stepped out, tossing his cane in the air and catching it with one hand. More and more dancing fathers rose from the pot.  Each one was identical to the others.
“Which one of you is my father?" cried the magistrate.
“Me!” all ten fathers answered in a chorus.
                    Question
  If there were ten of you, what would you do?
   
                    Answer  
       Q: How do channels stop rivers from flooding?
A: When there is too much water, some of the water flows into  the channels.

Nuwa Makes People
                     Part 1
Motherhood. People say it’s the most important job in the world. If that’s true, then I’m the most worker ever! I'm the biggest of the big mamas! You may have heard my story. “Poor Nuwa," people say. “She was lonely. She was the biggest thing on Earth, but only had animals to keep her company."
“She didn't speak the animal languages. They didn't speak her language. She had no one who could laugh at her jokes, tell her that she was having a good hair day, or oil the scales on her tail."  
Yes, I have long black hair and a curving tail of green-gold scales instead of legs. So people are right about some things. But they are wrong when they say my life was very lonely. It wasn't so bad. Those people don't know. They weren't there with me at the beginning of everything.
The first thing I did was to try to teach my language to the birds. My method was "I say, you say." I'd say a word, then gesture at the birds and wait for them to repeat it. "Apple," I would say. The hummingbirds flitted in confusion. The pigeons nodded knowingly but refused to do anything other than waddle around looking for food. The teacher's pets-my favorites- were the parrots, of course. “Apple!" they repeated. “Nice hair!" and “Hello!"
One day I followed some small birds to the muddy bank of a river. They swooped down to the clay, picking it up in their beaks. Then they flew to an overhanging cliff and built nests from the clay. Watching them gave me an idea. I dug my fingers in the golden mud. I know some people don't like to get their hands dirty. That's not me. I like mud. I like clay mud the best. It's fun to play with, it's soft on my tail, and it's good for my skin. It keeps me looking young. Well, that and being a goddess. Those are my beauty secrets.
I scooped up a handful of mud. I squished it between my fingers and started to roll it into a ball. A part of the ball wiggled out. I smoothed it to make a perfectly round ball. I bounced it from palm to palm, just paying still, I couldn't get it to stay in a ball. First one, then two long drips of clay hung down from the ball. I tugged on them and heard laughter!
I cradled the mud in my hands then bounced it from palm to palm again. Two more drips appeared in the clay. These two were shorter than the others, but when I touched them, I heard laughter again! I held the mud up to my face. I breathed on it.
After breathing on the clay, I nearly dropped it, I was so surprised! There was a tiny face in the mud! There was a tiny body starting to take shape, and it looked like mine. Except for the tail. Instead of a tail like mine, it had two tails. Then each tail grew a foot. They weren't tails at all I decided to call them legs.
I gently rocked the clay back and forth in my hands, amazed to see a small person. "Hello," I said smiling. "Welcome to the world, little one."
The baby's mouth opened in a toothless smile. “Mama!"
My heart went squishier than the clay. I took care of the baby, talking to it and feeding it. It was lots of fun! Life had begun, and I held it in my arms!
I finally had to set the baby down. The baby's little teeth were coming in. I looked for a smooth stick for the baby to chew on. Found one! But when I looked back, the baby was a toddler. And the toddler was eating sand. "No, no, no!" I said, cleaning sand from the toddler's mouth.
                         Question  
Many cultures around the world have stories that say people were first made of clay or dirt. Why do you think this is so?
 
                   Part 2
My baby became a child and started to walk. My child loved to play in the mud! “Mommy!" it said, now missing a couple of front teeth." I want to be just like you!" My child hugged me around the tail. In the time it took me to bend down and hug my child back, my child had changed again. “Stop hugging, it's embarrassing!" said my child, wiggling out of my arms. My child was getting taller. In fact, my child was mostly arms and legs!
"Mom," my child said, sounding impatient. "Did you forget to make other teens? It's so boring here! Who am I supposed to hang out with?"
I scooped more clay and got to work. Looking up from rolling a ball of clay, I saw that my child had changed again. “‘Mother," said my child, now a grown-up. ‘I've figured out the mystery of life. Come here. I’ll whisper the mystery of life in your ear!"
By the time I had lowered my ear, my child had turned to clay and gone silent. My tears fell on the clay.
I had to be faster at making babies. Rolling and shaping clay was too slow. I couldn't make one baby at a time and watch it grow and die before there was time to make another. It was too lonely and too heart-wrenching. I hadn't been lonely before. But now that I had lost a baby, I knew loneliness. I missed loving someone.
I needed to get busy! Something that would take my mind off missing my baby and give me a purpose. I needed a modern method of making babies. No more making babies by hand, it was too old-fashioned and slow. I took a willow branch and dipped it in the clay. Then I danced around, flicking the clay off the willow branch. It was much faster, and I got some exercise!
I made many, many clay babies by flicking clay. I loved the babies. I changed their diapers made out of leaves and kissed their boo- boos when they hurt themselves. You people think you're busy? Try being a mom to thousands!
Babies, I loved ya! But I had no time to myself! I didn't even have time to take a relaxing bath. Someone always needed something or was getting in trouble. I needed to make some parents. I added new ingredients to the clay. To make men, I added yang. For women, I added yin. I told these new people about making babies. I said, "Watch what you breathe on. That's how I became a mother the first time! And don't put willow branches in mud and go dancing-unless you're ready to be a parent. I made LOTS of babies that way. I'm just telling you!"
With these new yin and yang people making and taking care of the little ones, I could have a bath by myself at last. I slipped into the soft waters of the South Sea. My babies lived their lives, laughing and fighting onshore. I became a grandma, then a great-grandma, and now there are too many greats added to grandma to count!
                      Question  
What does this story have to say about the different stages of human life? What do you think about the different stages?
                     
                 Nuwa Fixes the Sky
                      Part l
I was relaxing by the South Sea, taking a well-deserved snooze. I was dreaming of my babies growing and laughing. In other words, I was dreaming of all of you. I made you after all, when I made people. You can call me Mama Nuwa, if you want. I heard my babies calling, “Mama Nuwa! Mama Nuwa!" I smiled and turned over in the sand without waking up. Unlike people, I have a long tail like a snake, so I'm very graceful. I have no feet to trip over!
I heard people calling me again and peeked open one eye. What on earth was going on? The heavens were sagging and there was a hole in the north sky! Wind and terrible things were falling out of the hole! What a mess! My people gathered around me to tell me what had happened. Apparently, I had slept through a war. (I'm a very sound sleeper.)
I tall started with a very troublesome fellow, Zhuan Xu, the Emperor of the North. He was one of the Emperors of Heaven. But he wasn't happy being just one of the emperors, he wanted to be the only emperor. He wanted everything in heaven to be his. Zhuan Xu sometimes acted like his brain was frozen, he made such bad decisions. But what he lacked in good decision-making, he made up for in muscles, size, and a bad attitude!
One day, he stopped the sun and fixed it to the sky in the north. He liked that! Now the sun would shine only on him. He grinned, and the sun shone on his shiny teeth, blinding some birds flying by. People in the north could no longer look at the sky. The sun's brightness hurt their eyes. So they looked down all the time. Zhuan Xu stood taller and felt respected when he saw their downcast faces. He told himself he was the most important emperor in the heaven!
Soon, Zhuan Xu decided to also fix the stars and the moon to the north sky. The sky became very busy.
Shooting stars bumped into each other. The moon could barely be seen due to the brightness of the sun.  The northern lands were too hot while everywhere else on Earth was dark and cold.
Then Zhuan Xu and his army of the north started attacking other lands. One of the lands he attacked belonged to Gong Gong, the Southern Water God. Gong Gong was also big He had bulging muscles, and just as little sense as Zhuan Xu. Gong Gong got fighting mad! He and his army of the south fought back fiercely. The two armies battled each other across China. Gong Gong pushed toward Zhuan Xu's headquarters at Bu Zhou Mountain. Under the heat of the ever-present sun, moon, and stars, they slashed and hit, kicked and bit. Finally, Gong Gong and his soldiers began to weaken. The strength of Zhuan Xu and his army near their headquarters was too much. What could Gong Gong do?
                        Question
  What do you think Gong Gong will do?
      
                     Part 2
      Gong Gong was so mad! He rammed himself into Bu Zhou Mountain, headfirst. He destroyed his enemy's headquarters! But he destroyed himself, too. Gong Gong died. The mountain shook. Rocks flew off in all directions. Then the mountain crumbled! As it crumbled, the mountain tore a hole in the sky!
        Because they had very little sense, neither Gong Gong nor Zhuan Xu had thought about what might happen if they destroyed the mountain. Bu Zhou Mountain held up the sky on one side. With the mountain gone, the sky started to fall and monsters came flying through the hole in the sky. They were hungry monsters looking for snacks! A black dragon unleashed a flood. Giant fires sparked to life, burning forests and homes. The sun, moon, and stars flew around,
lost.
        That's when the people - my babies - woke me up from my nap. I got busy! I had to save my babies! I gathered rocks of all colors and melted them in the fires. Melted rocks are super sticky, not to mention hot-volcano-burning-hot! They're a real mess to clean up, but perfect to make a patch for the sky Fortunately, I'm a goddess, so I don't burn easily.
      I stuck the colorful, melted rocks in the hole in the sky. I used a bit of cloud to bind the rocks and the sky together. Have you heard that sometimes the best inventions happen by accident? The sunlight on the colorful patch made the world's first rainbow! The sight of it gave my people hope while they ran from monsters and tried to escape fires and floods.
        However, the sky was still sagging like a tent without tent poles. I had to find a solution fast! I dove into the ocean and got legs from a monstrously big turtle. One by one, I propped up the four corners of the sky with the turtle's mighty legs. Nothing could make them crumble! I showed the sun, moon, and stars to their proper places. My people cheered!
       I was beginning to tire, so I only subdued Zhuan Xu, beheaded the black dragon that was making the flood, after fierce fisticuffs - which is an old-fashioned way of saying a big fight - I am old, you know, used the ashes from the fires to stop the flooding by making little hills, and defeated the monsters, after more fisticuffs.
      My people put out the fires! I was so proud of them! My babies have a lot of promise, I'm telling you! All of you can do great things when you work together and work hard!
As for me? I's time for another snooze.
                   Question 
Look around the room. If they were bigger, what things could you use to prop up the sky?
         
                 Hua Mulan, Hua Hu  
                     Part l
The house creaked as I tiptoed to the door. I stood still and silently begged it to keep my secret. Another step, another creak, Would my parents wake up? I grabbed my dark blue robe. I had woven it myself only a few weeks before. I slipped it over my father's armor and under my feet to quiet my steps. Then I shuffled to the door.
“Mulan?" my father sleepily asked from behind the door.
I wondered when I would next answer to that name. "Yes, it's just me," I said.
"Go back to bed," he murmured. 
I said nothing. I stood still, my feet pointed toward the front door. I knew I was doing the right thing, didn't I? Then why did I feel so guilty'?
My heart thumped, Loud footsteps and loud heart--clearly, I was not made for a life of' secrets. I told myself it didn't matter what I was made for, I had to honor and protect my father, I had to take his place in the army,
"Father? Mother?" I said gently.
"What is it?" asked my father,
"There's something I have to tell you before I go," I answered. 
 "Go where?" asked my mother.  
"Are you all right?" My parents got up and reached for me, enfolding me in their arms.
I'm going to join the army, To protect us. To protect China, I have to be the one to go." My voice sounded firm and sure. I didn't want my parents to know that I was afraid. I didn't know if I could be brave like my father had been when he was a soldier.
"You are a great rider." he said, grasping my hands.
"I always wondered why you wanted to beam to use a sword," said my mother. "Noes l know. You were getting ready for a future we couldn’t see" She touched my cheek and murmured something before I could see her cry.
The night hung around me like a dark, freshly-woven cloth as l left the house.
I said goodbye to my old horse, petting her on the nose and giving her a pear to eat. She had taught me to ride, but now she was too old for war.
“Come on, Yongshun!" I whispered to my new horse. He didn't need any encouragement. He whinnied loudly and pawed at the dirt as I untied him. “Ssssh," I whispered, petting his mane as I slipped the saddle on him. He leaned over and licked me from my chin to the top of' my head, wiped the wetness of' my nose,
“Thanks for the bath, Yongshun. I like you too, but yuck!" To keep him from giving me another lick, I let him have a pea to eat. He downed it in two bites!
I climbed into the saddle and adjusted my father's heavy sword at my side. With a nudge of my foot, Yongshun trotted out of the barn and up the dark mountainside. The sliver of a moon shone like silver on the grasses as we headed toward the borderlands. Yongshun moved faster as we drew closer to war. He didn't share the nervousness I felt.
Daylight shone over the Great Wall as we continued north. I tightened my armor and adjusted my tunic. Yongshun's long legs stretched into a run. My nerves calmed as something stretched inside me too. I no longer walked with a girl's short steps but could move across the mountains with a stride to match the Wall! I let the wind take my womanly robe, and I captured my hair into a topknot like my father's. I saw my flat, tall shadow and giggled. Giggled like a little girl because I no longer looked like a girl. I was a man!
                       Question  
 Some people say Hua Mulan was a real person. Others say someone made up her story long ago. Which opinion do you agree with and why?
    
                    Part 2
The yellow River stretched below me like a golden brown thread pulled into a loom. I was someone new, as yet unnamed. Yesterday, I was Hua Mulan, a girl weaving cloth to sell at the market. I had trouble making the cloth. The lines of thread kept getting tangled and breaking. My weaving had been no more ordered than my mind, which was going back and forth trying to find the right way.
Two days before I had seen the lists of men's names called to war. Every list I had read had my father's name. "My father is too old and sick! My brother is too young and too little!" had cried, I was not too old or too young. But everyone would say l was wrong. Only men could become soldiers. Once I had decided to become a soldier though, I knew I was right.
I went to four different markets yesterday. I bought a sturdy horse at the East Market. No one knew me there, so it was easy. No one asked questions. I named him Yongshun. He had been born in the mountains with strong hooves. His coat was the shiny brown of good mud. His teeth were healthy and just a bit buck-toothed, which made him look like he was laughing.
"He's got a brave, obedient nature," said the man who sold him to me. Yongshun whinnied and almost pushed me over with his big head. Then he licked the top of my head. "'Oh, really?" I said.
At the West Market, I quickly bought a saddle. Then I went to the North Market. My neighbors shopped and worked at the North Market. It took a long time to buy a bridle.
"How's your father?" one shopper asked. "Is he feeling better?"
Another asked the usual questions. "When do you think you’ll marry? You're getting older! Are there any young men you like?"
"Do you have any cloth to sell me today, Hua Mulan?” asked a seller.
I finally paid too much for a bridle from one of my neighbors. "This will help your horse to be brave and obedient," she said, smiling.
 “Oh, really?" I said.
I bought a long whip at the South Market. The seller advised me. “Be gentle with it and your horse will be-"
“Brave and obedient," I finished for him.
He smiled. "Yes, that's right!"
After saying goodbye to my parents, I headed into the mountains on Yongshun. I traveled for several weeks to reach the war The sky draped over me like a soft woven blanket as I slept each night. Yongshun and I crossed the Black Mountains, where he whinnied to the herds of wild horses running in the grasslands.
At last, I saw the tents of the army. I tightened my topknot and adjusted my armor. I checked my appearance. Dirty. I gave myself the sniff test. I smelled like a horse. If I were trying to pass as a horse, I would be OK! Would I pass as a man? I felt manly. What did that even mean? I wasn't sure, but I knew I felt strong.
I arrived at the army camp and checked in with my father's name. Now I was Hua Hu, not Hua Mulan. No one really noticed me. I wondered, is this all that it takes to honor my father? Is this all that it takes to be a soldier? Is this all that it takes to become brave?
I would learn there was more to it. I fought alongside my fellow soldiers in battle after battle. Experiencing the dark pain of war for years taught me things. Some of them I did not want to learn. Each time, I had to conquer my fear before I could conquer my enemy.
As time passed, I would often forget that I was different from the men I fought with. The strength of my arms, my sharp sight, the way I drew my breath in and spurred my horse forward when he wanted to run in fear in the other direction - these things were important. My secret didn't matter, I thought.
                    Question
Why did Mulan go to four different markets to buy the items she needed for her journey?
1. She wanted to say goodbye to everyone.
2. None of the markets had everything she needed for her journey.
3. She wanted to sell cloth at all four markets.
4. She didn't want people to know she was leaving.
     
                Part 3
One red morning, the soldiers and I looked across the mountain paths. We watched the enemy move closer. They hurried northward to the grasslands where we waited. Lines of them rode along the mountain paths, eager to fight. I was not eager. They had more soldiers than we did. How could we stop them all?
My fellow soldiers sharpened their swords, gave water to their horses, and sung songs to keep fear away. “How do you think we can win, Hua Hu?" asked a general. I turned. My father's name had become as natural to me as the name I had been born with, Hua Mulan.
I considered the genera's question. There were many lines of enemies moving toward us. They moved quickly on the narrow mountain paths. In a flash, I remembered seeing lines like these before. The threads in the loom! I shared my battle plan with the general, pulling apart the sash I wore to show him the cloth's weave as a way to explain the idea.
The general split our army's main group of soldiers into two. One group went southwest. I joined the group that went southeast. I was impatient to begin battle and impatient for it to be over with! I hoped my idea would work!
We hiked and rode over the steep mountains on our way to outflank the Rouran Army. There were no paths to ease our way. A few horses broke their legs on the rocky ground. Some soldiers were knocked off their horses' backs. Yongshun and I pressed onward. He had become battle-hardened and surefooted. He did not try to turn back.
It took a long time for our army to outflank the enemy. They continued moving forward. We finally enclosed them on both sides.
Attacking with swords and lances, our soldiers wove themselves into the Rouran's army lines and cut them down. The two armies were like opposing threads weaving together on a loom.
I swung my sword and missed. Then I rode out of the mountain path, turned, and charged back- like a line weaving through the lines! I jabbed and swung my sword.
My enemies fell, staining the mountain red. Yongshun and I wove in and out of the lines of Rouran soldiers on the mountain paths. Our army broke their lines! The enemy soldiers scattered! My secret, the life I had led as a girl, had helped us to victory!
After more than ten years at war, we were called before the Emperor. My time as a soldier was over. He honored me for my service to China. Then he offered me a job as a government official. I thanked him but said no.
I only wanted Yongshun, my fast, brave, obedient horse, to bring me back to my family. But before leaving the Emperor's city, I bought new clothes. When I returned to the spot where the Yellow River meets the Great Wall, I took off my heavy armor. I bathed in the river. I put on clothes for the girl I once was and the woman warrior I would always be. Then I swung onto Yongshun's back, following the Wall along the mountain ridge.
As if knowing my mood, Yongshun stretched out into a run.  Was it only the clothes that made me feel free? Or was it that I knew I would always move across mountains with a stride to match the Wall?
“Father!" I cried when I reached home. " Mother!" My family welcomed me with hugs and smiles.
“Mulan!" They cried. My name sounded like my own once again.
                      Question
This story comes from the ancient folksong, “The Ballad of Mulan." At its end, the singer explains that boy rabbits like to hop and girl rabbits have soft eyes. But when the rabbits run together, no one can tell the boy from the girl. What does this observation about rabbits have to do with the story of Mulan?
 
                The Long-Haired Girl
                       Part l
Xiao Shui balanced the bamboo pole on her aching shoulders. It stuck out on either side, making her feel even smaller than her twelve years. The pole bumped into the hair of the banyan tree as she walked to the main trunk. The water sloshed in the buckets hanging on the pole and spilled on her feet. “No!" she cried. 
The banyan tree's strands of hair were actually hanging roots. But Xiao Shui thought that the tree was like her, with long, thick hair that reached to the ground.
There had been no rain for a year, and the banyan's roots were whitish-gray from lack of water. So, Xiao Shui took water to the tree every day. She poured the water at the base of the trunk. "Be well, Grandfather Banyan," she said.
As she hiked back to her mountain farm, she passed dry fields of rice turned to straw. "Hey, pigs," she said, walking by their dusty pen. The pigs rushed to the fence, their curly tails wagging“Water for you!" She opened the gate and a piglet ran toward the pigweed field!
“Get back here, naughty pig! I'm going to call you Rourou from now on!" She chased him up and down the mountain.
Rourou finally stopped to eat a small turnip, and she grabbed him. She looked around to see where they were. She noticed bright green leaves around her." For a plant to be that green, there must be water," she thought aloud. She ducked underneath the leaves something pink shone at the center of the plant. Another piglet?
Rourou trotted over and bit it. The pink thing was a turnip even bigger than Rourou!
Xiao grabbed ahold of the turnip and pulled. Water poured from its base. As she leaned in for a drink, the turnip popped back into its hole, taking the water with it.
Xiao yanked. The turnip popped out of its hole again, like a stopper pulled from a bathtub. Water filled the hole. Xiao and Rourou started to drink. The turnip snapped back into its hole.
“Aaaahhh, that's better!" growled a low voice. "My water."
Xiao kicked the turnip. "You… you... vegetable! This water's for everyone and everything on this mountain!" She wrapped her long hair around the turnip like a rope and pulled. The water poured out.
Suddenly, a giant mountain god appeared before Xiao wearing a bathrobe and a big frown. He squinted his tiny eyes and stomped his feet. " Who dares disturb my bath!"
Xiao had never been scared of anyone in a bathrobe before!
"Why are a hairy child and a pink child causing this trouble?" asked the god, pointing at Xiao and the pink pig.
Xiao thought quickly. "This side of the mountain-your mountain- is dying. You don't leave the bath, so you don't know."
 “I know you must leave my bath stopper where it belongs." The god sat on the turnip and patted it.
Rourou trotted over to the mountain god, oinking. "I like the pink child better than the hairy child," said the mountain god. He curled a long finger at Xiao. “You have a choice to make. You can take water from my bath once a day. Enough for a bucket the size of this delightful pink child. Tell no one."
"What's my other choice?"
He sighed loudly, "My, but I wish children were smarter. I thought it was obvious. If you choose to tell, I will kill you."
Xiao got very angry. "You have a choice too!" she yelled. "Give us our water!" Her mind searched for an idea. “Or...or.. .I won't tell you about what the other god is doing!" she lied.
She grabbed Rourou and ran before the mountain god could ask questions. She didn't know any other gods, but the mountain god almost never left his cave. Maybe she could scare him into sharing the water?
The next day, she returned to the turnip. "The other god says you have to share your water," she lied as she filled her bucket . “Or else." “What do I care?" The mountain god sang loudly in response. "I farted in the tub today, today, today!"
Xiao thought about the choice she had to make. Could she take a little water to the people in her village? They had cared and loved for her when her mother died. But she knew that she would tell them the secret. Then she would die. Instead, she cut herself off from the people she loved.
During one of her visits to the turnip, the mountain god said to Xiao, “Your hair is turning white, child. Probably from stress. Too bad you don't have the wisdom of age ... Just the worry and the hair."
Xiao yelled, “The other god says if you don't share the water, thieves will eat your turnip! Your tub will become a river! And the other god is more powerful than you!"
 “Impossible!" he roared, shaking the mountain.
                    Question
Do you think the mountain god was rude to the girl? What did he do that was rude?
                          Part 2
Xiao and Rourou ran toward the village. As she passed by the banyan tree, she saw a bald old man struggling to carry a jar of water.
“Let me help you, Grandfather," she said.
“Thank you," he answered. "I've been walking all day to get this jar of water."
Then he stumbled. The jar broke. The water spilled. Xiao and the other villagers helped him up. 
And that's when Xiao made up her mind to tell the villagers about the water at the turnip. She yelled to the gathering crowd. "I know a place where there's enough water for everyone! Bring your sickles. Bring your hoes. We have a turnip to harvest!"
The villagers followed Xiao up the mountain. As they neared the turnip, Xiao turned to them. "Look under that turnip! There's all the water we need!"
They stabbed and cut the turnip into little pieces. Water poured out! Everyone raced to drink their fill.
A whirlpool formed where the turnip had been. It yanked Xiao's legs out from under her and pulled her into the cave. Xiao blinked her eyes in the darkness. She saw that the god's bath had turned into a river as it raced out to quench the thirst of the village.
“Are you going to kill me?" Xiao asked.
“You made your choice. You told my secret. You didn't bring the cute pink one." The god wiggled his pinky finger like Rourou's tail. “I should kill you. I promised."
"You don't have to keep your promise."
He shook his finger at Xiao. "You didn't keep your promise! You told everyone about my bath. About my turnip. You don't care about right and wrong!"
She lied again. "'I tried to warn you. The other god said this would happen."
 “Did he say that you would stand below the new river's waterfall forever?" he snorted. "Because you didn't keep your promise?"
Xiao's skin went icy at the thought of being trapped under the waterfall until she died. "I have to ask someone to take care of the little pink one. I'll say goodbye and come back tomorrow."
“Know this," roared the mountain god. "If you don't come back, I will kill the villagers." He rubbed his chin, deep in thought. "But I will let the pink one live. I like pink."
Xiao leaped in the river and swam out of the cave. She tumbled over the waterfall, swam to the riverbank, and ran home.
She told the villagers she was going on a journey and said goodbye.  Another lie, but Xiao knew it was better than the truth.
Xiao stopped by the banyan tree to say goodbye. She smiled to see that its long hair was brown again. New leaves were sprouting.
 “I'm looking fine and feeling fit! Thank you for the water during the dry days, Xiao Shui." She looked around in surprise. An old man with a gray-green beard as long as Xiao's hair peeked out from behind the banyan.
 “Come see what I made for you." He led Xiao into a hollow tree trunk. "It's me!" she cried when she saw the life-size statue. "But carved of stone ...and bald?"
He rubbed his own bald head. "I've never been good at sculpting hair."  Xiao was amazed. “This gift. Can you put it under the waterfall?"
"You got it!" he laughed. "But I need a gift from you first."
“My hair?" Xiao asked, her voice worried.
"Yes. Now close your eyes." Xiao closed her eyes and held her breath. Something tickled her head! "Open your eyes," he said.
Xiao saw her white hair on the statue in front of her! Amazing, but was she now bald? She looked into the river and saw her reflection. Her long black hair was back!
“Thank you, Banyan Grandfather!" She turned toward him, but he was gone.
A moment later, his voice trilled from the center of the tree. "The Xiao Shui statue is under the waterfall at the top of the mountain. Your white hair flows like rushing water, and the god is fooled. You and everyone on this mountain are safe. He says he wants the pink child to visit him every day.
 “Thank you, Banyan Grandfather! Thank you!"
 “Go on home now but come visit me again."
" will I will!” she promised, telling the truth this time.
                       Question
Is a lie ever good? Think about the lies in the story and lies in real life to form your opinion.
                     Answers
Q: Why did Mulan go to four different markets to buy the items she needed for her journey?
A: She didn't want people to know she was leaving.
                      The White Snake 
                          Part 1
      My skin had changed every year for a thousand years. But it had never changed into the skin I wanted. I wanted to be human.
“Hey, Suzhen, we're like Nuwa,  the Mother of Everyone," said Xiao Qing. "We hug the earth when we move. No clumsy feet for us!" 
      "I don't want to be a snake any longer," I told her. "I want to walk and ..." my voice grew hesitant. 
Xiao Qing laughed, her fangs shining as she smiled. "You want to hug more than the earth, I know it!"
I blushed and looked down, saying nothing. I wanted to speak from my heart and tell Xiao Qing that yes, I wanted to hug someone I loved. I wanted to hold a baby in my arms. But straight talk, well, that's not my way.
I was made to wind down any path or wind around any thought. A little left, a little right, a little wrong. I wasn't born to be good. I was hatched. I am Bai Suzhen, a snake demon! But I tried to be good. Wanted to be good. I studied medicine and magic because I hoped to help people. I also learned to change my shape. I often wondered, if I changed my shape, could I change into someone good? "Sister," I said to my best friend Xiao Qing, a gleaming green snake. "Who should we become today?" "How about changing into hawks?" she suggested. "We'd get to fly, and I'd like a chicken dinner."
I shook my head and my tail back and forth.
"You're right, hawks can't hug," she teased me. "How about monkeys, sister? We can swing through the trees looking for other monkeys to hug!" She lifted her bright green head, dancing and swaying. Then she stuck her tongue out at me! Xiao Qing hatched when I was two hundred years old, and since that time she had been like a little sister to me.
I coiled into a circle. "We've practiced enough with animals, I think. Let's try to change into humans."
From our home on the celestial mountain, we descended to Hangzhou. We shed our snake skins near Leifeng Pagoda, on the shore of West Lake. Our tails became feet and legs, arms and hands, bodies and heads.
 Xiao Qing haltingly walked toward a clothesline and grabbed a silk green dress. "Isn't it beautiful?" she said, holding it in front of her. I nodded. Xiao Qing made a stunning human, with black, flowing hair like a wave down her back.
A white dress embroidered with white peonies caught my eye. The silk danced in the breeze, curling as though it were alive. I forgot about human ideas of good and bad. I pulled the dress off the line and put it on.
My body felt as though it had always been mine. "Let's walk by the lake," I said to Xiao Qing. “I want to feel the breeze off the water." As we walked across the Broken Bridge, a light rain began to fall.
 “Let's return to our cozy snake hole," said Xiao Qing. "It's too wet."
A man walked up to us on the rainy shore of West Lake.
“Please take my umbrella, ladies,"  he said, smiling.
As a snake, I had only ever seen human feet. I was too close to the ground to see anything else. The man stood in front of me, and I was dazzled. The rain sparkled on his eyelashes. He was breathtakingly handsome. I couldn't speak.
“What do you think, dear?" Xiao Qing prodded me. "Shall we take this gentleman up on his offer?"
I didn't say anything.
“The umbrella?" Xiao Qing added.
In a daze, I reached for the umbrella. When his hands touched mine, my heart beat fast. I heard him gasp. He held my hand a few moments longer. His smile grew wider. “Pardon me," he said. "I have never seen anyone as beautiful as you. Are you real?" he asked me.
I was too stunned to thank him for the compliment. "How will we return your umbrella to you?" I asked, lowering my eyes shyly and pulling my hand from his.
 “My name is Xu Xian," he answered. "I live near Leifeng Pagoda, in the wooden house next to the pharmacy. You can visit me. I'd like that. Please do. I work with my sister and brother-in-law in the pharmacy."
“We'll return the umbrella tomorrow, kind sir," I said, the formal words sounding strange to my ears. I stopped myself from adding that we could fall in love.
                 Question
What is something that you couldn't do if you were a snake instead of a human?
               

              Part 2
Xiao Qing and I were busy the rest of the day. We found a house to live in. I could not stop thinking about Xu Xian.
We bought weird food for our human bodies. I was hungry for a mouse, but noodles would have to do. Everything was new and surprising. However, nothing compared to how I had felt when I met Xu Xian. That surprised me the most.
We went to his house the next day. I met his family, then Xu Xian, Xiao Qing, and I walked by the lake. At first, Xiao Qing was the only one to talk. I was too nervous. We stopped at the Broken Bridge and looked into the water. Gradually, we all began to talk more easily. We laughed and frowned at the same things. It was like we were old friends, except for the slow looks Xu Xian and I gave each other, and the way my heart pounded when he stood near me.
Over time, Xu Xian and I fell deeper in love. Falling in love was like sliding into West Lake. It was a shock at first, then we drowned in a love that surrounded us like water.
we got married. We lived with xiao Qing in a house by the lake and opened a pharmacy. Our medicines and magic cured people. I continued to try to be good. I healed the poor without payment I could be. I finally believed I was more human than demon. I finally believed that I was good. I didn't tell Xu Xian of my past. I didn't want to look back.
On Tomb-Sweeping Day, I found out I was pregnant. We were overjoyed! Xu Xian wanted to visit Jinshan Temple to ask for blessings on our family. He rowed Xiao Qing and me across the lake to enjoy the view while he visited the temple.
As Xu Xian returned to our boat, a Buddhist monk rushed toward him. He shook a metal staff at my sister and was the best wife and sister and me and yelled, "Demons!"
Xiao Qing and I grabbed the oars and rowed away as fast as we could! The monk grabbed Xu Xian. "Those two are snake demons!" he yelled at my husband." “They only look like beautiful women! They will steal your life and leave you with nothing! Already I see the signs of their evil on your face!"
Xu Xian defended us. "'No, my wife and her sister are good women. Leave us alone!" We rowed closer to the shore and Xu Xian jumped in the boat.
"I see they have bewitched you!" the monk shouted. “"Test them with Realgar wine at the next Dragon Boat Festival!"
The Dragon Boat Festival arrived too soon for me. I was very afraid! Everyone said that if hidden demons drank Realgar wine, they would transform into their real shapes. I wanted to stay a woman!
That night, Xu Xian gave me a kiss. Then he held out a small cup of wine for us both to drink. “To our love and happiness!" he said. I took a sip. Very small! It was barely a taste! The room started to spin. I couldn't walk. Xu Xian helped me into bed and went to make some tea.
My skin began to change. White scales appeared. My body stretched, becoming a snake.
Xu Xian opened the door. “"I love you!" I cried, but the only sound was hissing.
He screamed and fell to the floor. I slithered to him. He was still and becoming cold. I wrapped my snake's body around my husband, hugging him with my whole self, but he didn't move or speak.
Xiao Qing ran into the room. With her help, I was able to turn back into a woman. Together, we lifted him to the bed, but couldn't revive him. "I have to get the mushroom of life from Lingshan Mountain! It is the only thing that can save him!" I cried.
"I’ll go," offered Xiao Qing.“You're pregnant. It's too dangerous for you and your child!"
 “Thank you, but I have to go," I said, hurrying out the front door. "He is my husband."
 
                   Question
New scientific research shows that humans are born with a tendency to be afraid of snakes. Explain why this built-in fear may have developed.

          Part 3 
I turned back into a snake demon with a bit of magic, I flew on a fast-moving cloud to Lingshan Mountain. I had to get the mushroom of life to save my husband! I knew that no one was allowed to take a mushroom from the mountain, but that didn't stop me.
A cool wind chilled me as I arrived at the mountain. Then a crane flew toward me, its powerful wings whipping up the wind. A deer ran at me, kicking. I hissed, showing my fangs. They circled around to get ready to attack again.
I flattened myself in the grass and darted forward, looking for the mushroom of life. With a scream, the crane dove at me! I turned back into a woman and jumped out of the way of its sharp beak. I saw the mushrooms growing on a nearby tree. "I need only one mushroom," I cried. "Please, my husband died!" I cradled my belly. "I am carrying our child. Please!"
 “Stop!" yelled a low voice.
The crane landed softly on the arm of the mountain god standing before me. The mountain god had shining white hair that seemed to be made of light.
“Star of Long Life," I greeted the god, bowing three times.
He pointed at the mushrooms.  I walked to the tree and picked a gold-colored mushroom from its trunk. I bowed again (you can never bow too much to a god). Then I rushed back home.
I put the mushroom in Xu Xian's mouth, and he came back to life! I hugged him and cried, telling him I loved him. He looked at me as though he didn't trust me anymore. "You were a white snake," he said to me. Xiao Qing and I both started talking at the same time, trying to convince him I hadn't been a snake. “You thought that snake was my sister?" said Xiao Qing, laughing. "I think the Realgar wine made you see crazy things!"
"I saw the snake too," I said quickly. “I killed it. You don't have to worry about it."
He shook his head slowly. He said nothing to either of us. The next day, he disappeared.
Xiao Qing and I looked for Xu Xian day after day. At last we thought of Jinshan Temple, where the monk had yelled at us. As we walked to the temple, the baby moved so much in my belly that it seemed to be walking with us.
Xu Xian rushed toward us when we arrived at the temple but was stopped by the monk." I didn't trust you, so I asked Abbot Fahai for help," my husband called to us. “And he's trapped me!"
Abbot Fahai held up a Buddhist staff and bowl as if they were weapons. "'You demons can't come here," he yelled at us.
“My wife and her sister are good!" Xu Xian argued. "It doesn't matter what they are! Let me go!"
Xiao Qing shook her fist. “You don't know who you're messing with! You and your temple will be sorry!"
                     Question
How can you tell that Xu Xian didn't believe Bai Suzhen and Xiao Qing?
1. They gave different reasons for him seeing the snake.
2. He trusted Abbot Fahai when the monk warned him about Bai Suzhen and Xiao Qing.
3. He shook his head slowly, said nothing, and then disappeared the next day.
4. He wanted Bai Suzhen to drink Realgar wine to test her.

                  Part 4
Abbot Fahai seemed stunned by my sister's threats. Then he became so angry that his bald head turned as red as his robes. He threw himself at us, metal staff raised. My sister spun in a circle, like a snake uncoiling. She moved in front of me to block Abbot Fahai. "Aha!" yelled Abbot Fai. “The women show their true nature! Snake demons!" He twirled his Buddhist staff and hit it on the bowl. Then he jabbed it at Xiao Qing. She twisted away.
I pulled a golden hairpin from my long hair. I waved it through the air, pulling the wind and water to the temple. The lake rose, flooding the steps of Jinshan Temple. There was a deafening clapping sound. An army of crab soldiers advanced, heading for Abbot Fahai!
The monk threw his outer robe on the roof of the temple. The magical robe made the temple float safely on the rising water. The crab soldiers slipped back into the water. It was over, and we had lost. Xiao Qing and I ran to the Broken Bridge.
I started to cry. Xu Xian would never return to me now! He wanted a regular wife. A regular wife makes crab dumplings. A regular wife doesn't attack a temple with crab soldiers! But all I wanted was to love and be loved.
I looked up to see Xu Xian running across the bridge.
“You've got some nerve," called Xiao Qing. “You're not hiding an angry, red-faced monk somewhere, are you?"
He knelt before us. "I'm sorry."
“You know who I am," I answered. "I was made a snake demon. But am I only what I was made to be? I am a good woman, a good wife, a good maker of medicines. And I will be a good mother to our child, with or without you."
"Please forgive me," he cried. “I was wrong. I love who you are." He took my and Xiao Qing's hands. We walked around the banks of the lake. By the time we reached our home, we had forgiven Xu Xian.
The three of us soon became the four of us. I gave birth to a baby boy! I thought he might have a tail, but he was entirely human. We had a party one month after our baby was born. I was resting in the bedroom during the party when I heard Abbot Fahai at our front door.
 “She is a snake demon!" hissed Abbot Fahai. “They are no good! They will kill you!"
"Leave us alone," said my husband. "I know my wife, and I love her as she is." I heard them struggling, then the door to the bedroom burst open.
Abbot Fahai held a Buddhist bowl in the air above his head. There was a force coming from the bowl that drew me to it. I was pulled closer and closer.
“Xiao Qing!" I called, “Strengthen your magic and return to fight him! Free me!" Then I was pulled into the bowl and trapped.
Abbot Fahai buried the bowl with me in it underneath Leifeng pagoda. I pounded and kicked at the bowl, tried magic spells, but nothing worked.
After that, Xiao Qing studied magic and martial arts for l8 years, then returned to fight Abbot Fahai at the pagoda. From inside the bowl, I heard yelling, crashes, and fighting. At last I heard Xiao Qing's triumphant cry. I learned later that Abbot Fahai hid behind a crab's shell for the rest of his life.
At last, there was a deafening crash. Xiao Qing had used her sword and magic to knock over Leifeng Pagoda! I ran out of the bowl. I was free! My sister and I returned to our home with Xu Xian and our son. At last we could become a good, regular family. And we did!
                    Question
How could someone who was made to be bad become good?
 

Butterflies and Love
Part l
Last one to the bridge is a rotten egg!" I tapped my new classmate Liang Shanbo on the shoulder and took off running.
"I smell rotten egg!" he laughed, catching up to me as we neared the river.
“It's you that smells like a rotten egg!" I yelled, glancing sideways at Liang Shanbo.
Then he passed me! No way! He tapped the handrail of the bridge when he reached it first. Laughing, he stuck out his foot, pretending to want to trip me.
“You stink!” I yelled, falling into him.
"No, you stink!" he laughed, pushing me off him and holding his nose. "You're the rotten egg!" He pretended to crack an egg on top of my head.
I pushed him. We play-fought and then fell to the ground laughing. I looked at a pair of butterflies fitting overhead. While we watched them, Liang Shanbo turned to me, suddenly serious.
"Do you have a best friend?" he asked.
"No," I answered." I don't know anyone here but you."
"You want to be my best friend?" he asked me.
“Sure," I said, coolly. I didn't want to seem over-eager. But inside I jumped up and down with joy! Then I said, "Let's get some incense. We'll promise to be best friends forever."
We found unlit sticks of incense under the simple wooden altar in the pavilion. As we lit each other's incense sticks, the sweet smoke blended with the gathering fog. Then we placed the sticks into the sand of the altar.
 “Zhu Yingtai, I promise to be your best friend." He said.
"I promise to be your best friend, Liang Shanbo," I answered.
 “We'll always be brothers," he said.
I smiled at him, deciding it was OK to keep a secret from a friend. We kneeled together.
Then we touched our foreheads on the ground three times to honor the heaven and the earth.  
He smiled, and his eyes crinkled. "I promise to always beat you in foot races-"
"What?" I broke in. ”No way!" I tapped him and took off down the other side of the bridge. "Last one to the end of the bridge is a rotten egg!"
When I returned home from boarding school a few weeks later, my father said, “Make sure you work hard and do your best." "I'm getting high marks," I told him.
"And watch out for Liang Shanbo," he added.
"What do you mean, Father?" I asked.
“You have to be careful," he said. “Make sure your best friend doesn't become your worst enemy," he warned me.
“That could never happen!" I cried.
“No one can know our secret. You need to take my place as the head of the Zhu family," he said.
               Question
How can a friend become an enemy? Think about what Zhu Yingtai's father might be afraid of or remember something in your own life to answer the question.
       
                 Part 2
Liang Shanbo and I spent three years together, studying, laughing, running, and talking. We called each other "'my brother from another mother!"
After three years, Liang Shanbo had to go away to college. joined him in walking part of the way to his new town. "I will hide in your room!" I joked. "No one will notice me. I will be a worm, curled up in the corner."
Liang Shanbo laughed. "I know you don't take up much room," he said, putting his strong arm around my shoulder and giving it a squeeze. “But you're no worn in a corner, Zhu Yingtai, he said. you're a caterpillar, not a worm." He wiggled his fingers on his head like antennae. "Soon you’ll burst out and fly! You'll be magnificent. Be patient. You're not quite grown up enough to join me at college."
"My father won't let me go to college," I told him, sadly. "And what if I'm already grown? What if I'm already as magnificent as I can be? I already know what I want from life and who I want to spend it with!" I cried, tangling my sleeves in my fingers.
He didn't answer. His eyes shone golden in the light of the setting sun. I caught my breath and counted to ten to calm myself.
Avoiding his golden eyes, I handed him his going-away gift. "It's funny you should talk about butterflies," I said. I hoped, hoped, hoped he would like them.
"These are very beautiful!" he said, smiling. "I will hang these jade butterflies from my belt. They'll remind me of you! It will be like we are together."
“Only I'm a lot more talkative!" l joked.
He smiled and gave me a pat on the back. Then I opened my gift. It was a qin. I had thought it was impossible to distill our friendship into a gift. There were too many memories for on little gift to contain. But somehow, he had done it. I loved my gift! I played the qin for him then, the music telling him everything that I could not put into words. But had he really heard me?
 “I'll come visit you," he promised.“We promised to be best friends, remember? You'll always be a little brother to me."
"You should become my real brother”! I said, saying out loud what I had been thinking about for three years.
"Marry my sister You’ll be perfect together. She' just like me. Only she looks better in a dress!"
He laughed I'll visit you during the first break," he promised.
"you can introduce me!" Then he furrowed his brow and his mouth became a hard line. He shook his head and said, “But I'm not good enough for the great Zhu family, you know that."
I wanted to say that money and power were not important. I knew he was good enough for anyone and any family. But we both recognized the differences in our families. Instead of talking about them, I haltingly said goodbye. Then I hurried back to school.
The days at school seemed to pass by very slowly. The moment my school let out for the break, I raced home. My parents met me at the door before I had a chance to let myself in.
 “Yingtai!" My parents cried.
 “You're home at last! And guess what? We've solved the problem!" said my father.
 “Good!" I said. Then I asked,
 “What problem?"
My parents laughed. “You've been living with the secret so long," said my mother, shaking her head. "You've forgotten."
"You have to be a man to head the Zhu family," explained my father for the hundredth time since I was born.
“But you can't spend your life as a man," added my mother. “You were born a girl and now you are a woman."
"That's the problem," said my father. "But we've found a husband for you. You won't have to pretend to be a boy anymore. He lives far enough away. No one here will know you're a woman."
"But…"I stammered.
“When you're there, you can be a woman and someday a mother like me. You can live a normal life," said my mother. “If you lived here… your whole life you would worry about keeping it secret that you're really a woman."
"We had a dress made for you," my father said. He held up a red silk gown with butterfly sleeves. "For you to wear at your wedding." "Go try it on!" urged my smiling mother. She ushered me into the bedroom. After shooing away the maid, she helped me dress, chattering happily the whole time. I said nothing.
Suddenly I heard Liang Shanbo's deep voice calling hello. My eyes widened. A servant hurried to let him in the front gate.
                          Question
what would be difficult about living as a boy if the person were a girl?
                        
               Part 3
          
I smoothed the dress over my hips and lifted my chin. Why does wearing a beautiful dress feel powerful? I had loved Liang Shanbo as a girl. But now I loved him as a woman.
He stood in the doorway, tall and strong, the sunlight glinting off his dark hair. He was stunning. I had to catch my breath.
I walked toward him. "Liang Shanbo," I said. I gave up the idea of pretending to be my own sister. I was done pretending to be anyone other than who I was." I'm Zhu Yingtai."
He stood still. The only movements in the room were his eyes looking me up and down. "You're magnificent," he finally said quietly. He blushed. "I didn't know, little caterpillar." He reached out his hands to me. “Now you're butterfly."
My father and mother bustled into the room. “'Liang Shanbo," said my father sternly. "You must keep our secret. Keep it to honor your old friend Zhu Yingtai. She must seem to be a he."
 “Now say your goodbyes," said my mother. “Yingtai will be married soon, far away. Please don't destroy her future. Show us this respect, Liang Shanbo."
I hurried after Liang Shanbo as he headed to the door. My parents hung back. "Liang Shanbo," I cried, unable to say more. My eyes filled with tears.
“Our promise," he said, his eyes meeting mine. "I want to be with you forever." He took my hand in his, then pulled away. He pushed open the door and was gone.
My parents stopped me from following him.
I was torn. My head knew I should not disobey my parents and dishonor my family. Liang Shanbo was honorable. I had to behave honorably, too. But my heart- the part of me that I no longer owned, that would forever be Liang Shanbo's-knew I couldn't marry another, only Liang Shanbo.
After he left, I looked for him. I kept looking, but I couldn't find him. None of our classmates had news of Liang Shanbo. Where was he? Why wouldn't he try to be with me? Did he still love me? I decided he was staying away because he was planning to stop the wedding service. He would take me away with him before my wedding veil could be lifted by another. He would save me!
On the long journey to my wedding, I made sure we stopped at Liang Shanbo's town.
The bridge on the outskirts of town reminded me of the spot where Liang Shanbo and I promised to be best friends forever. I smiled. It was perfect. I knew he would come for me! Liang Shanbo and I would be together!
My parents told me they had news of him. I smiled expectantly.
"I'm so sorry," said my mother, taking my hand as I stepped out of the sedan chair. "Liang Shanbo got sick and died."
"No, no, no," I cried, sinking to my knees. "You're lying. It can't be."
"We agreed to bring you through Liang Shanbo's town. We wanted to
show you his tomb," said my father.“So you can say goodbye. It is here beside Hu Bridge."
I ran. My whole world narrowed to one bridge, one memory, one stone with one name. The name I didn't want to see. I screamed. My small world: one bridge, one memory, one stone with one name-cracked and broke. I threw myself inside all that was broken. Falling, falling, falling. My world became one memory, one stone with one name, all broken. Even me. I stopped falling. I broke. I died.
Above the one stone with one name, two butterflies flew.
                        Question 
 If Liang Shanbo and Zhu Yingtai lived in modern times, how would  this story be different?
           

        The Love of the Cloud Weaver
When the world was young, the sky was as soft as silk. Magpie birds soared and never wanted to land. Only Zhinu the cloud weaver did not feel at home in the sky. She watched the people far below and wove clouds that reached for the ground.
Zhinu and her sisters lived in the sky with their grandmother, the Queen Mother of the West. One night, there was a terrible storm. Zhinu looked down at a cozy farmhouse, wishing she were with the family inside. But not everyone was inside. She watched a young farmer and his old ox trying to stop the water from flooding the wheat fields.
The ox stumbled and sank in the mud. The farmer gently helped her up. He sang of the stars of the ox constellation as he led her to the barn.
He was interrupted by a shrill voice yelling from the farmhouse, “Hey, lazy Niulang, sleep in the barn tonight. Your brother and I don't want mud in the house!"
The next morning, Zhinu pulled on her dress made of the dawn's red clouds. She wanted to see the farmer again. "Let's go swimming," she suggested to her sisters.
“Grandmother won't like it," her sisters warned. But Zhinu convinced them. They grabbed their swimsuits and slid down the clouds to the ground. While the others jumped into the pond, zhinu tiptoed to the farmer's barn.
She heard the shrill voice again. “your brother and I have done our duty. I's time for you to go, Niulang. Your parents wanted you and your brother to split everything. So, we'll keep the farm. But you're lucky, you get the ox!"
Niulang said quietly, "Okay, she's my best friend."
Zhinu peeked through the doorway. The ox looked older than her grandmother! The ox turned toward Zhinu. Then Zhinu thought she heard the ox say, "Moo-marry her!"
Zhinu ran as fast as she could to the pond. She hung her dress over a tree branch and hid underwater. She thought of the farmer and the strange ox.
Soon, everyone was drying off and rising into the sky. But where was Zhinu's red dress? Without it, she couldn't return home with her sisters! Suddenly, Niulang appeared, carrying her dress. "Please marry me," he said. "I promise to be a good husband."
To her surprise, Zhinu said yes. Perhaps it was his shining eyes, so like the night sky. She felt at home with him. But Zhinu's grandmother wanted Zhinu home-in the sky.
For years, Zhinu and Niulang hid from her grandmother in their cozy farmhouse deep in the forest. Niulang would sing Zhinu to sleep with songs of the night sky. Zhinu would wake up Niulang by draping the trees with the colors of dawn.
One night, they were awakened by angry clouds beating against the sky. The wind howled. Niulang went outside as flood waters rose higher. Once again, he tried to save the wheat. The old ox sank in the mud and couldn't get up. She told Niulang to always keep her hide with him. Then she died.
The storm attacked. Soldiers took shape from dark clouds, grabbing, reaching. Deep in the storm, something struggled. It was like dawn on the brightest morning.
It was his love, his Zhinu. She was being dragged into the sky by her grandmother's soldiers!
Niulang shook out the ox's hide. He jumped on and took flight. He flew faster and faster after Zhinu "Wait for me!" Niulang called.
“Niulang, bring me home," Zhinu cried.
“No!" her grandmother yelled. She slashed the sky with her golden hairpin. Zhinu heard the sky ripping in two. Through the rip shone the stars of the Milky Way.
On one side of the rip was Zhinu, on the other Niulang.
Since that day, Zhinu and Niulang have been separated by the Milky Way. On the seventh day of the seventh month of the moon, magpie birds weave a bridge in the sky. Zhinu and Niulang meet in the middle of the bridge, together again.
On this day each year, everyone celebrates love, even Zhinu's grandmother. This day is known as Chinese Valentine's Day.
  
                    Answer
Q: How can you tell that Xu Xian didn't believe Bai Suzhen and Xiao Qing?
A: 3. He shook his head slowly, said nothing, and then disappeared the next day.
            
                 There's a Snake in My Cup
Long ago in China, a man named Yue Guang was a great host! He loved to throw dinner parties for his many friends. There was always plenty of food and plum wine.  
One day, Yue Guang invited his best friend Wong Jianguo over for dinner. They hadn't seen each other in quite some time. They laughed and talked while they ate. 
Yue Guang offered his friend a cup of wine. Jianguo noticed something dark in the wine. He looked closer. Was there a snake in the cup? It sure looked like it! He was scared! 
He didn't want to drink the wine. But he also didn't want to insult his host by not drinking the wine. He had to make himself drink the wine! He closed his eyes, so he wouldn't see the snake.
He lied to himself. "'It's chicken," he thought. “A piece of chicken fell in my wine." But he couldn't make himself drink.
He lifted his arm, trying to hide his face behind his sleeve. He pinched his nose. He drank the wine in one gulp! Oh! How horrible! He tried not to throw up. His friend would be very insulted if he threw up at dinner!
“Are you all right?" Yue Guang asked.
Jianguo stood up. “I'm not feeling well," he said. "Thank you for dinner!" He ran out of the house.
The next day, Yue Guang visited Jianguo. He was asleep in his bed.  A doctor paced back and forth across the room.
“Doctor, what's the matter with my friend?" asked Yue Guang. "I don't know!" replied the doctor. "It is all very confusing. He said that there was a snake in the cup of wine that he drank last night. But none of this medicine is working!"
At that moment, Jianguo woke up.  “Thank you so much for coming to see me!" said Jianguo. “"I am just feeling a little sick is all."
“Do you know why?" asked Yue Guang.
Jianguo hesitated. He finally said, “Last night there was a snake in my cup! I didn't want to be rude, so I didn't say anything. But I did drink the wine. And ever since then my stomach hasn't been happy."
“A snake?" said Yue Guang. “How could a snake have gotten into the cup?"
Yue Guang thanked the doctor for helping his friend. He went home to try to understand what had happened.
He walked around his courtyard, thinking. He thought and he thought. But he couldn't figure out an explanation. Then, he went into his bedroom. He thought and he thought. But he couldn't think of an explanation. The garden and the tearoom didn't help either.
Finally, he went into the dining room. He thought and he thought. He walked around the room. Suddenly, he noticed something. Behind Jianguo's seat there was a hunting bow on the wall.
That was it! His friend had seen a reflection of the bow in the wine! The bow's reflection looked like a snake!
He immediately invited Jianguo back to his house. Jianguo sat in the same place as the previous night. Yue Guang again gave him a cup of wine. Jianguo yelled in fright! There was another snake in his cup!
“Aren't we friends?" he yelled. “Why do you put snakes in my wine?"
"Turn around, Jianguo," said Yue Guang. Then Jianguo saw the bow on the wall. He moved around the room with the cup and peeked inside many times. At last he realized what had happened. His sickness immediately went away. It was a miracle cure!
The idiom “Mistaking the reflection of a bow for a snake" means to make yourself sick with worry over something small or imagined. This idiom is like the English phrase “To worry over nothing."
                   Question
Have you ever mistaken something for something else? Tell a friend about that experience.
   
     The Early Bird Catches the Worm

It was a beautiful spring day in a forest in ancient China. The air was crisp and fresh, and the sun was shining brightly. In the dense forest, tall trees stood side by side. The sun's rays hit the treetops and scattered through their branches.  They cast shadows of light and dark on the forest floor.
High up in a tree, a mother bird was resting in her nest. She had just hatched six baby birds, called nestlings. The nestlings were covered with soft fluffy down. They didn't have flight feathers yet, so they weren't ready to leave the nest.
Five of the baby birds were strong. They chirped loudly. The one that had hatched last, though, was not strong at all. Mama Bird called him Xiao Liu, or Little Six. He was frail and quiet. Xiao Liu's older brothers and sisters teased him often.
“Chirp, chirp, look at Xiao Liu," said Oldest Brother. "He's so weak, he can barely move."
“Chirp, chirp," said Fourth Sister. “I know. He wouldn't budge. I had to climb over him to get to Mama."  
“Chirp, chirp, I couldn't sleep," said Second Sister. “Xiao Liu was trying to move around. He's so slow and clumsy! He kept stepping on me."
The older siblings pushed Xiao Liu around. They took his food.  Sometimes they even snatched it right out of his mouth!
“Chirp, chirp. That's mine," said Third Brother.
“Chirp, chirp," said Second Sister. “That worm looks yummy. I want it."  “Chirp, chirp, but I'm hungry!" cried Xiao Liu as his sister took the worm from his mouth.
Xiao Liu's brothers and sisters would call him names too. They gave him the nickname Clumsy Bird. “Chirp, chirp. Move out of the way, Clumsy Bird," they chirped together. 
Xiao Liu did not like being laughed at or pushed around by his brothers and sisters.
Xiao Liu was not physically strong when he hatched. But he did have a strong will. He decided he would get stronger. He would do exercises every day. Soon, his brothers and sisters would not laugh at him anymore!
Every morning, Xiao Liu would rise before the sun even came up. Before his brothers and sisters woke, Xiao Liu would be finished with all his exercises and breakfast.
“Chirp, chirp. What are you doing, Clumsy Bird?" asked Oldest Brother. Then he fell back asleep again. 
“Chirp, chirp, it's too early, Clumsy Bird," Second Sister complained. “Stop moving around so much."
Xiao Liu worked hard morning after morning after morning. He flapped his wings over and over and over again to make them stronger. He always got the first worms and bugs Mama brought back to the nest. All through the spring Xiao Liu woke up earlier than his brothers and sisters. He worked harder than they did, week after week. He ate big meals and did not go hungry, week after week.
After a couple of months, all the birds had grown flight feathers. Mama Bird gathered her babies to teach them to fly. To everyone's surprise, Xiao Liu was the first one to start flying!
“Chirp, chirp, look at me!" Xiao Liu cried happily while his brothers and sisters struggled to fly from the nest.
The idiom “Clumsy birds have to start flying first” is used to describe someone who compensates for his or her weaknesses by working hard.
                      Question
Why was Xiao Liu the first baby bird to fly?

                Don't Look Here
Where do you think is the best place to keep your money safe? Is it safe under your mattress? But what if a thief breaks in and finds it? Maybe you put it in a steel safe. But what if you forget the secret combination?
Long ago, in ancient China, someone else thought about this question-a lot! His name was Zhang San.
Zhang San worked hard for his money. At the end of each day, he would say proudly, "Another day, another tael of silver."
Zhang San saved all his money. After 300 days, he had saved up 300 taels of silver!
Zhang San kept his money in a bundle under his pillow. Every night he counted his money. "Look at all those pieces of silver!" Zhang San said to himself. 
One night as he was counting his money, he thought he heard a  suspicious noise.
“Was that a thief I heard?" he asked himself.
“I don't think my money is safe  under my pillow," Zhang San whispered into his bundle. He put the bundle in the bottom drawer of his wooden dresser. Then he leaned his whole body against the dresser. He spread both arms across it, as if protecting it from an invader.
And that's when a cat meowed outside the window. “Oh!” he gasped, startled. “This drawer is too obvious. I must find a better place for my money."
He removed the bundle from the drawer and hugged it against his chest.
“What should I do?" he wondered. "I don't think anywhere in the house is safe."
Suddenly, he had an idea. 
“I will hide my money in the backyard!"
He dug a hole in his backyard. He buried the bag in the hole and covered it with dirt. He covered the dirt with leaves, grass, and rocks.
“Very good," he said, breathing a sigh of relief ‘My bundle of silver is safe here."
"Heh, heh. I’m so clever. A real genius!" he complimented himself.
On his way back to the house, though, a wave of fear washed over Zhang San
“What if someone finds it?"  he worried. "What if they dig up my money?"
Zhang San thought hard. Then he had another idea.
“I really am a genius!" Zhang San told himself. "This is even more brilliant!"
He found a piece of coal and wrote on the stone wall next to the hole: “No 300 taels of silver buried here."
“Oh, I am so clever!" he chuckled. He went inside and slept soundly the whole night.
What the genius Zhang San did not consider was his neighbor, Wang Er. Wang Er had been woken up by a noise outside his window. He looked out and saw Zhang San bury the bundle. Wang Er waited until Zhang San went inside, then he sneaked out.
He walked over to where Zhang San had buried the bag. He read the message on the stone: “No 300 taels of silver buried here."
"Ahh," thought Wang Er.
He immediately dug into Zhang San's hole.
He took the bundle of silver and tiptoed quietly back to his house. Wang Er felt very clever and proud of himself.
“I'm a genius!" he cheered.
But then a wave of fear washed over him.
“What if Zhang San finds his money gone?" Wang Er cried. “What if he suspects me?" he began to panic.
Wang Er thought long and hard. Then he had a clever idea!
“I really am a genius!" Wang Er told himself. "This is so brilliant!" He ran back to the backyard with a piece of coal in his hand. He wrote under Zhang's note: “Your neighbor Wang did not steal it."
The idiom “No 300 taels of silver buried here" is commonly used to refer to someone who considers himself clever, but his attempt at a cover-up only makes the situation more obvious.
                   Question
Do you think Zhang San or Wang Er were really geniuses? Why or why not?
   
                Music to a Cow's Ears
Once upon a time, there lived a man named Gong Ming Yi. He was an excellent musician. Ming Yi played the lute, a traditional Chinese instrument with strings that are plucked. His songs were as soothing and beautiful as a nightingale's chirps.
One day, Gong Ming Yi visited the countryside with a group of friends. They had a good time enjoying the fresh air and the natural beauty. Ming Yi decided to take a walk to explore more of the area. He took his lute with him. 
“I will see you in a while, my friends," said Ming Yi. "I'm going for a stroll to enjoy some more of the country life."
“Have a nice time!" shouted his friends. "Enjoy the view!"
After walking a ways, Ming Yi spotted a cow grazing in the field. Suddenly, he felt a spark of inspiration.
Ming Yi found a comfortable spot. He sat down in front of the cow. He placed his lute in front of him Then he began to pluck the strings. The musician's elegant notes traveled through the crisp country air.
The meadow was filled with a lovely melody. But to Ming Yi's amazement, the cow just kept grazing on the grass with her head down.
Perhaps the cow does not like this piece, thought Ming Yi.
He began to play another song for the cow. This time, he played a simpler tune. Ming Yi was sure the cow would enjoy it. Still, the cow kept grazing. She mooed once and looked off in the distance. Then she put her head down and continued munching on the grass. Hmmm, the cow didn't like that one either, thought Ming Yi. I know, I shall play this tune. Ming Yi played a new piece of music for the cow. This one had a stirring, upbeat tempo.
The cow continued grazing, without another moo.
Confused, Ming Yi played a different song for the cow, a quiet, heavenly piece. Yet song after song, the cow showed no reaction.
After hearing an entire concert of Ming Yi's best works, the cow finished her meal and slowly wandered away.
Because Ming Yi was focused on his lute playing, he didn't notice that his friends had arrived some time before. They clapped and cheered when Ming Yi finished his last song and put down his lute.
Confused, Ming Yi asked his friends, "How could that cow not like my music? I played my heart out! I can't imagine why she was not impressed. Am I losing my talent? Were my songs bad? That cow is the toughest music critic!"  
His friends laughed and said, “No, silly. It is not because your music is bad. It is because the cow cannot understand music at all!"
Ming Yi let out a sigh of relief and went home with his lute. He continued to play concert after concert to audiences of people who were able to appreciate his talent. And he never ever tried to play for a cow again!
“Playing the lute to a cow" means to offer a treat to someone who can't appreciate it. “Casting pearls before swine” is a similar idiom in English.
                  Question
What kind of song did Ming Yi play after the cow did not react to his first song?
1. Ming Yi played a stirring, upbeat piece.
2. He played a quiet, heavenly song. 
 3. He played a simple song.
4. He played a song on the flute.
                The Unlikely Friendship
During the Warring States Period, the two highest officials of the State of Zhao were Lian Po and Lin Xiangru.
Lian Po was the head of the army. He was in charge of all the soldiers. He made sure the State of Zhao was safe. He was strong and proud. People knew he was wise at military strategy.
Lin Xiangru was the chief minister. He was not like a soldier at all Instead, he worked in the government. He made sure that it worked well He was smart and a great speaker.
Lin Xiangru had quickly become powerful in the government. The king of Zhao liked him very much. He trusted him. Lin Xiangru had once saved the king from embarrassment.
However, Lin Xiangru's quick rise made many others jealous. Even Lian Po. Why? Well, Lin Xiangru was in charge of even Lian Po.
Lian Po told his soldiers, "I had to risk my life in many battles to get where I am. But then this guy, Lin Xiangru, got to the top by doing nothing! All he did was talk!" Lian Po was so angry that he thought of a plan to embarrass Lin Xiangru. 
Word of Lian Po's plan made its way to Lin Xiangru. He didn't want to meet Lian Po. He stopped going out.  He even faked being sick for a while, so he could have an excuse to stay inside.
One day, Lin Xiangru could not stay inside. He went out in his carriage. Soon, he saw Lian Po's carriage coming toward him. He told his driver to quickly turn around. Lin Xiangru went back home. When the government ministers heard about it, they mocked him. They said he should be embarrassed. They said he was a coward.
But Lin Xiangru responded calmly. He said, “Do you want to know why I do not want to meet Lian Po? The conflict between us is personal. As the chief minister, I make sure that the government works correctly. As the head of the army, Lian Po makes sure that we stay safe. Together, we keep the state running smoothly.
 “If other states learn of our conflict, they might think that our government is weak. Then they might attack and destroy us. So, you see, I cannot let a personal matter destroy our State of Zhao!"
The ministers were inspired by Lin Xiangru's words. Lian Po heard about what Lin Xiangru had said. His jealousy turned to regret. He asked Lin Xiangru for forgiveness. The two leaders became good friends. Due to their strong relationship, the State of Zhao remained peaceful for many years.
“Carrying sticks and asking for forgiveness" means to offer someone a humble apology or to ask for forgiveness. This idiom is like the English phrase “To eat humble pie."
                 Question
How quickly do you forgive others?

                     Answer
Q: What kind of song did Ming Yi play after the cow did not react to his first song?
A: He played a simple song.

                  Powerful Mr. FOR
       Meet Mr. Fox. He lives on a mountain with many other animals. Best friends Mr. Butterfly, Mr. Rabbit, and Mr. Monkey live next to Mr. and Mrs. Bird. But there is one animal that is especially important - Mr. Tiger! All the other animals are afraid of Mr. Tiger because he is big and strong. You might even call Mr. Tiger the king of the mountain.
One day, as Mr. Fox was napping in the shade of a big tree, Mr. Tiger happened to walk by. He had never met Mr. Fox before, so he was very curious. As he got a closer look at Mr. Fox's orange, brown, and white fur, his mouth started to water. What a tasty meal Mr. Fox would be!
     Mr. Tiger poked at Mr. Fox. “Wake up!" he said, while licking his lips. “You look delicious, and I can't wait to eat you up!"
     Mr. Fox's eyes blinked open. “Wha-?"  he mumbled, before realizing that he was looking at Mr. Tiger. "OH!" he yelped as he sat up quickly. "Hello, Mr. Tiger, how can I help you?"
“Well..." said Mr. Tiger." I'd like to eat you!"
Oh no! thought Mr. Fox. What do I do? I don't want to be eaten! Let me think ...Oh! I know!
“Why do you want to eat me?" asked Mr. Fox. "Don't you know I am more powerful than you?"
 "HAHAHAHA!” laughed Mr. Tiger. “‘Now that's a funny joke! You, more powerful than me? I am Mr. Tiger! I am the king of the mountain! No one is more powerful than me!"
“Really?" challenged Mr. Fox. “I promise that I am more powerful than you. I can even show you proof! Here, follow me."
Reluctantly, Mr. Tiger agreed to follow Mr. Fox.
As they walked, Mr. Tiger couldn't help but notice something. Everywhere they went, all the animals scurried away in fear! Could it be? Was Mr. Fox truly more powerful than him? So powerful that all the other animals were afraid of Mr. Fox?
“You see?" said Mr. Fox. “All animals know I am powerful, so they are running away from me! Now that you see I am more powerful than you, do you still want to eat me, Mr. Tiger?" asked Mr. Fox.
“I ...No, Mr. Fox. I understand now," replied Mr. Tiger. "I'm sorry. I did not know your power." Mr. Tiger hung his head in shame and walked away with his tail between his legs.
Once he was sure Mr. Tiger was far away, Mr. Fox burst out laughing. He had simply borrowed Mr. Tiger's power. All the animals ran away because they were afraid of Mr. Tiger, not Mr. Fox! But Mr. Tiger had thought the animals were afraid of Mr. Fox because Mr. Fox was walking in front! Clever Mr. Fox had successfully tricked Mr. Tiger. Since that day, Mr. Tiger has never bothered Mr. Fox again. 
 The idiom “The fox borrows the tiger's might” is used to describe a person who uses someone else's power or authority in order to bully others.
                        Question
Have you ever used someone else's talents to make yourself seem better?
    
              Painting the Dragons to Life?
In the sixth century, South China was a place of peace and happiness. Emperor Wu ruled during the Liang Dynasty. It was a time of great learning and art. Both were very important to Wu.
A general named Zhang Sengyou served under Emperor Wu. Zhang was also a famous painter.
One day, the An Le Monastery in Jinling (now Nanjing) invited Zhang to paint a mural. His painting would decorate the wall outside the temple.
The villagers gathered near the wall. They were eager to watch Zhang Sengyou create a masterpiece.
When Zhang arrived, he stood at the wall for a long time. The villagers wondered why he didn't start to paint.
“Is something wrong?" asked an old man.
“I wonder what he's waiting for," said a woman.
The crowd became anxious. But still they waited and waited. They all wanted to see a master at work. 
Finally, Zhang began to wave his paintbrush. He painted four large, detailed dragons on the wall. Each was beautiful in its own way. Red, yellow, blue, and black! Each dragon was a different color. The dragons had muscular bodies and large, powerful wings. They had long, curvy tails. They looked so real that they almost seemed to be breathing. They had regal noses and eyes, but none of the eyes had pupils.
When Zhang finished, he stepped back so everyone could get a better look.
“Magnificent!" exclaimed one man.
“Beautiful!" said another.
"Look at the colors," said a woman standing in the back. “Such talent," said the man standing next to her.
“Impressive," said a man in front. Then he nervously added, “But why don't their eyes have pupils? I don't see any dots in their eyes." 
“The pupil is where the fire and energy of the soul live," explained Zhang. ‘If I paint their pupils, the dragons will come alive! They will take off and fly away."
Hearing this, the villagers laughed. What silliness! They teased Zhang about his story. "Draw me lots of money!" a poor woman suggested. "Then put pupils on it!"
“Paint a fish dinner!" yelled a small boy, rubbing his stomach. “With big, googly eyes!"
“You do not believe me, eh?" Zhang asked, annoyed. "I shall prove it!"
Zhang went back to the wall. He used his finest brush to dot pupils in the eyes of two of the dragons.
 Suddenly, thunder boomed! Lightning flashed in the sky and in the eyes of the painted dragons.
BOOM! BOOM!  ROAR! BOOM!  
The villagers were startled. They looked up and around. They did not know what was happening. Everyone tried to hide under someone else!
Just then, an even bigger noise, like fireworks, surrounded them. The two dragons with dotted eyes broke free from the wall.
       BOOM! KOAR!  CRASH!
The two dragons raced upward! They zoomed like lightning returning to its source! Their long tails whipped the winds.
They flew higher and higher. Then they disappeared into the storm clouds.
The villagers were stunned, shocked. They looked at the dragons on the wall. Their eyes grew wide. Their mouths hung open, speechless.
The villagers looked at Zhang. Then they looked back at the wall. The two dragons without dotted eyes remained still on the wall. "It's perfect the way you painted it!" said the nervous man in front of the crowd. “Don't change a thing!"
“To dot the pupils of the painted dragon" means that if you want to bring your ideas to life, you must be clear. You have to pay attention to details and finish your work carefully. A similar English idiom that advises people to pay attention to details is “Dot your I's and cross your T's."
                     Question
 Dragon was beloved in ancient Chinese culture. Can you name two other beloved creatures in ancient Chinese culture? Why did people love them?
               
                  Frog's Tasty World 
One upon a time, there lived a small frog at the bottom of a well This frog had lived in the well his whole life.
Every day was the same. He would wake up and eat a few of the black bugs flying around in the well. What a delicious breakfast! Then he would play a little in the water, splashing and singing, "ribbit, ribbit!" When he got hungry, it was time for lunch. Again, he would eat some of the black flies in the well. They were always as yummy as the breakfast bugs!
Then, he would take a little afternoon nap, lying in the warm sunlight shining from above. When he woke up from his nap, he would eat dinner. Guess what he ate? Yes! Bugs! Finally, after dinner, he would stare through the opening of the well and watch the stars before going to sleep. He called the stars "fireflies." They looked tasty!
Every day would pass in the same way. He was very content with his life. To him, everything was perfect in his little well.
One day after lunch, as he was settling down for his nap, a bluebird appeared at the mouth of the well. 
"Hello Mr. Bird!" shouted the frog. "How are you? Please join me down here in my house! It's perfect here! It's the best life anyone could have. It's cozy, and I have plenty to eat. At night I can see the fireflies, and sometimes I even see the shining caterpillar."  
"The fireflies and the shining caterpillar?" said the bluebird. “Do you mean the stars and the moon? Mr. Frog, how about I show you the outside world?" asked the bird. "No, thank you," said the frog. "I don't need anything besides my perfect little well. Nothing out there can compare to here. Anyway, how much is there to see? It is all here and in the little blue circle at the top of my well. The circle turns black at night. Then the fireflies and the shining caterpillar come out."
At this point, the bird decided to take action. He swooped into the well and grabbed the frog.
"Hey! Put me down!" the frog protested. He struggled against the bluebird's grip. The bird lifted him upward. Suddenly the frog saw a flash of green and then a blur of yellow. He stopped squirming and grew big-eyed. What he saw was unlike anything he had ever seen before. Rivers and mountains and lakes and fields! He saw hundreds of trees and thousands of flowers.  He saw millions of bugs! Beetles and bees! Butterflies and dragonflies! The world looked delicious!
“Who knew the world was this big!" he exclaimed. “Thank you, Mr. Bird, for showing me this beautiful place!" After seeing the outside world, the frog never went back to his well again. He lived in a pond ringed with flowers and buzzing with bugs!
Before he met the bluebird, the frog's world was very small. He was sure that nothing could be better than the well. If the bird had not flown him to the outside world, the frog would have never opened his mind to life's possibilities.  And he would have never opened his mouth to the possibilities of bees, butterflies, beetles, and dragonflies!
The idiom “The frog at the bottom of the well "is used to refer to someone who has a very limited outlook on life.
                     Question
What was the frog's life like before he left the well?
1. His life was very routine. Every day was the same.
2. He lived in the dark and loved fireflies.
3. His life was very tiring because he swam all the time.
4. He tried to escape by climbing out of the well and the bird helped him.
          
        Where's My Sword?
Lu Zhou lived in a small village long ago. Like many of his neighbors, he did not have much. But there was one special thing that Lu Zhou had. A beautiful sword. It had been passed down to him by his father, who had inherited the sword from his father.
The sword was his most prized possession, and he felt proud to show it off. He would stand outside and turn it in his hands to see how brightly the metal shone in the sun.  He was sure that the sword was worth a lot of money, but he would never sell it. In fact, he loved the sword so much that he took it with him everywhere. The villagers were afraid to see him walking down the road. He swung his sword like a walking cane! But they soon learned he meant no harm.
One summer day, Lu Zhou traveled to visit his brother. It was a long journey. But of course, he carried his heavy sword with him. It seemed to get heavier with each step. The weather grew hot and humid. His hands grew sweaty. The sword became slippery. And it shone like the sunlight reflecting off water. He grew thirsty.
He came to a wide river. Lu Zhou bent down and took a deep drink. Much better! Then he had to cross the river. It was so wide that he could hardly see the other side. Small waves rushed by. The water was fast and too deep to walk across. To his relief, he saw a man in a fishing boat nearby. He waved his arms and called out to the fisherman.
“Hello, sir!" he yelled. "Could you give me a ride across the river, please?"
“I'd be happy to help," replied the fisherman.
The fisherman brought his boat to the shore, and Lu Zhou eagerly got on. “Thank you very much!" he said.
"No problem!" said the fisherman. As they crossed the river, Lu Zhou leaned over the edge of the boat. He stared deeply into the water. He wanted to see if there were any fish.
“Careful," said the fisherman. “You might fall out of the boat." “Oh, don't worry, I know how to swim very well." Lu Zhou waved his arms wildly to show how he could swim.
"The fish should watch out for me!" The boat rocked as he swung his arms.
Then, the two men heard a splash. It was the sword! The sword had accidentally fallen into the river! "Oh no! See? This is what I meant!" cried the fisherman." Quick! Dive in! Save the sword!"
“Oh, don't worry," said Lu Zhou. “I know an easier way!" He took out a knife and made a mark on the side of the boat. "We are in the middle of the river," he continued. “It's a little dangerous to get in the water here, isn't it? So, I've just made a mark into the side of the boat, right next to where I'm sitting. This way, I know where the sword dropped! When we make it to the other shore, I can dive in where I made the mark. Then, I will find the sword easily!"
“What?" asked the fisherman, confused." “That won't work!" “Just wait and see!" insisted Lu Zhou.
The fisherman didn't want to argue. He kept quiet and paddled the boat.
When they reached the other shore, Lu Zhou checked the mark on the boat. Then, he dove into the river right at the mark. A few moments later, he came back to the surface.
"I can't find the sword!" he cried. "I don't understand, how is this possible? This is exactly where I dropped it!" He pointed at the mark in the side of the boat. “So where could the sword have gone?"  
The fisherman let out a big sigh. “Sir, this is what I was trying to tell you. You made the mark out there. We were in the middle of the river. That's where the sword dropped. But we are here now, by the shore. The mark moved with the boat, but the sword didn't. The sword is still out there, in the middle of the river!"
Lu Zhou finally understood. He began to cry when he realized what he had done. He had lost his favorite thing in the world! And all because he had been foolish and stubborn!
The idiom “Mark the boat to find the sword" means to insist on doing something your way without considering the reality of a situation.
                           Question 
Have you ever done something foolish that didn't turn out as you'd hoped? What did you learn from the experience?
                        
                The Fake Musician
Let’s travel back in time to China’s Warring States Period. Qi Xuan Wang was one of the rulers of the Qi State. He led the state from 319-301 BCE. Qi Xuan Wang was a fan of music.
He really liked listening to large orchestras. He loved it when hundreds of musicians played the yu, a wooden wind instrument.  
A man named Nan Guo heard about this. It gave him an idea. “This is a lucky break!" Nan Guo thought. "I will ask if I can join the royal orchestra. I will have a job. I will earn a good living. It will be easy work!"
Only one thing was standing in the way. Nan Guo was not a musician. He didn't know how to play the yu! He did not see that as a problem, though.
"I can just fake it," Nan Guo laughed to himself. "There will be hundreds of musicians playing. I can easily get lost among them. No one will be able to hear me play- or not play!" He smiled to himself, enjoying his cleverness." The ruler will hear the whole band," Nan Guo added. "He will never know that I am not really playing."
Nan Guo went to see Qi Xuan Wang. He told the ruler that he was an expert yu player.
“My Lord, I have trained for many years," said Nan Guo. “I am very talented. My music is inspiring. Animals dance and flowers blossom when they hear it. Now I wish to play the yu to serve you!" 
Qi Xuan Wang was thrilled to hear this. He trusted Nan Guo and didn't even ask him to play.
“Wonderful!" the ruler replied.“ I welcome such a talented musician into my orchestra!"
Nan Guo joined the royal orchestra. He found a seat among the hundreds of yu players. There were so many of them! It was easy for Nan Guo to get lost in the crowd. 
“Ha! This is so easy! I just move my mouth and pretend to play. Nobody knows the difference," laughed Nan Guo.
Show after show, Nan Guo faked playing the yu. His fingers danced over the instrument. He looked very handsome and serious. "I sometimes forget where I am, because the music takes me to a better place," he once explained to a fan. No one ever noticed that his instrument was silent, not even Qi Xuan Wang. The Qi ruler enjoyed the many songs his prized orchestra played.
But Qi Xuan Wang couldn't rule forever. Eventually, his son, Qi Min Wang, took over. Qi Min Wang also liked music. He liked solo performances, however.
“Bring me the finest musicians from the band!" Qi Min Wang ordered. "I would like to hear them play one at a time!"
“What a great chance to show off  our own talents!" noted one musician.  “Yes! I would like to perform for our new ruler, too!" said another yu player.
“Oh no!" thought Nan Guo. “This is terrible. I will not be able to play anything for Qi Min Wang. The truth will be discovered! I will be jailed. Maybe even worse!" He knew his lie would be caught if he did not escape right away.
That night, Nan Guo gathered his belongings and sneaked out of the royal court. Then he ran far, far away, never to be seen or heard again.
The idiom "Fake yu player hiding among the crowd" refers to someone who pretends to have a particular skill.
                         Question
1. What was the difference between the two Qi rulers' musical tastes?  
2. What type of music do you enjoy?
                      
                       Answers
Q: What was the frog's life like before he left the well?
A: His life was very routine. Every day was the same.
Q: What was the difference between the two Qi rulers' musical tastes?
A: The answer can be found in the first paragraph on page 62 and the last paragraph on page 66. On page 62, you learn that Qi Xuan Wang loved it when hundreds of musicians played the yu. On page 66, you learn that Qi Min Wang enjoyed solo performances.

                   Clear as a Bell
       The noble Fan family in ancient China lived in a grand house. A tall, brick wall with doors protected the entrance of their house.
      One day, they decided to add a large bell to the outside of the entry wall The bell was huge! It measured two meters high by one and a half meters wide. It took six men to lift the bell and hang it on two wooden posts.
      The villagers came to admire the beautiful brass bell.
“Look how big and grand it is!" said the farmer.
Wen Shao, a local thief, watched from under a shady tree nearby. “I can sell that bell for a lot of money! Heh, heh, I shall be rich!" Wen rubbed his palms together greedily. 
Late that night Wen crept to the Fan house. His eyes lit up like fireballs when he saw the bell up close. He got so excited that he kissed it!
“Mmmmwah!" his lips smacked against the bell.
He looked sneakily to the left, then to the right. There was no one around.
“Heh, heh," Wen snickered.
“Everyone is sound asleep. This is my chance!"
But when he tried to lift the bell, it didn't budge. "Ugh! Ugh! Ouch!" cried Wen.
He bent his legs low and tried to lift the bell from the bottom. It didn't move. He grabbed it from the top and tried to lift it over his shoulders. It didn't move. He pulled it from the right side. It didn't move. He pulled it from the left side. It didn't move.
Wen crinkled his brows.  He walked around the bell, checking all the sides. He paced back and forth in front of the bell, thinking.  “What to do? What to do?" thought Wen as he paced. “Think! Think!" He told himself as he tapped his finger on his forehead, Suddenly, Wen had an idea!
"I will smash the bell," Wen said. "It will break into many small pieces. It will be easy for me to carry the pieces." 
Wen felt proud of himself and his brilliant solution.
“Heh, heh," laughed Wen. "I'm a genius!"
He found a big rock under a nearby tree. He slammed the rock against the bell.
              BONG! BONG!
The loud sound hurt Wen's ears. He covered them with both hands and stumbled backward.
“Ouch!" cried Wen. "My ears! My ears!"
Wen knew that if he banged the bell with the rock again, the bell would again hurt his ears. “What to do? What to do?" thought Wen as he paced.   
Suddenly, Wen had an idea!
 He ripped off a small piece of fabric from the end of his shirt. He rolled it into a ball. Then he stuck it into his right ear. He did the same with another piece of fabric and stuck that into his left ear. 
 “Heh, heh," laughed Wen. “I'm a genius! Now, I can't hear anything."
Wen picked up the rock again and slammed it against the bell, over and over.
   BONG! BONG!  CLANG! CLANG!  
The loud bell woke up the sleeping villagers. They ran to the Fan house.
They found Wen smashing the rock against the bell.
“Stop!" cried the town mayor. 
"You're making a racket!" cried a woman. “Stop right now!"
“What are you doing to the bell?" cried the cobbler.
The villagers were angry. One of them pulled out the fabric from Wen's ears.
Wen looked around at the crowd, confused.
“Huh? How did you hear?" he asked them. "I plugged my ears. There wasn't any noise!"
The villagers all started to laugh. Wen wasn't just a thief-he was a fool, too!
The idiom “Cover your ears while stealing bells" means fooling yourself into believing something silly.
                       Question
What do you think was Wen's biggest mistake?

           The Tale of Two Pearls
Once upon a time, in ancient China, a businessman named Man Yuan took a long trip to a faraway town. In the town market, Man Yuan saw some interesting items on display outside a little shop. He went inside.
The first thing that caught his eye was a giant pearl on the shelf behind the shopkeeper. It was larger and more beautiful than any pearl he had ever seen. Man Yuan knew he had to have it!
“Shopkeeper! Let me see that pearl!" called Man Yuan, pointing to the shelf.
"Oh, you have good taste, sir. This is a very rare pearl. There's none other like it in the world," replied the shopkeeper.
Man Yuan used all the money and valuables he had on him to buy the pearl. He was thrilled!
When he got back home, Man Yuan took out the pearl to admire it. He wanted a special place to store it.  He made a box from the finest wood. He decorated the lid of the box with gold, silver, and gemstones.
Man Yuan carefully placed the pearl inside the box. Then he hid the box. Every day, he took the pearl out of the box to admire it. Some days, he would even take it out twice!
On special days and holidays, Man Yuan would take out the pearl to show his family and friends. “Oh! Look how big it is!" said Man Yuan's uncle.
“Oh! Look how it shimmers. It's so beautiful," said his aunt.
“You must have paid a lot of money for it," cried his neighbor Shou Liang. 
“Oh yes, this pearl cost me a fortune!" replied Man Yuan. 
I wish I could own a pearl like that, Shou Liang thought to himself. It's so beautiful!
One day, Shou Liang was on his way to the market. The sunlight bounced off something on the ground and caught his attention. “Wow!!" he cried. “"It's a giant pearl!"
He picked it up.
“Oh, it is my lucky day! This pearl is even bigger than Man Yuan's!" he gloated. "It's smoother and prettier too."
Shou Liang hid this pearl in his pocket and ran home as fast as he could.
In the days that followed, Shou Liang boasted to everyone about his big and beautiful pearl. But he never showed anyone. It was too precious to take out. He did not want to lose it.
A few months later, Man Yuan and Shou Liang both became sick. Incredibly, they both had the same, strange illness.
No one could figure out what the mysterious illness was. Their doctors tried different treatments. Nothing worked.
One day, a traveling doctor came into town. He carried a sign that read, “DOCTOR OF STRANGE ILLNESSES.” 
 The two families were desperate. They invited the doctor in. Since the families were neighbors, the doctor was able to look at both patients at the same time.
“I know a cure," the doctor told the families. "But the medicine must have one special ingredient. It won't work without it."
"“What is the special ingredient, doctor?" asked the families.
“You need a pearl," he explained.  "You have to grind up the powder from inside the pearl, and add it to the medicine mixture."
Man Yuan hesitated. But he had no choice. He took out his pearl and showed it to the doctor.  
“Wow. This is beautiful. It is a precious pearl indeed!" exclaimed the doctor.
Then Shou Liang showed his pearl to the doctor.
The doctor examined the pearl.  He burst into a loud laugh! "What? This is not a pearl! It's just an eyeball from a giant fish," laughed the doctor. “This is truly a case of passing off a fish eye as a pearl! How can you expect to be healed with a fake?"
Today, the idiom “To pass off fish eyes as pearls" is used to describe when something fake is passed off as the real deal.
Question
Have you ever seen a fake? How did  you know it was fake? How was the real one different?
               
               The Fisherman's Quiet Victory  
Nearly 25000 years ago, China was at war. The old empire had fallen. After hundreds of years under one rule, China was broken into seven kingdoms. They were named Qin, Chu, Zhao, Wei, Han, Yan, and Qi. Each wanted to gain control of China.
Their large armies battled. Farmers left their fields to fight. They headed to battle with spears and swords. Soldiers on horseback aimed arrows at their enemies. Chariots raced through crops and crushed them. Tired soldiers battled in heavy leather armor. The armor was not enough protection against sharp spears. Many thousands died. This time was known as the Warring States Period.
Zhao was one of the smaller kingdoms. They tried to control an area in the northeast. But they were not alone in the north. They were surrounded by enemies. The Yan kingdom was on Zhao's northeast border. The Qin kingdom was Zhao's powerful neighbor to the west.
The ruler of Zhao was worried about his neighbors. They were always looking to battle. One day, the ruler of Zhao got into an argument with the Yan. However, he didn't want to fight the Yan. He didn't want to turn more Zhao   farmers into warriors. But what else could he do?
The Zhao ruler had wise men who gave him advice. One of these men talked to the ruler about war and peace. He knew that war would not help the Zhao people. He tried to show that the ruler didn't have to choose war. The wise man told the story.
"One day, a clam washed onto the beach. It ended up far from the water. A snipe, a wading bird, was looking for food along the shore. Suddenly, it spotted the clam. It wanted to eat the clam. Of course, the clam did not want to be eaten! The two began to fight. They struggled for a bit. The bird was able to latch its beak onto the clam's shell Then the clam bit down hard on the bird's beak. The two held onto each other tightly. Neither was willing to let go!
The bird said to the clam, 'Ha! You are far from the water, Clam. It will not rain for days. You will never survive!'
The clam said to the bird, 'You can't survive without water either! Let's see who outlasts whom!'
The clam and the bird held onto each other for a long time. Neither was willing to let go. 
A fisherman was watching them. He stayed calm and quiet. He crept closer as the bird and clam battled for some time. Then he walked up to them, silently.  He quickly scooped up both the bird and the clam. The fisherman didn't have to struggle at all. It was an easy catch. Then he walked home with his dinner.
The Zhao ruler listened closely to the story. He agreed with the wise man.
"I understand," he said, "if we battle with the Yan, the big Qin army might join the fight later. We and the Yan would be weak from our battles. They could defeat both of us. We would be like the clam and the bird."
The Zhao ruler called off his plan to attack the Yan.
The Zhao kingdom began the Warring States Period as a small state. The ruler's wise decisions changed that. Near the end of the wars, the Zhao was the only kingdom left that was strong enough to fight against the powerful Qin.
Finally, the Qin and Zhao met in battle. The Qin used a clever trick. They trapped Zhao army at the Battle of Changping. The Zhao ran out of food. No one came to help them. They were trapped. After 46 days the Zhao gave up. In 22l BCE, the Qin brought China together as one country.
The idiom “When a snipe and clam fight, the fisherman benefits" means that when two are busy fighting one another, they can easily be surprised and defeated by an outsider.
                           Question
Have you ever settled a problem through peaceful means? Tell about what happened.
           The Spear and the Shield  
In one town in old China, there lived a proud merchant. He owned a small store in the busy market.  On one side of his store were beautiful, straight spears On the other side, were hard, strong shields. At this time, China was often at war with itself. The merchant knew soldiers needed spears for fighting and shields for protecting themselves.
The market was filled with shops and shoppers. There were restaurants, fruit stands, clothing stores, and more. There was even another store that also sold spears and shields. The owner of that store was the proud merchant's rival.   
Every week, the merchant sold a few spears and a few shields. But he was not happy. All the other stores were busier than his store. Even worse, his rival's store had more customers. The merchant thought long and hard about how to get more customers to his store. Like a soldier, the merchant knew he had to be stronger than his rival. He stared at his spears and shields, thinking. Suddenly, he had an idea. He picked up a spear and a shield and marched out into the street.
He held up the spear and danced around. "Look at this spear!" he yelled. "My spear is the best in China! It is made from the best wood in the world! The metal is so strong that it can pierce anything!"  
A crowd soon gathered around him. Even his rival came over to see what was happening.
"Look at this shield!" the proud merchant continued. He lifted it up to catch the sunlight. "My shield is the best in China! It is made from the strongest metal in the world! It is so solid that nothing can pierce it!" 
The crowd grew bigger. “Ooh! Aah!" they said, admiring the merchant's spear and shield.
The merchant's rival walked up to him. “You say that your spear can pierce anything, and that nothing can pierce your shield," said his rival. “That is correct," replied the merchant confidently.
“What will happen if I stab your shield with your spear?" asked his rival.
The question surprised the merchant. He stopped dancing. He lowered his spear. He lowered his shield.  He knew that the claims were untrue. There could not be both a spear that can pierce anything and a shield that cannot be pierced by anything. The merchant didn't know what to say. So, he hung his head in shame, closed his store, and went home.
The idiom “One's spear against one's own shield" means to contradict oneself or be inconsistent.
             Question
Why did the merchant lie about his spears and shields?
            
          Meng Jiao's Happy Ride
Tests can be stressful. You worry that you haven't studied enough. You worry that you won't know the right answer. You worry that you do know the answer but will still get it wrong on the test. Don't worry! You're not alone!  Tests have been stressing people out for thousands of years. Here's one man's story about test stress. During the Tang Dynasty there lived a man named Meng Jiao. He was born to a poor family.
Meng Jiao loved poetry. He loved studying it. He loved writing it as well He gave all of his life to the art. His hard work showed. It helped him become a talented poet. Writing poetry was not a good paying job at that time. Meng Jiao was poor most of his life.
When he got older, he realized this had to change. He needed to earn more money. He decided to take the Ke Ju exams.
The Ke Ju was the official test system of China. The exams were open for anyone to take. Anyone from a farmer to a scholar could take an exam. The Ke Ju  gave everyone an opportunity. Whoever passed it could get the job of an official.
Meng Jiao studied hard for the tests.  He took them several times. Each time, he failed. But Meng Jiao never gave up. He studied harder and harder. He took the tests over and over and over again. 
Finally, when he was 46 years old, Meng Jiao passed the test! He was so happy! Meng Jiao put on new clothes. He tied on red flowers to celebrate. Then he rode on a horse through Chang'an City. 
During his ride, Meng Jiao wrote a poem. In English, it is “Horseback riding swiftly through the spring breeze, while seeing all the sights and flowers of Chang'an in one day.  ”
Meng Jiao's poem tells about his feelings on that exciting day. His words describe the feeling of spending a day riding his horse and enjoying the sights and flowers. It tells of seeing all of Chang'an City in a day. On that day, he was able to let go of the disappointments of the past.
The poem was passed down through the years. It became famous. But people said it would be impossible to really enjoy everything in one day. This led to the phrase “The warm spring breeze suits the good mood." It describes how happy people are when things work out really well.
                   Question  
How old was Meng Jiao when he finally passed the test?
                   Hurry Up, Plants! 
     A wise man named Mengzi once told this story:
     A long, long time ago, there was a farmer who lived with his son in the State of Song. However, they weren't musical. They were hardworking and rarely sang. The farmer was particularly serious. His closest neighbor had even called him a worrier.
Once the weather was good, the farmer and his son planted rice together. They were tired and proud when all the seeds had been planted. The farmer hoped they had done everything perfectly.
He wanted to watch the rice grow. Starting at sunrise every day, he stood in the flooded fields, waiting. He wondered if the small green sprout near the boulder had been there an hour ago. He got excited. Maybe it was a new plant! When he looked closer, he saw that it was an old plant. What a disappointment.  He went back to watching the fields. He waved his arms to scare away birds. Many days passed just in this way.
Soon, he began to get worried. It seemed that the shoots had not grown for several days. They looked the same as they had the day before, and the day before that, and the day before that too.
He decided to stop at his closest neighbor's house.  As they drank tea, the farmer asked the question that had been bothering him.
“By the way, how is your rice growing?" he asked. "I am worried about mine. It seems to have stopped growing!"
“Oh, my rice is growing green and healthy!" replied the neighbor. "I am very happy with the progress. Nature will provide."
This conversation did not put the farmer's mind at ease. He quickly returned to his fields to check on his rice. It looked like it still hadn't grown. Not even a millimeter!
He started to panic. He looked again. Was the rice even shorter than yesterday? Perhaps there was something wrong with his rice! “What if my crop never grows?" he thought aloud. He began pacing back and forth on the side of the rice field. "I must find a way to help my shoots grow faster."
When he got home that night, he told his son about the fields. "The rice does not seem to be growing," the farmer complained. “What should I do to help it grow?" 
“Dad," replied his son, "I think you need to wait. The rice is growing, you just don't notice it! Have patience. We will harvest the rice in the late summer."
Not satisfied with this answer, the farmer said, "I don't think so, Son. I think the rice really does need my help. I must do something!"
The next morning, the farmer awakened with an idea. "This is so smart!" he congratulated himself. He rushed out to the rice fields. He went from shoot to shoot, pulling each one a few centimeters upward.
He finally finished as the sun was setting. He was tired from the full day of work. But he was happy that he had finished his plan. As he entered the house, he said, “Son, I did so much today! I worked very hard, and I am tired. But it is worth the pain to help our rice shoots grow faster."
“What did you do?" asked his son. He didn't wait for an answer. He immediately ran out to the fields. He feared his father had done something foolish. There, he found all the rice had withered and died. He was devastated. All their hard work had gone to waste, and there was no crop left to be saved.
By telling this story, the wise man Mengzi wanted people to understand that they should respect the laws of nature. Because the farmer was impatient, he tried to change nature's pace. But instead of helping the rice, he accidentally destroyed it. Even though the rice grew slowly, he should have waited. With patience, his rice would have grown eventually, and he would have enjoyed a good harvest.
The idiom “Pulling the plants to help them grow" means that if you go against nature by being impatient, you will hurt what you hope to help.
                    Question
Have you ever been impatient with nature? Why, and what did you do?
           
              No Difference
Once upon a time, an old man named Li Tao lived next to a big mountain. Many monkeys lived on the mountain. Li Tao loved those monkeys. He watched them as they played, chasing each other and jumping from tree to tree. They were a lively bunch! At first the monkeys would run away when they saw Li Tao, but they got used to him as time went by. They would even play with him too. Li Tao and the monkeys became best friends.  
He brought three of the monkeys to live in his house. One was very loud. She was always banging around, laughing and singing. One was very playful. He liked to play pranks on the other monkeys and Li Tao. The third was very curious. She was always poking things that lay around the house.  
Li Tao looked after the monkeys like a father. He fed them delicious acorns every day.  The monkeys learned to understand everything Li Tao said. He also understood what the monkeys said to him.
It was autumn, and winter was coming soon. Li Tao counted the acorns that he had harvested. There weren't enough to last the whole winter. He knew that the monkeys would have to eat less, or else the food would not last until spring.
He needed to explain this problem to the monkeys. He pointed at the acorns. Immediately, the curious monkey began to pick up an acorn. She spun it in her hands and held it to her ear. She smelled the acorn She nodded her head, enjoying the acorn.
“I'm glad you are happy with the acorns," Li Tao said with a smile.  “However, there aren't enough acorns to last through winter. Starting today, each of you can only eat seven acorns a day." The monkeys all nodded. They understood what Li Tao was saying.
He then said, "Every morning I will give you each three acorns. In the evening, I will give you each four acorns. How does that sound?"
 Immediately, the monkeys began to cry out. They were not happy. Not happy at all! The playful monkey got angry and started throwing acorns at Li Tao.  More acorns! More acorns! he seemed to say.
“All right, all right!" yelped Li Tao, dodging an acorn that came flying at his head. “Every morning I will give you each four acorns! And in the evening, I will give you each three acorns. Is that okay?"
The loud monkey led the others in cheering with happiness! All the monkeys heard was that they would be getting four instead of three acorns in the morning.
To them, this was better already, so they stopped listening to see how their evening meal would change. They jumped around and laughed. The loud monkey hit the floor like a drum, showing her approval.
Just like the monkeys, some people's minds can be easily changed-even when something is not actually different. Today, the idiom “Three in the morning and four in the evening” is used to describe people who change their minds often.
                 Question 
Why did the monkeys have to start eating fewer acorns?
1. The acorns were making the monkeys sick.
2. There were not enough because the man needed to eat more acorns.
3. There were not enough acorns to last until spring.
4. The winter was cold, and there were no acorns.
             
               The Mysterious Animal
A very long time ago, there were no donkeys in the province of Qian. Most people there did not know what a donkey looked like or what a donkey could do.
One day, a government official returned to Qian from a trip. With him, he had a donkey that he had bought to carry his luggage. He didn't have a stable at his house for the donkey. His house was next to the woods at the bottom of a mountain. So instead of a stable, he used a rope to tie the donkey to a tree near his house.
The next day, a hungry tiger crept out of the woods. He was looking for his next meal and saw the donkey. At first the tiger thought it was a horse. But as he got closer, he realized that it wasn't.
“What is this strange, gray animal?" he said to himself. "I have never seen one before!" Curious, he crept a little closer.
“Oh my, it looks delicious!" he cried. He was happy to have found something to eat. But he was also afraid. The animal looked big and strong, and the tiger was afraid that it would hurt him.
So, he decided to hide behind a tree and spy on the donkey. He wanted.to see what it would do. Perhaps it wouldn't be so scary after all!
Soon, the tiger's stomach started to growl with hunger. "If I do not eat soon, I will faint!" he thought. 
He quickly decided that it was safe to go out. The donkey hadn't done much. All it had done was eat some grass around the tree.
The moment the tiger took a step forward, however, the donkey reacted.  It brayed loudly. It screeched.
The tiger immediately jumped back behind the tree. He was terrified! He had never heard such a noise before. “I'm too young to die!" he shouted. 
 His stomach growled again. He needed to eat something! So again, he waited and spied on the donkey. Perhaps it wouldn't turn out to be so bad after all.
The tiger quickly got used to the donkey's brays. He realized that they were merely sounds. They didn't mean anything, and the donkey wasn't doing anything else. So, he came out again.
This time, he walked in circles around the donkey to look at it more carefully. When it still didn't do anything scary, he decided to do something else. He wanted to see what it would do when it was angry. So, he used one paw and touched the donkey.
Immediately, the donkey kicked its two back legs. Its back legs were very strong, and those kicks probably would have hurt a lot. At first, the tiger was surprised. He had not expected those kicks. But quickly his surprise turned into a smile. The donkey couldn't do anything else. All it knew how to do was bray and kick! It was not a scary animal after all.
That night, the tiger went to bed with a full stomach. 
The idiom “The donkey from Qian has run out of tricks" comes from this story. Today, people use it to describe someone who has no skills left and has not learned any new skills.
                Question 
 Have you ever been afraid of an animal?

              Waiting for Rabbits

One hot summer day long ago, a farmer was hard at work tending his crops. His muscles ached and his back was sore. But he had to keep working because he had to support his family.
Perhaps a short break wouldn't hurt, he thought. He drank some water from the stream running by the side of the field. Much better! he thought as he sat down to catch his breath,
Suddenly, out of the corner of his eye, he saw a streak of white. He heard a loud thud. He turned quickly to see what had happened. There, by the tree stump across the stream, was a brown and white rabbit lying on its side.
The farmer waded through the stream to the tree stump. He saw that the rabbit had run into the tree stump and died.
The farmer was excited- here was a free meal for his family!
He wrapped the rabbit in his shirt and headed home.
That night, his wife cleaned and cooked the rabbit. It was a delicious dinner! Everyone went to bed happy and full.
The farmer woke up the next morning before dawn, as he always did. But this time, as he was putting on his clothes, he realized something. He did not actually have to work so hard! Instead of farming all day, he could just sit by the tree stump and wait for rabbits. What a wonderful plan! Free food!
That day, he did not tend his crops. He did not sweat and strain under the hot sun. Instead, he sat by the tree stump. He whistled for rabbits, but none came. He yawned. He napped. He wondered what kind of tree the stump had been. Had chickens ever bumped into it? He liked to eat chicken. He waited some more. Nothing happened. But he wasn't worried. He knew a rabbit had to run into the tree stump very soon. It was overdue! When he returned home, his wife asked when he would return to his work on the farm. “I'm done with all that," he told her. “The stump is where I belong."
“I might agree with you there," said his wife, frowning. “Perhaps you ought to sleep at the stump too." Then she stomped off.  
The farmer was happy his wife was so agreeable. She thought he belonged at the stump too!
He returned to the stump that night. He fell asleep and dreamed of rabbits hurling themselves at the stump. If only the rabbits would make themselves into rabbit stew or barbecue. That would be the best!
However, when he awakened there were no rabbits to be found. This continued for weeks. He tried different methods to get rabbits to run into the stump. He made a sign that said, “This way!" It had a big arrow on it. Nothing. He pretended to be a rabbit and hopped over to the stump. He threw himself against the stump and bumped his knee. Still, no rabbits hopped into the stump.
“Stupid rabbits!" he complained to himself. "Why don't they run into the stump like they used to do?” He almost lost hope. Then he remembered how tiring it was to tend the crops. He didn't like working that hard. He got so sweaty! The memory helped convince him that rabbits would run into the stump and give him a free dinner. He wasn't about to give up his dream!
The farmer's fields became overgrown with weeds because he stopped caring for them. He wouldn't even go home and see his family because he was afraid to leave the stump. He worried that a rabbit would bump into it while he was gone.
In the end, no more rabbits bumped into the stump. The farmer's crops died, so he had no food to sell at the market. He had no money, just one very fine stump. He became the laughingstock of the village because he relied on luck instead of hard work to feed his family. 
The idiom “Guarding the tree stump to wait for rabbits" teaches that you must work for opportunities rather than wait for them.
               Question
At the start of the story, why did the farmer not want to take a break?
1.He wanted to see what had run into the stump.
2. He wanted to support his family by taking good care of his crops.  
3. He wasn't tired, and he had a lot of work to do.
4. He did not want to eat breakfast; he wanted to farm his crops.
  
              Dragons Everywhere
There once was a man named Lord Ye. He was a respected person in his village. He was kind, smart, and wealthy. Everyone in the village knew him. They all knew that he loved dragons. No, Lord Ye didn't just love dragons. He was obsessed with them.
Almost everything that Lord Ye owned had a dragon on it. His front door had a big, golden dragon painted across it. Every single detail was painted with care. The pillars on either side of the door also had dragons carved into them.        
Inside his house, he had many rugs with dragon patterns. The rugs were in almost every room of his house. Paintings of dragons hung on every wall. Each one was painted by a different artist. Even the teacups and teapots he used were painted with little blue dragons.
He showed his love for dragons even while he was out and about in the village. Many of his silk clothes had dragons sewn onto them. His horse-drawn carriage even had flying dragons painted on it. Everywhere he went, people saw the dragons and recognized Lord Ye.
Any time someone talked about dragons in Lord Ye's presence, he would go on and on about how much he admired them. “They're just so cool! I will never stop loving them!" he would exclaim. In fact, everyone in the village knew not to mention dragons or Lord Ye would never stop talking! He just loved dragons that much.
Of course, in Chinese culture dragons are lucky, so no one thought Lord Ye's love of them was too weird. But his love of dragons became so famous that it began to spread beyond the village. People in the neighboring village began to talk of a man who was obsessed with dragons. Then the next village heard of this too. And the next. The legend of Lord Ye soon spread through the whole province.
On the edge of the province, in the mountains, there lived an ancient dragon. He was lonely and wanted friends to play with.
One day, he overheard a conversation between two birds in the woods.
“Have you heard of the man in the village across the hills?" asked the  first bird.
“No, what about this man?" replied the second bird.
“Well, apparently he loves dragons a lot!" explained the first bird.
Hearing this, the dragon was very happy. This man could be his friend! “Excuse me," the dragon said to the birds, “Do you know the name of this man?"
“His name is Lord Ye."
The dragon immediately flew to the village. He wanted to meet Lord Ye, the man who loved dragons!  
When he got to Lord Ye's house, the dragon stuck his head in the window and called out. "Lord Ye?" His voice was loud and deep.
Lord Ye got a huge fright and jumped up. He raced to his bedroom and hid under the bed. He was so afraid of the dragon!
And that's how the entire village found out that Lord Ye only liked painted and carved dragons, not real ones. 
 Today we use the idiom
"Lord Ye is fond of dragons” to refer to people who claim to love something, but don’t actually love it all that much.
                  Question 
How would you feel if you met a dragon?
    
                      Answers 
Q: Why did the monkeys have to start eating fewer acorns?
A: There were not enough acorns to last until spring.
Q: At the start of the story, why did the farmer not want to take a break?
A: He wanted to support his family by taking good care of his crops.
                
          The Smallest Dragon  
          Dragon Boat Festival  
Liu Kong is a young boy. He has a dog called Xiao Long. It means “small dragon." Xiao Long is small, but she is smart and fierce. 
 Kong's mother and grandmother are at the kitchen table. They have a big bowl of rice and some long, green leaves.
     “Mom,"” says Kong. “Can I watch the dragon boat races?"
     “First, help your grandmother to make zongzi," says Mom. “Then you can watch the races."
“OK," says Kong. He sits at the table. Xiao Long sits under the table.
Grandmother picks up a leaf. She puts some rice in the leaf. She puts some beans in the leaf. She ties the leaf with strings. She is so fast! Kong tries to make a zongzi.
He puts a little rice in the leaf. He drops a lot of rice on the table.  Grandmother makes six zongzi. Kong makes one.
Grandmother puts the zongzi in a big pot of water.
“Now, we cook them for six hours," says Grandmother. “Are you hungry now?"
“Yes," says Kong. “And I want to watch the races."
“Take this money," says Mom. “You can buy zongzi at the lake." "Thanks, Mom!" says Kong.  
Kong holds Xiao Long. He walks to the lake. There are a lot of dragon boats. Kong buys a zongzi from a woman at a stall. He tries to open it. It is very hot. He gets a lot of sticky rice on his hands. He tries to eat the zongzi, but Xiao Long takes it first. She jumps out of his arms!
The drummers start drumming. The first race starts.
Xiao Long jumps into the first boat! The boat is moving fast. The drumming is loud. Kong runs after the boat.
“Long!" shouts Kong. People think he is cheering for the dragon boats.  “Long, long, long!" they shout back.
Xiao Long runs to the front of the boat. She jumps onto the dragon's head.
Kong runs faster. Xiao Long's boat wins! She sees Kong and jumps. But she can't jump far. She nearly falls into the lake. Kong tries to catch her. He nearly drops her! But his hands are still sticky with rice. They get stuck in Xiao Long's fur. She is sticky, but she is dry. And she still has the zongzi!
Kong is too tired to watch the races now. He walks home slowly. He holds Xiao Long tightly. He lets her eat the zongzi.
“So, who won the race?" asks Mom.
“The smallest, stickiest dragon!" says Kong.
                     Question
Do you like to eat zongzi? What is your favorite kind of zongzi?

               The River of Stars  
            Double Seventh Festival
A farmer and a weaver live on a small farm. They love each other very much. They have two young children and one old bull. The farmer takes care of the bull. The weaver makes beautiful clothes. She uses the colors that she sees in the sky.
The weaver's grandmother lives in the sky. She is the Queen Mother of the West. She has very strong magic. She doesn't like the farmer. The queen looks for the weaver. She wants to take the weaver away. One day, the bull talks to the farmer. The farmer is very surprised.
“I will die soon," the bull says. “But I am a magic bull. Make me into a coat. The coat will let you fly!"
Then the bull lies down and dies. The farmer makes the coat, but he has tears in his eyes.
The farmer takes the magic coat and walks to his house. He sees his children crying.
“What happened, children?" the farmer asks.
“She... she took Mother!” his son says.
"Up into the sky!" his daughter says.
It was the Queen Mother, the farmer thinks. She took my wife! “Let's find her!" the farmer shouts. He puts on the magic coat. He picks up his children. They start to fly. They chase the Queen Mother.
The farmer flies higher. He sees his wife. They are very close. He tries to catch her, but the Queen Mother pulls her away.
The Queen Mother uses her magic. The farmer sees a bright light. He covers his eyes. The Queen Mother makes a river of stars. The river divides the farmer and the weaver. They can't cross it!
The farmer and the weaver call to each other. The children cry for their mother. The Queen Mother listens. She does not want her granddaughter to be sad.
It is the seventh day of the seventh lunar month. The river of stars is very narrow. The Queen Mother calls her birds. The birds make a bridge across the river. The farmer, the weaver, and their children walk onto the bridge. They meet in the middle. Every year, on this day, they are together again. Every year, on this day, people celebrate love.
                  Question
If you had a magic flying coat, what would you do?

            Sun, Moon, and Love  
         Mid-Autumn Festival   
 Chang'e dances from sun to sun as she crosses the sky. She waves at her husband, Hou Yi. The suns are like stepping stones. But there are too many suns. They burn the earth!
Hou Yi shoots his arrows at nine suns. They fall from the sky.  
Only one sun remains. People begin life again. Rice grows. Fish swim.
Jade Emperor is mad. He misses the nine suns. Hou Yi and Chang'e are in trouble! Jade Emperor says they must live short, human lives. Chang'e does not want a human life. She misses the sky. She stops dancing.
Hou Yi loves his wife. He wants her to be happy. He asks the Queen of Heaven for help.
The Queen gives Hou Yi a bottle. “Drink this together," she says. “Then both of you can live forever!"
Hou Yi carries the bottle with two hands. "Don't drop it!" he tells himself. It is a long walk. He gets home tired. He shows Chang'e the bottle.
“Let's open it!" Chang'e says.
“My love," Hou Yi says. “I need a nap." He lies down.
Chang'e says, "Let's drink it now! We can be together forever!"
Hou Yi is too tired. He goes to sleep.
Chang'e can't wait. She sips. She can't stop. She drinks it all!
Chang'e is tossed into the air like a dancer. “Oh, no! Hou Yi!" she cries. The drink makes her rise up to heaven. Chang'e spins through the open doorway. "Hou Yi!” She reaches for a treetop. She twirls into the sky, leaves in her hands.
Hou Yi wakes up. He runs outside. “Chang'e!"
She rises. How can she stop herself? Chang'e wraps her arms around the moon. It is cold in her arms, not warm like her husband. But at last she stops rising. “Hou Yi!” she cries.
Husband and wife reach for each other. But they cannot bridge the sky.  They are apart, forever. They love each other, forever.
Mid-Autumn Festival is a celebration of love. Families look forward to the festival all year. Faraway loved ones get together at last. Nothing can keep them apart. They love each other, forever.
                          Question  
Pretend you have a magic bottle. What happens when you open it?
  
    Defeating Disaster Double Ninth Festival

Hi！My same is Huan Jing. I am a fierce warrior. I also know magic and spells. My job is to protect humanity. This is the story of the time I defeated a monster named Disaster.
A long time ago, I had a very wise teacher named Fei Zhang Fang. I called him Master Fei. He knew a ton of magic, and I learned so much from him. Every day I would go to him, begging to be taught something new.
One day, Master Fei had a vision. He told me that a monster named Disaster was coming on the ninth day of the ninth month. It was going to destroy the village if we didn't do anything.
 “Huan Jing," Master Fei said, “ you will have to fight Disaster."
 “Me?" I asked, surprised. I had never fought a monster by myself before! “Master, what if I am not strong enough? The village will be destroyed! Why can't you fight it?"
Master Fei replied, “I believe in you. I know you can do it. You are strong enough. I have been teaching you every day for many years, haven't I? You are ready. I'm getting too old to fight monsters. So, it has to be you."
I sighed. Master was right. He had been teaching me many things for a long time. “Okay, Master," I said. “What do I do?"
“Take these," he replied. He gave me a bottle of wine. The wine was made from flowers called chrysanthemums. He also gave me a bag of leaves. They were from a plant that is used for medicine. “The villagers must drink the wine and hold the leaves. Disaster hates the smell. This will give you a chance to defeat him!"
I went to every house in the village. I told everyone to climb up the mountain. They needed to get to a high place to escape Disaster. Then, I gave them some wine to drink and some leaves to hold.
We all waited on the mountain. Suddenly, we heard a rumble in the distance. It was Disaster! He came into the village and began to tear apart the buildings. But nobody was there! Disaster looked around, confused. That's when he saw us on the mountain!
The moment he saw us, his mouth opened wide. The loudest roar I have ever heard came booming out.
ROAARRR!! 
 But then he stopped and sniffed. He could smell the wine and the leaves. He made a disgusted face, and he froze where he was, stunned.
“What is that SMELL?!" he roared That was my chance! I ran at him as fast as I could. As I ran, my legs started to feel like they were floating. Huh? Oh! Of course! Master Fei was helping me with his magic! I floated up to Disaster, and I hit him with my sword three times. Disaster fell over, dead!
The villagers saw that I had won They were overjoyed. The village was now safe! “Huan Jing! Huan Jing! Huan Jing!" they cheered. So, that's my story. I'm so proud that I defeated Disaster. People still celebrate that day every year. On the ninth day of the ninth month, people climb mountains. They also drink chrysanthemum wine. All to celebrate the day Disaster lost and the people were saved.
                       Question
Have you ever done something you thought you weren't able to do?
    
      The Winter Dumplings Dongzhi Festival  
                  
It is a cold night in the middle of winter. It is very cold in Harry's town. But Harry's house is warm. He reads in the kitchen. He learns about a Chinese doctor   and his invention. The doctor was called Zhang Zhongjing.
It was very cold in Dr. Zhang's city. The people could not stay warm.
Dr. Zhang saw many poor people. They had no hats. They could not cover their ears. Many people had red, sore ears. Dr. Zhang was kind. He wanted to help them.
Dr. Zhang made something warm for the people to eat. He took a big pot of hot water. He cooked lamb and vegetables in the pot. Then he used flour to make dough. He made the dough into small circles. He put the lamb and vegetables inside. He folded the dough, and the circles looked like ears! He put the dough ears in the soup and cooked them. Dr. Zhang invented dumplings! The winter solstice came. The winter solstice is the shortest day of the year. It has the longest, coldest night. Dr. Zhang took the big pot outside. He gave the dumplings to the people in the town.
The people ate the dumplings; and they felt warm. Even their ears were warm!
The people thanked Dr. Zhang. After the winter solstice, the days were longer.  The weather was warmer. And the people had warm ears!
Harry looks around the kitchen. He sees some flour. He has lamb and vegetables. He tries to make Dr. Zhang's lamb dumplings. He makes a mess. The dumplings break. The soup tastes bad. Harry is upset. It is the winter solstice.  His family will be home soon. He wants to eat dumplings.
Harry looks in the freezer. He sees a bag of lamb dumplings. He cooks them quickly.
Harry's wife and children come home. They eat the dumplings together. The children love the dumplings.
“Thank you for cooking!" says Harry's wife, Penny.
“I tried!" says Harry. He tells her about the bad dumplings. He says the soup was awful.
Penny laughs. "It's OK," she says. “We are all together, and we have hot dumplings. It's a great winter solstice!"
                Question
Imagine it is very cold. What food do you want to eat?
              

     The River God's Gifts  
          Part l
      Have I got a tale to tell you! Lend me your ears for the story of Cheng Shi and Zhang Bapi. And, well, me! I'm in this too.
      First, I have a question for you. Have you ever used a tool so much that you felt it was a part of you? Maybe a pen or a cellphone? Well, that's how Cheng Shi felt about his axe. What kind of a person feels like an axe is a part of him? Some villain from a horror movie? No one I want to meet!
      So, I hid every time Cheng Shi walked across the log bridge on my river. I am no fool, I tell you. I've been alive for ... well, how much is a hundred, plus give or take everyone's lifetimes ... let's just say I'm Old. I haven't been alive since the beginning of time, but I was there when time was a kindergartener. I didn't get OLD by seeking out danger. I prefer staying underwater. Blowing bubbles to tickle the fat carp. Sniffing the water lilies that grow under the log. Organizing my treasure.
That got your attention! You like treasure, do you? Me too. I like to collect things. Anything I find in this river is mine. The fish don't care about any of it. I keep my treasure organized like a library. I wish you could see it! But you might drown. Don't want to visit? No? I'll just describe it. The “A” drawer has axes of all different types and some apples, just a little bit rotten. “G” has gold, garbage, and gems organized by their colors. ‘P" is overflowing. Keep hold of your phones,  people.!
Every day, young Cheng Shi walked across the log bridge on the river. Sometimes he made a windy sound with his mouth. It gave me the heebie jeebies. It gave me the willies! It gave me the CREEPS! Other people would call it whistling. I call it a sound to scare an old river god.
In the morning, Cheng Shi crossed the bridge holding only his sharp axe. On the way back, he was bent over from the weight of the firewood he carried on his back. He always headed toward Zhang Bapi's big house. Zhang Bapi owned everything-except the river and me. If he told Cheng Shi to do something, the young man had to do it.
One rainy morning, I heard Cheng Shi approaching my bridge. He was hurrying, the axe swinging in time with his arm. I almost said, "Slow down, you're carrying an axe! Be more careful! Young people today!" But I didn't want to startle him. Then I heard him slip and fall on the log over my head. The axe sliced into the water and dropped right next to me! It missed my shoulder by a few centimeters. Very close call! That would have hurt!
Cheng Shi exclaimed, “Blast it all!" That's when I knew he wasn't a scary guy. When villains swear, they aren't usually so polite.
Then he started crying. I realized he was just some poor young fellow who'd lost his only way of making a living.
I poked my head above the water.
I heard Cheng Shi say, "Zhang Bapi is going to beat me! Oh, I was too clumsy! Now I own nothing. How am I going to do my work?"
I dove to my library, swimming to the “A” section. I picked a finely- worked golden axe and headed to the surface. I told myself I didn't really want it anyway. Why not make the young fellow rich?
"Excuse me, young man," I said when he stopped to catch his breath between sobs. “I think I've found your axe." I lifted the gold axe above the water.  His eyes grew large and his mouth dropped open.
                         Question
 The river god collects things that fall in the river. What do you collect? Describe your collection.

            Part 2
Usually l collect things people drop in my river. "Finders, keepers-losers, weepers!" is my motto. I'm a river god, so I get to keep what I like. But one day, Cheng Shi accidentally dropped his axe in the water. It was a useful tool, but I didn't want to keep it. Instead, I offered him a golden axe to replace the one he had lost. His eyes grew big as he stared first at me and my long white beard, and then the axe.
He shook his head. “Thank you, Grandfather River, but that is not my axe. Mine is not as fancy."
I nodded and dove under the water. Gold is very soft, not good for chopping wood.
I found a shiny silver axe. “Go on," I said to the crab crawling along the blade. It waved a claw at me, then hopped off.
I surfaced. “How about this one?"
He shook his head, disappointed. "It's beautiful, but no. Mine is made for hard work. I want to be a master carver someday."
I dove under the log and found Cheng Shi's axe in the sand. I sharpened it with a stone. The balance was off, so I fixed that. Then I rubbed a few silver carp eggs on it to make the axe faster and better. I'm a bit of a handyman, you see. “Here it is," I said, handing it to Cheng Shi.
“Thank you, Grandfather River!" he shouted, smiling. He took the axe, bowed to me, and trotted off.
“Don't swing it!" I called after him. "Don't run with the axe!"
The next day, Zhang Bapi came to the log bridge. He dangled an old axe over the river. He sang a little tune, “Gold is the thing that has all the bling! Gold and silver make me want to sing! Gold, gold, gold!" Then he dropped the axe into the water. “Grandfather River," he cried. “I've lost my axe. Please help me. It's golden. Priceless.'
 “One axe, coming right up," I said I gave him his axe. He shook his head. “That's not it." He sniffed and dabbed his eyes.
I kicked as I dove, splashing Zhang Bapi's feet.
He shook his head when I showed him the silver axe. "Gold," he said.  “G-O-L-D.”
How rude! I gave a big kick as I dove. From under the log, I laughed as water dowsed Zhang Bapi from head to feet.
I sprinkled a few red carp eggs on the gold axe, then surfaced.
Zhang Bapi's eyes bugged out like the eyes of a goldfish. His mouth flapped open. “Gold,  gold!" he sputtered, reaching for the axe. 
I handed it to him. He struggled to keep ahold of the slippery axe. I dove, kicking the water as hard as I could. I looked upward to see a wave of water rising over Zhang Bapi's head. Zhang Bapi hugged the axe and lost his balance. The wave pulled him off the log. He fell into the river and sank quickly. He drowned.
I stored the gold axe under “G." It is too soft to be good as an axe, but it is good as gold. I stored Zhang Bapi under “G" too, for "greed." If Zhang Bapi knew he would spend forever with my golden treasure, I think he would be happy.
Cheng Shi worked hard with his axe. Over time, he progressed from a wood chopper to a master wood carver. He often stopped on the log and thanked me. I saw that his axe became even more a part of him. Everything he carved contained a bit of his goodness and his freedom. One day, he released some of his carved wooden fish into the river. I swear I saw them leap over the bridge and swim away.
                   Question
Do you think the River God is good, bad, or both? Explain your answer by discussing how the River God treated Cheng Shi and Zhang Bapi.
The Ox-Man  
Part 1
A are you one of those people who think all babies are cute? Do you say, "Oh, look at the sweet chubby cheeks! Those sharp little horns!" What? You've never seen horns on a baby? Neither had the people when I was born. I've heard that an old man screamed, and the village dog howled when they saw me. Some people don't enjoy surprises. Few like the surprise of seeing an ox's head on a human's body. Not even a regular human body, no. My body has a see through stomach. That's me- Shennong!
Once the surprise wore off, people became interested. They gathered around to watch every time I ate or drank. “Wow, look at the meat in his stomach!" This was at the beginning of time. We didn't have WeChat or TV in those days. Of course, people weren't fussy about entertainment. They would cheer if I burped.
But about the time I became a teen, things started to change in the village. The animals in the neighborhood got tired of living near people who ate only meat. They all moved away or became dinner. The hunters returned home with empty hands. No food! Everyone got very hungry. watching my stomach was no longer entertaining. It just made people hungrier.
I could no longer be an entertainer, so I had to find other work. First, I tried to make rope for a living. I was able to braid well. Yay, me! However, when I bent down to pick long grasses or reached to get vines for rope, everything got tangled in my horns. By the end of the first day, a little red bird made a nest in the tangle of grass and plants on top of my head.
I had to try something else.  I thought I might have a promising career making mud pots. First, we shaped the pots, then we set them on tall racks to dry and harden. One time, as I super carefully set my first pot on a very crowded rack to dry, my new boss called my name. I turned my head to answer her-and my horns knocked off every pot on the rack! "'It's not for you, Shennong," cried my boss." Go join the hunters!" Even the red bird didn't want me anymore. The noise scared it away.
The hunters, however, thought I had real talent. They were sure the oxen would not be afraid of me. The skinniest hunter said, " You look a lot like an ox. They won't hide from you, thy will welcome you as a brother." Then he stared at me, saying, "When I look at you, I get hungry."
We looked everywhere for the oxen. Do you know what we found? We found that oxen are not very brotherly. Not one ox came by to see me and moo "hello."
After a couple of days, the hungry hunters started looking at me strangely. Then the skinny hunter rubbed his stomach. "What do you think you are, animal or man?" he asked me. He sharpened his spear. Then two more hunters began to sharpen their spears.
I was scared they would make me their dinner! "I will find food for us," I promised and hurried away. I went deeper into the forest to get away from the hungry hunters. I had to help my village, and not just because I didn't want to be somebody's dinner. I kept hearing the hunter's question in my head. Was I an animal or a man? After walking all day, I fell asleep, my stomach growling like a hungry ox. In my dreams, I met the Emperor of Heaven. A red bird flew from his hands. I followed the bird and ate what it ate.
The sound of birdsong awakened me the next morning. I was wildly happy to see the little red bird flying into the tangle between my horns. I guess I had been lonely. Then it dropped pebbles on the ground in front of me. looked closer. They were not pebbles. I would have to call them something else. I tried out a few names before I thought of the word “seeds." I chose it instead of narsblasts … You're welcome.
I watched the red bird dig in the dirt. It ate some of the seeds and pushed some into the ground. Then it ate seeds from some flowering plants. I did everything that the bird did. Got my nose and horns very dirty. But those seeds and plants were tasty! Everybody ought to try them!
I carried the seeds back to the village and planted them. That's when I found a job I was good at! My horns were great at digging. My stomach was expert at digesting plants. I knew why I was born with an ox's head and a see-through stomach. It was to help my people.
"Is he going to die?" they asked each other as I took a bit of rice.
 “No, look, his stomach is digesting it. Rice is food!"
"It tastes good," I told everyone. "Try it!" Soon the villagers had rice, millet, beans, and wheat to eat! I taught everyone what the red bird had taught me. They learned to grow food. The villagers had enough to eat. The animals came back to the neighborhood.
Everyone was grateful to me, so what did they do? They gave me another job. They started calling me Emperor Yan! Me? An emperor?  What a job!
 Question
What did the hungry hunters think of Shennong?
1. They thought he was an emperor.
2. They thought he could help them find oxen to be friends with.
3. They wondered if Shennong was an ox or a man.
4. They thought he should make rope.
                 Part 2
My friend the red bird left sometime after giving me the seeds. I wasn't sure when. I missed the red bird, but how could I be lonely? People bowed to me all the time!
But I was wrong. I had thought everyone was bowing and saying, "Shennong." But many were actually bending over and sneezing or coughing. “"Shennong! Shennong!" My people were sick.
I had to help. But what could I do? I made a small fire, bowed deeply, and asked the Emperor of Heaven for help. "We're both emperors!" I cried. I didn't have a cellphone. Fire was the best thing I could do to get ahold of the heavenly guy.
There was a deep silence. No birds sang. No Emperor responded.
Maybe the red bird might help again? But where the red bird had nested between my horns, I now wore a tall, royal hat. I had become too fancy. I took off the hat and left to get help!
A few of my healthy friends came with me on the journey. We traveled far, eating what we found along the way. One morning, we came to a cliff. My eyes looked up the cliff and at the red sun. Could it be? Did I see the red bird on the sun?
I ran up the cliff to get closer. I fell back down. The biggest of my friends folded his hands like a basket. The others pushed as hard as they could against my… well, let me call it by the name we use when it's about an ox. This story is for teens after all, I can't get too racy. They pushed on my hindquarters. As in be-hind.
They pushed and pushed. I strained and reached. Nothing. Now, I eat mostly plants. Hey! Chocolate and rice are plants! I eat a lot of those! No way could I be so heavy! But my groaning friends seemed to think otherwise. Finally, with a heroic push and a scramble up the rocks, I was climbing.
Can I tell you that I raced up the cliff with the grace of a soaring red bird? I can tell you that. It didn't happen, but I can certainly tell you. You make your own decision about how graceful I was!
Finally, I was alone at the top of the cliff, looking down at my still -groaning friends. The sun was now covered by clouds that dipped very low in the sky.
I gathered vines and made a rope. Yes, of course stems got tangled on my horns. But I made a rope! Then I swung the rope. I threw it as hard as I could. It stuck on a cloud!
I was much better at climbing a rope than a cliff. I climbed hand- over-hand and horn-over-horn. I pulled myself onto the cloud when I reached the top. Then I lay on my stomach for a moment. I was tired, I tell you.
I turned over... and was nearly blinded. In front of the sun, and in front of
me, was the Emperor of Heaven. He was clothed in the fabric of the clouds and the red rays of the sunlight. He was magnificent!
How could I greet the Emperor of Heaven? I didn't know. I bowed deeply. Then I stared into the eyes and face of the Emperor of Heaven. I felt that I should look at my toes to be polite, but I couldn't make myself. When I looked into the face of the Emperor of Heaven, I saw my people: sick and healthy, young and old, light and dark. I looked into the face of China, and I couldn't look away. It was too beautiful.
He walked over to me, opened one of my hands and put a covered jar in it. He opened the other and handed me a whip. I watched as he floated away and disappeared into the clouds. I think I saw my friend the red bird then, trailing behind him. Perhaps it was only the rays of the sun and my dazzled eyes.
           Question
Describe Shennong going up the cliff.

           Part 3 
I opened the jar. At first, I smelled old plants. Stinky! I looked inside. It was a dark liquid. I tasted it. I knew this gift must be to help my people get well. It tasted awful, so it had to be good for us!
Wow! I wasn't tired anymore! I grabbed the rope with one hand. I slid all the way down, cracking the whip over my head! Then I tied the rope to the top of the cliff and slid down again.
“woohoo.!" I yelled to my friends. They raced to get out of my way. I hit the ground and bounced back up.
"I met the Emperor of Heaven, and he looks like all of you!" I yelled, bowing to my friends. They were very startled. "Let's go! I've got medicine …and... a whip. Not sure why the Emperor of Heaven gave me a whip, but it's lots of fun!" I cracked it over my head again! "woohoo!"
we hurried toward the village but took a path that ended in a thicket. There were too many grasses, thorny bushes, and other plants to be able to move forward. I used my whip to slice through the thicket. Then I tasted the juice of the plants I had cut. My tongue stopped feeling anything.
"This juice would be good for pain," I said. “My tongue is numb.” I now knew why the Emperor of Heaven had given me the whip. I turned to my friends. “All the medicines our people need are already here, growing. I only need to find and share them."
Our group of friends split up. Some left to bring the medicine jar to the village. Others explored with me. In that thicket, I began eating. My friends helped me make detailed notes about every plant. It was just like when I was a baby. My friends watched my see-through stomach as I sampled leaves, barks, and roots.
But they saw me differently. I knew who I was, and so did they. I was Shennong, man and ox and god of plants.
And I knew who they were.  Each of my friends had the face of the Emperor of Heaven.
We traveled together across China, looking for medicines. We found the healing red mushroom after I choked on a poisonous plant. We found tea on a very, very good day. And every night, we wrote down what we had learned.  “Eat this to help a bad stomach. Don't eat this, it can kill you."
We also knew what we had to do. I had to try every plant. My friends had to share the knowledge. Then my people would liv, be healthy, and build China. We all knew that one day I would eat a plant that would kill me. They would write about it. No one else would die from eating that poison. We didn't talk about what would happen, but we knew.
It happened when I was on top of a cliff. The clouds were hanging low. The sun was as red as a bird. I took a bite of a plant and felt my insides break. My friends ran to me. Their faces were the face of the Emperor of Heaven. Their faces were all the faces of China. I could not look away from my last view. There was too much beauty.
             Question
How can being different from others provide opportunities to help? Please provide a couple of examples.
   
            Family Matters 
               Part l
Uncle Erlang squints all three eyes and frowns. He points his spear at my stomach. Then he advances toward me along the narrow path carved into the side of the cliff. I back away from him-and the path becomes even narrower.     
Uncle Erlang jabs the spear at my stomach! I swing my stone axe. Our weapons clash against each other with a loud CLANG! I lose my balance. My left foot hangs over nothingness. I swing my axe into the mountainside. It pierces the rocky cliff, and I hang for a moment. Then I scramble and regain my footing
I pull my stone axe from the cliff. Then flip it into the air, spinning it toward my uncle. Its sharp blade makes a wicked hiss as it reaches for him. He jerks to the side, dodging my attack. I crook my finger and the axe flips back toward me. I catch it in one hand.
Uncle Erlang puts his spear in his teeth and crawls up the cliff. I spin the axe over my head, just missing him. I hear his dog on the path ahead of me. Erlang hits the boulders above me with his spear. I duck under an overhang as huge stones tumble past.
"You never thanked me!" he yells. "I gave you birthday gifts!" Then his third eye shoots at me! It burns my elbow before I crouch under the overhang.
 “Really?" I yell back. "That's what has you upset? Birthday gifts?" It's true. I never thanked him. So, shoot me! Preferably not with a third eye. My elbow stings!
You might wonder how I, Chen Xiang, came to be fighting my uncle on the most dangerous path in the world. I once lived in a heavenly palace on Kunlun Mountain with my great-uncle and aunt. My great-uncle is the Jade Emperor and my great-aunt is the Queen Mother of the West. It sounds fabulous, but it was actually pretty boring. Maybe I would have enjoyed the luxe life more if I hadn't been so lonely. Those two had many noble duties, which didn't leave much time for me.
My dad lived in the woods near Kunlun Mountain. I rarely saw him. My mom? I wasn't sure where my mom was. When I asked my great- aunt and uncle, they said, "She's far away. But I know she'd be very happy to have such a hardworking son!" and other weird compliments relatives say when they want you to stop asking questions.
But all that changed one evening a few years ago. Uncle Erlang was over for dinner and brought his dog with him. They were never apart, which would have been fine if the dog didn't growl at everyone else. It had a tail like a whip and a very bad case of doggy breath. While we ate, the dog whined outside. To quiet him, I tossed him a bite of my dessert-peaches with cloud topping.
Then I took a deep breath and turned to Uncle Erlang. “What was my mom like when she was my age?" I asked.
My great-uncle coughed. My great- aunt loudly blew her nose. Sparks flew off Uncle Erlang's third eye. ( Just in case you're wondering-a sparking eyeball looks very uncomfortable. Yee-ouch! )
"She was rude!" roared Uncle Erlang. “She laughed during your great-aunt's birthday party. Laughed!" The way he said it, you would think it was the worst thing in the world. He turned back to me. “After your mom was sent to the human world in punishment-"
"Erlang Shen!" whispered my great- aunt fiercely, using his full name.
"After she went to the human world, she fell in love with one of them, "shouted Uncle Erlang. "A human!" He banged the table with his fist.
 “Oh, here we go," sighed my great-uncle. "Again." He rolled his eyes at Uncle Erlang.
"I'll explain the rest, dear," said my great-aunt, patting Erlang on the arm. She turned to me. "You're almost fifteen. You're old enough to know the truth about your mother." 
 I leaned in.
                Question
What do you think Chen Xiang's great-aunt would tell him?

      Part 2
Some families have topics that everyone avoids talking about. Maybe it's the time Grandpa's fake teeth fell into the noodles or when the baby walked around wearing Dad's underwear on her head. In my family, it was more serious Nobody wanted to talk about my mom. But I was sick of not knowing what had happened to her. I finally got some answers at family dinner one night.
“Chen Xiang," said my great-aunt, the Queen Mother of the West. “To make a long story short, your mom's an immortal. But she fell in love and got married to your dad, who is human. That's against the rules of heaven. Then she gave birth to you. That's doubly against the rules of heaven."
 “What do you mean I'm against the rules!" I yelled.
My great-aunt said, “Gods and immortals aren't supposed to have children with-"
"Humans!” roared Uncle Erlang. "So I put her under Mount Hua!"
"What?" I stood and clenched my fists. “You killed my mom because she's my mom? Because she had me?"
“No, Chen Xiang," said the Jade Emperor, my great-uncle. "Uncle Erlang didn't kill her. He just locked her up." He waved his hand as though this were nothing. "He also took the magic Lotus Lamp. But that was ours. He was just returning it to us. You remember the lamp, don't you?"
“I… I think so, " I said haltingly. A memory came flashing back. "My mom and I were on a boat uncle Erlang attacked her and took the lamp!" I stood up as the truth dawned on me. My mom was alive! I had to rescue her!
"But we don't have the Lotus Lamp anymore," said my great-aunt. "That thief of a monkey took it!” She turned to me. "Of course you remember the lamp, Chen Xiang. It's very powerful. It's lovely, and also priceless."
“So is my mom," I said. I crossed to the door.
“Chen Xiang," cried my great- aunt, reaching toward me. "Don't go."
“What? Is leaving against the rules?" I sneered. I hated Uncle Erlang. He had stolen my mother from me. I hated them all They had let it happen. I slipped through the door, shut it, and ran down the hall.
My great-uncle yelled, "Chen Xiang! Come back here!"
I pushed through a door, then another, then a third. Unlike the rest of the palace, this hall did not have silk wall hangings and paintings of picnics under peach trees. I was heading the right way! I hurried toward the back exit in the servants' quarters. I bet none of my high and mighty relatives had ever been there.
 “Chen Xiang!" yelled Uncle Erlang from a distance. "I should put you under the mountain next to your mom!"
 “Erlang," I heard my great-uncle scold. “That attitude is not helping!"
I entered the servants' quarters. No one was there. Someone had left a sword by the door. I grabbed it and ran outside.
Kunlun Mountain was a maze of pathways hidden by fog. I chose one that would lead to Dad's house. He would be overjoyed to find out that Mom was alive!
I ran for hours. When I finally arrived, it was just as I remembered it. I knew that Erlang would surely think to look for me at Dad's house, so I didn't knock on the door. I stood in the woods nearby and hooted like an owl six times, hoping Dad would remember our secret call and come to meet me. Yes, I sounded and felt like an idiot.
For a long time, nothing happened. Had he forgotten? Then I saw Dad come running into the woods toward me. "Chen Xiang!" he cried, hugging me.
"Dad, Mom's alive! Uncle Erlang has trapped her inside Mount Hua. We have to rescue her!"
"Son, about that..." He looked down, not wanting to meet my eyes.
"Dad, you knew!" I accused him. "Why didn't you tell me ! Why haven't we tried to save her! Erlang did a terrible thing. He's the worst!"
“Son, this is not the first time something like this has happened," he said, hugging me again. "I don't want her to die or to see you broken as Erlang was broken."
I pulled away. “What are you talking about?"
                Question     
Why did Chen Xiang think that his father already knew that Chen Xiang's mother was alive?
1. Chen Xiang's father said he didn't want to talk about Chen Xiang's mother.
2. When Chen Xiang told his father that they had to rescue his mother, his father said, “Son, about that ..." and didn't want to look him in the eyes.
3. When Chen Xiang told his father that they had to rescue his mother, his father said, “Son, about that …" and headed for the door.
4. Chen Xiang's father told him that he already knew about the imprisonment of Chen Xiang's mother.
  
Part 3  
As I listened to my dad, I felt that everything I knew about my life had been a lie. My dad tried to explain why he hadn't rescued my mom or told me she was alive He said it was because of Erlang, the worst brother ever. Apparently, everything I was going through, Erlang went through the same thing. The only difference is that he went through it 20 years earlier.
“Erlang's mother also married a mortal, like your mom married me." Dad explained, "An immortal and a human can't marry. It's against the rules. After she gave birth to your mom and Erlang, the Jade Emperor trapped her inside Mount Tao. Sound familiar? Erlang was just like you."
 “Don't say that," I growled. “I would never trap someone inside a mountain like he has trapped his sister. He's a monster! And if the Jade Emperor did that, he's a monster too!"
 “Erlang tore open the mountain to save his mother," said Dad. "He freed her for a moment. Then the Jade Emperor sent ten suns to kill her. They burned her to death. Erlang saw it all It destroyed him. From that day on he has never broken a rule." Dad wiped his eyes. "People call him the God of Purity.  He is pure. But he has no love, no compassion, not even for himself. Love and compassion were burned out of him." He put his arm around my shoulder, saying, "Don't go to Mount Hua. The Jade Emperor will kill your mother. You will be destroyed as Erlang was destroyed."
“I will never be like Erlang!" I shouted. I pulled away from my dad and headed toward Mount Hua alone.
After weeks of travel, I arrived. But where was she? Which mountain peak held her? My quest felt hopeless. “Mom!" I cried and fell to my knees.
I felt a hand on my elbow, helping me up. I stood up and looked into the flashing eyes of the Firebolt God. His kind face wrinkled in concern as I told him my story.
 “Young man," he said after I finished. “You aren't ready to fight your uncle yet. But Ill train you if you agree to work harder than you ever have before."
After years of studying magic and kung fu, I asked the Firebolt God when I could continue my quest to save my mother.
“One more task," he answered, beckoning me to follow him. We hiked past a fiery lake. Steam rolled off the water. Hot mud bubbled.
"This is one of my favorite picnic spots," he said, breathing deeply. Everything smelled of rotten eggs.
Then he pointed at a boulder on top of the mountain. “Push this boulder into the lake," he said. “Then you will get the axe you need to free your mother."
The boulder was the size of my dad's house! Every day I hiked past the fiery, stinky lake and pushed the boulder. After countless weeks of trying, I gave it a mighty push and a kick. The Firebolt God cheered as the boulder rolled downhill into the fiery lake. Water and flames splashed. A metal axe popped up, and I caught it!
 “Now you're ready," said the Firebolt God. He clasped me on the shoulder. “You have the axe. Now find the Monkey King. He'll help you. Ask to use his magic Lotus Lamp."
"That's our lamp!" I shouted in surprise. “He stole it from my family!  Tell me where I can find him!" I thanked the Firebolt God for training me and left.
When I found the Monkey King, I asked for my family's lamp and told him my story.
"“I'm smart enough not to deal with other people's problems, kid," said the Monkey King. “You're on your own!" He waved to me as he floated away on a cloud.
“But the Firebolt God said you'd  help!" I shouted after him. “I’ll save my mom without you! I'll save her no matter what!"
I still couldn't find my mom. Finally, I had to ask the one who had locked her up-Uncle Erlang.
      Question
 Erlang thinks everyone should follow the rules or be harshly punished. Chen Xiang thinks some punishments are too terrible even if the rules have been broken. Who is right? Present your argument.
    
  Part 4
I searched for Uncle Erlang and finally found him hiking with his dog on Mount Hua. I yelled across a canyon to ask him where my mom was trapped. He wasn't happy to see me, to put it mildly. And that's how I got here, fighting my uncle on the cliffs of Mount Hua.
I raise my axe and crouch under the overhang. I hold my breath.
Uncle Erlang is quiet now after complaining about me not thanking him. I can't tell where he is. I peek out and look for him. I see his fierce dog on the path ahead. I hope it remembers I gave it some of my dessert. All of a sudden, the dog leaps on me and bites my leg. "Ouch!" Awful beast has long teeth and a short memory!
Then I hear a battle cry, a scream from the path behind me. Uncle Erlang sneaks closer while his dog pins me down. Spear raised, third eye about to blast my head off, Uncle Erlang pounds toward me on the path. I can't go anywhere. I'm going to die!
But suddenly the Monkey King appears on a cloud above me. He lights the magic Lotus Lamp. A golden beam shines from the lamp onto my forehead. Time slows and gravity becomes my toy. Or to put it another way-I become very fast and very strong.
I pry my leg free from the dog's grip. I knock aside Uncle Erlang's spear. It clatters down the mountain in slow motion. I scamper up the cliff above Uncle Erlang's head. I raise the axe, thinking, Should I split Erlang like a watermelon or like a log? I'm filled with the power of revenge. Then I remember what my dad said about my uncle. No love. No compassion, not even for himself. Destroyed. Dad said Erlang was like me. 
I don't swing the axe. Uncle Erlang looks up at me. Our eyes lock in understanding. He points to a cave down the mountain, where two peaks come together. I see that the cave's entrance is blocked by a wall of stone. After a moment, time resets. Uncle Erlang and his dog run away.
Then I climb down the mountain, heading toward the place where Uncle Erlang has pointed.
“Mom?" I call when I reach the cave.
I hear a faint answer from inside the mountain. I look up at the sun. There's just one sun in the sky, not ten. I hope for the best and raise my axe. I bring it down as hard as I can. The mountains shake. I throw myself to the ground and hold on. Rocks tear apart with a grinding noise and create a wall of dust. I cover my head with my hands, hoping I am luckier than Uncle Erlang. Hoping the Jade Emperor doesn't want to repeat history.
 “Chen Xiang?" I hear my mother's voice. And then she's right in front of me. I drop the axe and run to her. We hug each other tightly for a long time. Then we start the journey toward home to see Dad. The three of us will live happily ever-Wait a minute! The Monkey King still has our lamp!
    Question  
Compare and contrast Chen Xiang with his uncle Erlang. How are they alike? How are they different?
                      Answers
Q: What did the hungry hunters think of Shennong?
A: They wondered if Shennong was an ox or a man.
Q: Why did Chen Xiang think that his father already knew that Chen Xiang's mother was alive?  
A: When Chen Xiang told his father that they had to rescue his mother, his father said, “Son, about that …”and didn't want to look him in the eyes.
                       The Dragon Gate

        The Dragon Gate is a place of magic. A great hero made it long, long ago. His name was Da Yu. 
       Da Yu was super strong. He had a magic sword, too. Da Yu split a mountain with his magic sword. He made a pathway. It is called the Dragon Gate. The Yellow River flows through it.
Every spring, water flows from the top of the mountain. It flows into the river. The water makes wild waves. The waves roar like thunder. The sound scares all the animals on the mountain,
The carp swim in the river. They are not afraid of the sound. The carp are small and brave. They jump over the waves. They jump toward the Dragon Gate.
The carp dream of diving over to the highest wave. They dream of jumping onto the highest cloud. They dream of riding on colorful clouds. They dream of making it to-the Dragon Gate. There, a miracle waits for them.
The carp begin to jump over the wild waves. But one after another, the carp begin to fall. They cannot go any higher. They cannot reach the clouds. They cannot get to the Dragon Gate.
Soon there is just one little golden carp left. He is brave. He will not give up. He jumps over the waves. He jumps higher and higher and higher. He jumps over the highest wave. Then he rides along the top of the wave!
Finally, he jumps across to a cloud! He has made it to the Dragon Gate! He can see colorful clouds. He can see the sky. It's beautiful!
Then the little carp feels strange. He looks back at his tail. It flaps and flaps and flaps!
The little carp's tail sparks. It grows and sparks again. His tail is on fire!
Lightning and thunder boom in the sky. It begins to rain. The rain puts out the fire on the carp's tail. 
 The little carp looks back again. His fish tail is gone. His body has changed. Golden scales cover his giant body. He is not a fish anymore! 
The little carp has turned into a golden dragon! He is made of magic! It's a miracle!
The little carp proves that dreams can come true. You just have to work hard and never give up!
                     Question
What do you dream of doing? What will you do to make sure your dreams come true?
                    
                  Rat's Wedding
Papa Rat loves his daughter very much. He wants to find the best husband for her.
“My daughter's husband should be smart and strong," Papa Rat thinks. "He should be the strongest of all!"
One summer day, while out looking for food, Papa Rat feels Sun's strong rays.
“Sun is the strongest!" Papa Rat says. “He will make the best husband."
Papa Rat goes to see Sun.
“Sun, my daughter needs a strong husband. You are the strongest," Papa Rat tells Sun.
“Thank you, Papa Rat," says Sun. “But Cloud is stronger than me. He can cover my light."
Papa Rat watches Cloud block Sun's light.
“Cloud is the strongest!" Papa Rat says. “He will make the best husband."
Papa Rat goes to see Cloud.
“Cloud, my daughter needs a strong husband. You are the strongest," Papa Rat tells Cloud.
“Thank you, Papa Rat," says Cloud. “But Wind is stronger than me. He can blow me away."
Papa Rat sees Wind push Cloud through the sky.
"Wind is the strongest!" Papa Rat says. “"He will make the best husband."  
So Papa Rat goes to see Wind.
“Wind, my daughter needs a strong husband. You are the strongest," Papa Rat tells Wind.
“Thank you, Papa Rat," says Wind. “But Wall is stronger than me. I cannot blow through him."
Papa Rat watches as Wall stops Wind.
“Wall is the strongest!" Papa Rat says. "He will make the best husband."
So Papa Rat goes to see Wall.  
“Wall, my daughter needs a strong husband, You are the strongest," Papa Rat tells Wall. 
 "Thank you, Papa Rat," says Wall. "But Mouse is stronger than me. If Mouse bites me, I will break."
Papa Rat watches Mouse bite Wall. Mouse is so powerful!
“Mouse is the strongest!” Papa Rat says. "He will make the best husband."
So Papa Rat goes to see Mouse. “Mouse, my daughter is beautiful and smart," says Papa Rat. “She needs a strong husband. You are the strongest."
“Yes, I am," says Mouse. "I would love to marry your daughter. ”
Mouse married Papa Rat's daughter the very next day. And they lived happily ever after.
 Question
Which sentence is true?
1. Cloud is stronger than Wind.  
2. Wall can cover Sun.
3. Mouse can bite Wall.  
4. Wind can bite mouse.

                 Ox's Big Mix-up  
A long, long time ago, times were tough.
“My rice is not growing," cried the farmer.
“My cabbage is not growing," cried another farmer.
“My beans are not growing," cried another farmer.
“We have no food for dinner," cried his wife.
“I'm hungry!" cried their son. The Emperor of Heaven heard the people's cries. He felt bad for them. He wanted to help.
Ox lived in heaven, too. Ox was a hard worker. Ox was honest. The Emperor trusted Ox to help him. “Ox!” called the Emperor. “Go down to the people. Tell them that they must work hard. Then they can have one meal every three days." “Yes, I'll do it right away!" said Ox.
Ox started to run. He ran and ran and ran. He ran so far that he forgot what he had to say.
Was it something about three meals and one day? He could not remember.
Finally, Ox got to the people.  
He told them, "You must work hard. Then you can have three meals every day."
The people cheered. They began to work. They worked and worked and worked. Even when they were tired, they worked.
The Emperor asked Ox, “What did you tell them?"
"I told them to work hard. Then they would get three meals a day," answered Ox.
“No!" said the Emperor. “It was one meal every three days!"
The Emperor remembered something.
Ox was a hard worker. Ox was honest.  But Ox was not good at talking to others.
“What can I do?" the Emperor worried. “The people can't work hard enough. They won't make enough food. Not by themselves. They will think that I lied."  
The Emperor got angry. He wanted Ox to pay for his mistake. He kept Ox in the human world. 
 Ox had to help the people. He helped with farm work. He helped grow food. The people were able to eat three meals a day!
The Emperor never let Ox back into heaven. That is why oxen still work hard in the fields today.
               Question 
What is something that you have to work hard to achieve?
            
           Monkeys Try to Save the Moon  
Little Monkey plays in the forest.
He jumps. He hangs from a tree. He swings from tree to tree. He swings over a well.
He sees a glow from the well. “Oh no!" cries Little Monkey. “The moon fell into the well!"
Big Monkey hears Little Monkey. She swings over from a nearby tree. She looks into the well.
“Oh no! You're right," cries Big Monkey. “The moon fell into the well!"
Bigger Monkey swings over, too. He looks into the well.
“Oh my!" he cries. "The moon fell into the well! What can we do?"
Other monkeys hear the noise. They are curious. They wonder what is going on. They swing over to the well.
"Oh no!" the first monkey cries. 
 “Oh no!" the second monkey cries.
“Oh my!" the third monkey cries. “The moon fell into the well!" they all howl.
“What can we do?" asks Little Monkey.
“We have to get it out!" yells Big Monkey.
“Let's get to it!" says Bigger Monkey. He climbs up the tree next to the well He wraps his tail around a branch. Bigger Monkey hangs upside down. He holds onto Big Monkey's feet with his hands.  
Big Monkey hangs upside down. She holds Little Monkey's feet with her hands.
Little Monkey hangs upside down. He holds another monkey's feet with his hands.
Monkey by monkey, they form a chain. The chain reaches all the way down into the well.
Soon, they can almost touch the water in the well. They see the moon in the water. It looks very close!
Stretch, monkeys!
Just then, Bigger Monkey looks up at the sky.
“Wait a minute! The moon is not in the well!" he cries. “It is in the sky! It is shining bright."
“We've been so foolish," laugh the other monkeys.
The moon was never in the well. It only looked like it was in the well. It was just the moon's reflection in the water!
                  Question
If the monkeys were able to see the moon's reflection, does the story take place in the daytime or nighttime?
               
                The Four Dragons
        
Once, in ancient China, there was no rain.
“No rain!” the farmers cried.  
Months later they cried, “Still no rain!"
Years later they cried, “No rain! Still no rain!"
The farmers cried to the Jade Emperor. They asked for rain. But they did not get it.
Four great dragons lived in the East China Sea. They were Long Dragon, Yellow Dragon, Black Dragon, and Pearl Dragon.
The dragons felt sad for the people.
"We must help them!" said Pearl Dragon. “What can we do?"
The four dragons looked at the sea. The sea was filled with water. They could scoop up the water and fly high into the sky. They would make it rain! “We can save the people!" cried Black Dragon.
The dragons dove into the sea. They scooped up all the water they could carry.
Then they flew high into the sky. Black Dragon flew north. Long Dragon flew west. Pearl Dragon flew south. Yellow Dragon flew to the center of China.
They spilled water from their wings. They spilled water from their tails. They spilled water from their mouths. Water fell everywhere!
The people looked up. They did not see the dragons. They only saw the rain.
“Finally!" cried the people. "Rain!"  
They were so happy. Everyone ran out to enjoy the rain. They opened their mouths to taste the cool water.
The people bowed to the sky. They thanked Jade Emperor.
Jade Emperor saw the rain falling. He wondered who had changed his world.
He saw the four dragons up in the sky. He got very angry at them. He called out to the Mountain God.
"Jail them!" the Emperor said. “Trap the dragons inside four mountains!"
The Mountain God trapped the dragons. They could not escape. 
Then something strange happened.
The East China Sea split into four rivers. They flowed from the four mountains.
People say this is how the four great rivers of China were created. They gave water to the people. The four great dragons saved the people of China forever!
                   Question
What do you like to do on rainy days?
        
                   Answers 
Q: Which sentence is true?
A:Mouse can bite Wall.
Q: If the monkeys were able to see the moon's reflection, does the story take place in the daytime or nighttime?
A: It takes place during the nighttime.

           Pangu Separates the Sky and the Earth
       It was the beginning. There was no sky. There was no earth. The universe was a big black egg.
Inside the egg it was dark. It was still. Something grew inside the black egg. It was not a baby bird. It was not a baby snake. What was it?
Something grew for 18,000 years. Something slept. Something dreamed. It was the dream of the universe.
      Finally, something stopped dreaming inside the black egg. Something woke up. It was Pangu! In the darkness, his eyes shone like the sun and moon. He stretched. Bump! He hit his head on the egg. Pangu yawned. Good morning, Pangu!
Pangu moved around in the darkness. He was too big for the egg. He felt trapped inside. He tried to break free.
He reached out his hand and touched something sharp. Ouch!  
It was an axe! Great! It was just what he needed!
Swing! Pangu hit the egg with his axe. The egg got a crack.
Swing! Pangu hit it again. Pangu broke the egg!
He took a deep breath. He pushed up. Above him it became light and airy. He pushed higher and higher. It became the sky.
Pangu pushed down. Below him it was dark and heavy. He pushed lower and lower. It became the earth.
Pangu did not let the egg close. He pushed apart the sky and the earth. He kept pushing for 18,000 years. The sky became thicker.
It spread out. The earth became thicker. It got bigger.
The more Pangu grew, the farther apart he pushed the earth and the sky. The sky grew very high. The earth grew very big. In between the earth and the sky, Pangu grew very tall. He spread the earth and the sky apart once more.
Finally, Pangu got tired. He died. Then...his head and body became the Five Sacred Mountains. They are Mount Tai in Shandong, Mount Heng in Hunan, Mount Hua in Shanxi, Mount Heng in Shanxi, and Mount Song in Henan. Pangu's eyes turned into the sun and the moon. His blood changed into water. It filled rivers and seas. His hair turned into stars.
The universe and Pangu became one.
                       Question
 How do you think the universe began?


         The Jade Emperor's Zodiac Calendar 

Let's take a trip. We will go to a place before time. The Jade Emperor rules over the Heavens. He is kind. He is wise.
The Jade Emperor wants a way to tell time. He makes hours and days. He makes months and years. Each year has twelve months. Twelve years make one cycle.
He wants to name each of the years in one cycle. He is not sure what to name them. Then he sees the animals.
“I will have a race!" he says. “The first twelve animals to finish the race will have a year named after them!"
The animals hear about the race. They can't wait!
Cat lives next door to Rat.
 “We could win!” Cat tells Rat.
"I will wake up extra early," says Rat. "I will be a winner."
 “Wake me up early, too," Cat says to Rat. “We can go together."
The next day, Rat wakes up extra early. He is very excited. He runs straight to the race. He forgets all about Cat!
Rat gets to the start of the race. He sees a lot of animals there. Ox is there. Horse and Pig are there. Even Dragon is there, along with others!
“Oh no!" thinks Rat. "Those animals are much bigger. They are much stronger. I am tiny. I am a bad swimmer. I can't run fast."
Rat is smart, though. He has an idea. Rat runs up to Ox.
“Can you help me?" he asks. "I can ride on your head. I will sing songs in your ear." Rats are smart and charming, too.
 “Okay," says Ox. “I like songs. That sounds good."
Rat climbs on Ox's head. He sings and sings. Ox swims and swims.
Ox is the first to climb out of the river. He runs toward the finish line.
 “We are going to win!" shouts Ox.
Rat jumps off Ox's head. He runs ahead!
 “Yes!” cheers the clever Rat. “I will be the FIRST!”
And he is! Jade Emperor names the first year after Rat. Ox is the second.  Tiger is the third. Then comes Rabbit, Dragon, Snake, Horse, Sheep, Monkey, Rooster, Dog, and Pig.
Rat walks home with the first prize.
Cat wakes up late. He runs outside. He sees Rat with the prize. Cat gets very angry. Rat did not wake him! That is why cats have been chasing after rats ever since.
                     Question  
What zodiac animal are you?
            
        Kua Fu Chases the Sun  
Long ago, there was a giant named Kua Fu. He was giant enough to touch the sky. He could cross Mount Erlang with one giant step.
Kua Fu was brave. He was also kind.
One year, the weather was very hot. Some rivers dried up. Plants died. The people were very thirsty.
Kua Fu wanted to help. He looked up at the Sun. It moved across the sky. It baked the ground below.
Kua Fu wanted to catch the Sun. Then he could stop it from baking the ground. That night, Kua Fu found a tall peach tree. It was so tall that it reached heaven. It looked like a good tree to catch the Sun. He pulled up the tree. Then he ate the peaches.
When the Sun rose, Kua Fu picked up the tree. He ran fast. He ran hard. Mountains shook. Wind storms blew. The gods watched.
“Kua Fu is very fast!" they said.
 “Can he catch the Sun?"
The Sun wasn't worried. Every morning, it came up. Every day it crossed the sky. Every evening it set.
Every day, Kua Fu ran. He ran, and his shoes filled with dirt. He stopped to empty his shoes. The dirt that fell out of his shoes turned into a hill. Then Kua Fu ran up Dirty Shoes Hill.
Kua Fu ran every day. He stretched up his arms to reach the sky. But he still didn't catch the Sun.  
After many days, Kua Fu got thirsty. He went to the nearest stream. He drank the stream dry! But it was not enough. He was still thirsty!
He ran to the Yellow River. He drank it dry, too. But he was still thirsty!
He drank every stream and lake he passed. He drank them all dry.
Kua Fu pushed on. He jumped as s high as he could. He jumped at the Sun. He was good at playing ball with giants and shorter people. But he couldn't catch the biggest ball of all. He couldn't catch the Sun. He felt very mad. He roared! He shook his fist at the Sun! He threw the peach tree at the Sun! Then he fell to the ground, tired to death.  
The Sun set that night, just like-if always did. When it rose, the Gods saw that Kua Fu had turned into a mountain.
The peach tree he had carried had become a grove of peach trees. The Sun no longer baked the ground.
Today that land is called Denglin. It is lush. It is beautiful. Its peaches are sweet and juicy. They can quench the thirst of anyone who tries to chase the Sun!
                         Question 
You decide! The story says Kua Fu fell down and was tired to death. Why do you think he turned into a mountain?
                      
                The Snail Girl
Xie Duan was a poor farmer. He lived alone. He had no family. Xie Duan wished he had a wife. He wanted a family.
Xie Duan's neighbors were friendly. They liked him a lot. They thought he was a good friend. They thought he was a hard worker. He was all of those things.
Xie Duan worked on the farm every day. He woke up early. He fed the chickens and other animals. He tilled the field. He picked the crops. He worked until late at night.  
Every night, he was tired. He was too tired to cook. He was too tired to clean his house. He just wanted to go to sleep.
One night, Xie Duan was walking home. He saw a snail on the road. Xie Duan picked it up. He took it home with him.
The snail needed water. Xie Duan put water in a pot. Then he put the snail in, too.
The next night, Xie Duan came home late again. When he walked into his house, he found a big surprise! 
 The house was clean and neat!  
There was a hot meal waiting for him!  
“Oh! How kind of my neighbors!" Xie Duan thought.
“They cleaned my house. They cooked a hot meal for me."
The next morning, Xie Duan went to thank his neighbors. Who had cleaned his house, and cooked for him? No one knew what happened.  
The next night, Xie Duan came home late again. A clean home and a hot meal were waiting for him! It was the same on the third night. It was the same on the fourth and fifth nights, too!
Xie Duan really wanted to solve the mystery.
The next day, he went home early. He snuck up to his house. He hid below the window outside his kitchen. Then he peeked inside.
Xie Duan could not believe what he saw! A pretty girl was cooking at his stove!
“Who are you?” Xie Duan cried. “Why are you cooking for me? Why are you taking care of my house?"
"I am the snail," the girl told him. She pointed to the little pot.
Xie Duan looked at the pot. It was empty. The snail was gone.
“You were very kind to me," said the Snail Girl. “You saved me. I wanted to thank you!"
Xie Duan felt thankful too.
The Snail Girl kept taking care of Xie Duan. Every day, he farmed. Every day, she cooked and cleaned. 
 Xie Duan and the Snail Girl fell in love. They got married. Xie Duan was not lonely anymore. The two of them lived happily ever after.
                      Question 
 Xie Duan's kindness was repaid by having his wish come true. What have you wished for that came true?

            Jingwei Fills the Sea

The sun shone on the calm sea. Princess Nu Wa smiled at its reflection. It looked like a gold pebble in the water.
Nu Wa walked down to the beach. She slid her small boat into the water. She rowed out to the sea. 
 Suddenly, clouds hid the sun. Birds returned to the beach. Rain poured down. A strong wind blew across the sea. The wind made the waves rise. Higher! Higher! Waves pounded her boat.
The strong waves tipped over Nu Wa's boat. The boat sank into the sea.
Princess Nu Wa sank too. She fought against the waves. They seemed higher than the sun. She reached upward. Was she swimming? Was she flying?  
Nu Wa turned into a beautiful bird! She spread her wings. She flew high above the water.
“Jingwei! Jingwei!" the princess bird cried. That's how Princess Nu Wa got her new name.
Jingwei was mad at the sea. It had sunk her boat!
She cried her name as she flew,  "Jingwei! Jingwei!"
She picked up a stick in her beak. She dropped the stick into the sea. 
On the second day, Jingwei dropped a rock into the sea.
On the third day, Jingwei found a gold pebble. It looked like the sun. She dropped it into the sea.
Day after day, Jingwei dropped a pebble, a rock, or a stick into the sea.
The sea laughed at Jingwei. “Your pebbles can never fill me up! Not in a million years!" Its waves grew higher. They almost reached Jingwei.
She flew higher. "I will still try!" Jingwei cried. "I will never give up!" 
 She flew in the sunshine. "I will fill you up, Sea! I will stop you from sinking any more boats!
Jingwei never gives up. She is small. The sea is big and strong. Still, Jingwei does not stop. Every day, she makes the long, tiring trip. Every day, she drops a pebble, a rock, or a stick into the sea.
On calm days, she smiles at the sun's reflection in the sea.
Jingwei teaches a lesson. She shows us to never give up even when it is hard.
                  Question 
Should you keep trying to reach a goal that is nearly impossible? Or should you choose another goal?  Explain.
        
                 A Masterpiece in the Making

Long ago, the writer Zuo Si lived in a village in the state of Qi. His family was poor, but they were rich in knowledge. They studied the teachings of Confucius. Zuo Si's father was in charge of the royal records of the Wei Kingdom.  Zuo Si liked to play word games with his sister. She grew up to become a famous writer. When she moved to the capital city of Luoyang, Zuo Si decided to move there, too. Zuo Si was a quiet man. He spent most of his time at home, writing. If Zuo Si had a thought, he would write it down immediately. 
“Oh, What a spark of inspiration!" Zuo Si would cry.
“Quick! Write it down. Write it down. Write it down."
He would grab a pen and paper and write down his thoughts. Soon his home became very messy. There were pens and paper everywhere! But Zuo Si's father was not impressed with his son. One day, Zuo Si overheard his father say,“ My son is not very bright. When I was young, I was not like that at all."  This made Zuo Si sad. But it motivated him, too.
He decided to work harder. He would read and write even more. He would write a masterpiece!  
"I shall spend the next ten years writing," said Zuo Si. "I will call my work Ode to the Three Capitals." People were doubtful. No one believed him.
“What is this loner going to do?" asked a neighbor when he heard the news.
“Oh, he says he's going to hide away for ten years and write a  masterpiece. Ha!" said another. “Zuo Si can say what he wants. It will never happen. He's just going to stay locked inside like he does every other day," said a neighbor. 
Over the next ten years, Zuo Si continued to run around inside his messy home. He grabbed pens and paper and wrote note after note. 
He tossed aside many of them. Notes were piled in mounds all around his home. He would just grab more paper and pens and write some more.
“Oh, a spark of inspiration!" Zuo Si would cry.
“Quick! Write it down. Write it down. Write it down."
Finally, at the end of ten years, Zuo Si finished.
His Ode to the Three Capitals described the daily life in the three of the people there. Zuo Si wrote about the best way to run a state. He believed it was through goodness, rather than force.
Some important scholars read the book. They wrote introductions to it. They praised Zuo Si's ideas. Zuo Si's book became very popular. 
The town was surprised by Zuo Si's success.
“Did you hear?"  asked one man. “Zuo Si finished his book."
“It took him ten years, but he finally did it!" said another, "I hear it's a masterpiece," said the neighbor.
“Everyone wants to read it!" said the lady across the road.
Many people wanted to read the book. Writers, poets, nobles, even the royal court had heard about it! They didn't just want to read it, they wanted their own copies, too. 
Because of the book's popularity, there was a high demand for paper. At the time, paper was still a fairly new invention. It had only been invented in 100 BCE, just a few hundred years earlier.  The demand for Zuo Si's book caused paper prices in Luoyang to go up. 
Today, the phrase “Paper is expensive in Luoyang" describes the popularity of a new book that everybody wants. When writing about bestselling books, reporters often use this idiom.
                           Question
  What was it about Zuo Si's book that made it so popular?
                   
                   A Quick Success  

In 221 BCE, Qin Shi Huang created the first Chinese Empire. He became the First Emperor of China. 
A storyteller told Qin Shi Huang an interesting tale about Nuwa, the Great Mother Goddess. This is what the storyteller said:
In the beginning of the world, Earth and Heaven were connected. Heaven was held up by four pillars. Mount Buzhou was one of these posts.
Gong Gong was the Chinese water god. He got into a battle with Zhu Rong, the god of fire.
"I am the most important god!" Gong Gong roared.
"Silly fool, I am much more important than you!" Zhu Rong raged.
"You are the fool!"
"I will burn you to a mist!"
"I will drown you and put you out forever!"
The two gods yelled louder and louder. Their angry words turned into a real fight. Both gods were strong and powerful. The Earth felt every punch and every kick. Earthquakes shook the ground. Tidal waves flooded the beaches. lava burst from volcanoes.
Zhu Rong proved to be the stronger god. Gong Gong was crushed when he lost the battle. He smashed his head against Mount Buzhou in anger. He hit the mountain over and over again. The Heavens began to fall to the Earth. The land was flooded. People everywhere were suffering because of Gong Gong and Zhu Rong's fight. 
Nuwa felt sorry for the people of Earth. She had created all of them!
"How can this happen to my people? They did nothing wrong!" Nuwa cried. "I must find a way to fix this mess."  
Nuwa had an idea. She searched the Earth for five colored stones. The stones had special powers.
"Blue for water." Nuwa grabbed the blue stone.
"White for metal. Red for fire." Nuwa picked up two more stones.
"Black for wood," Nuwa continued. "And finally, yellow for the earth."  
She melted the stones together to form a paste. Then she spent nine days patching up the skies. And that is why the sky has always been full of color. 
 Qin Shi Huang listened closely to the story of Nuwa's stones.
“It is believed one of those stones fell down to Earth," the storyteller  said. “Some say it is on Rong Cheng Mountain." "If that is true, then I will be the one to find it!" Qin Shi Huang promised.
Qin Shi Huang was determined to find the stone. He believed it would help him build a strong empire. And so, his search began.
Qin Shi Huang demanded that a road to the mountain be built. (The emperor was famous for his building projects. One of them was the Great Wall of China.)
Qin Shi Huang took an army of thousands to Rong Cheng Mountain.
After a long search, Qin Shi Huang found the stone on the mountain! He held a sacred ceremony to worship it.
Soon after, the empire did become stronger and more peaceful! Qin Shi Huang believed that the sacred stone was the reason!
He ordered poems and songs to be written about his journey. One poet wrote, “Thousands of horses on the royal road; victory was attained when Shi Huang worshipped the stone."
Everyone wanted the poem to be remembered. It was passed down from parents to children. Everyone liked it very much.
Over a thousand years later, a writer of popular Chinese operas heard the poem. He loved the story about the emperor's trip to find the sacred stone. It inspired him. He wrote the phrase “Instant victory upon arrival on a horse." He used it in one of his earliest operas.
The idiom “Instant victory upon arrival on a horse" means to succeed very quickly at something.
                   Question
 Why do you think Qin Shi Huang built new roads during his time as  leader of China?
  
               Discovering an Elephant

In a time before all the surprises had been discovered and catalogued, six best friends lived in a village at the end of a desert. These six men were blind, so their lives were filled with more surprises than most. They helped each other every day and never, ever disagreed.
One day, they heard that an animal from very far away was visiting the village. The creature was called an elephant. None of the six blind men had ever met an elephant. They each had different ideas about it.
The biggest of the men suggested, "I believe the elephant is the biggest animal."
The oldest of the friends said, "I bet that elephants live a long time." 
The smartest man exclaimed, "I'm sure elephants have excellent memories!"
"I hope the elephant is gentle enough to pet," said the kindest man.
“But it probably doesn't have much hair," added the bald blind man. The man who was the most adventurous suggested they meet the elephant. Then they walked through the village to the main square.
The kindest blind man and his friends were happy that the elephant was gentle enough to pet. One by one, they approached the animal.
The most adventurous man touched the elephant's trunk. He thought for a few moments and said, “So, this is what an elephant is like! An elephant is long and rounded like a snake!"
The oldest man touched the elephant's ear. He was confused because he felt something different from the first man. He said, "I am sorry my friend, you are wrong! An elephant is like a big fan! It is large, curved on the side, and wrinkled."  
The biggest man touched the elephant's side. He also disagreed. "It hurts me to say it, but you are both wrong," he said. "An elephant is like a wall because it is tall, big, and strong."
The smartest man touched the elephant's leg. He said, "What in the world are you three touching?  An elephant is long, tall, and sturdy, like a pole!"
The bald blind man touched the elephant's tail. He exclaimed, “No, no, no, an elephant is long and thin, almost like a rope."
The kindest of the friends touched the elephant's tusk. “I am surprised, but you are all wrong," he said. “An elephant is smooth and hard, like a spear. I am sure of it."
The six blind men argued, each one believing that he was right. They became more and more upset because of the disagreement. "How can we be friends!" one of them said." We are all very different!"
 Just in time, a wise man walked by and asked about the commotion. “What's wrong?"
“We can't agree what the elephant is like," they admitted. One by one, each blind man described the elephant as seemed right to him. 
After hearing each of their explanations, the wise man said, “Everyone is correct. But you each touched a different part of the elephant. This is why you disagree with each other. None of you had the full picture."
“Oh!" all the blind men exclaimed. They finally understood, and they all laughed at their mistake together.
The idiom “Blind men touching an elephant" means that what you see or hear or touch or taste or smell is true, but it may not be all that there is. No one can be sure of knowing the entire truth.
                  Question
Have you ever thought something was true before finding out a new  detail that changed your mind?
     
         Fun, Friends, and a Future for Mengzi 

Mengzi was a great Chinese thinker. But his life was very different when he was a small boy. This is his story…
“Goodbye! Goodbye!" Mengzi called, waving to his friends. "I'm leaving for my new home!"
He got into the cart with his mother and his small bundle of belongings.
Mengzi felt a little sad, but he was also excited by the new adventure.  
Mengzi and his mother settled into a small house near a cemetery in the next town. He liked to play hide-and-seek with his new friends. 
He found Xiao Ming behind a tree, next to the fence by the cemetery. “Got you! I'm the best at this game!" boasted Mengzi. He rested against the fence and looked into the cemetery.
“Hey! What's that old man doing?" asked Mengzi.
“He's putting a bun in front of that marker," said Xiao Ming. “And bowing." All the friends laughed and pretended to do the same
After breakfast the next day, Mengzi asked, “May I have an extra bun, Mama?"
"We don't have many to spare," replied his mother. "But if you're still hungry, all right."
“Bye, Mama!" Mengzi yelled. Excited that he had a real bun, Mengzi raced to the cemetery, laughing.
Later, Mengzi's mother was walking by the cemetery and spotted Mengzi.  "Mengzi, what are you doing?" she asked. I'm bowing Mama. I'm offering my bun," replied Mengzi.
"Mengzi, you should not do those things. It is not our place. We do not know those people," his mother explained.
“But Mama, everyone else does it," he answered.
Mengzi's mother realized that this neighborhood was not right for her son. It was time to move again.  
“Goodbye! Goodbye!" Mengzi called, waving to the friends he was leaving behind. "I'm leaving for my new home!"
Mengzi felt a little sad, but he was also excited by the new adventure.  Mengzi and his mother moved near the town market. He liked to play catch with his new friends. “Got it, Xiao Liu! I'm the best at this game!" he boasted. He and his friends dashed around the market. They stopped and watched the merchants calling to the shoppers. “Shoes!" cried the shoemaker. "Hey, man, I've got shoes for your fat feet!"
“Cheap fabric!" shouted a woman. "Stop walking around in rags!"  
Mengzi's mother was surprised to hear Mengzi's voice while she was shopping for vegetables.
"Old Man, you haven't shaved. You look like a horse!" yelled Mengzi.  “Clean up. I have razors to sell," he pretended.
His friends laughed.
Mengzi's mother ran over to him. “Mengzi, you should not say those things! It is rude and wrong." "But Mama," Mengzi replied, "Everyone else does it."
Mengzi's mother realized that this neighborhood was not the right place for her son. It was time to move again.
“Goodbye! Goodbye!” Mengzi called, waving to the friends he was leaving behind. "I'm leaving for my new home!"
Mengzi felt a little sad, but he was also excited by the new adventure.  
Mengzi and his mother moved to a tiny hut next to a school. Mengzi's mother could not afford to send her son to school. Each day Mengzi peeked through the school's doorway or listened from an open window. He even climbed a tree to watch the students listen, learn, read, and write. Mengzi had no money for writing tools, so he used sticks to write on the ground.  
Mengzi made friends with the students. A girl named Xiao Mei taught him a simple poem. The students laughed when Mengzi mixed up the verses. But they helped correct him.
When Mengzi's mother went outside, she saw Mengzi and his friends playing school. Xiao Mei gave Mengzi a mock exam like the one she had taken in class.
His mother smiled and said, “Mengzi, these are the things that you should do."
“Yes, Mama, you're right. And I want to be the best at this game!"  replied Mengzi.
Even though Mengzi's mother did not have a lot of money, she led him to a future of wisdom and knowledge because a mother's love has no limits.
The idiom “Mengzi's mother makes three moves" refers to parents who do all they can to provide the best opportunities for their children.
                      Question
why wasn't Mengzi's mother happy with their second home?
       
                  The Sky Is Falling 

 Once upon a time, in ancient China, an artist named Dan You lived in the State of Qi. Dan You had a very big imagination He made up many wonderful fantasies, which he then drew and painted. Everyone in the village loved his artwork and praised his creativity.
However, there was a dark side to Dan You's imagination. He was always imagining that bad things would happen to him. He worried a lot.
Once, he made himself believe that the fish in the river by his house were growing legs! Not only that, but he was convinced that the fish were coming to steal his money!
His friend Li Xing said, "Dan You, those are not fish. They are tadpoles that want to grow into money-frogs! This is good fortune!"  
Dan You wasn't convinced. He just went to get his fishing net.   
One day Dan You had his worst fear yet. He was sitting outside when, out of the blue, he began to worry that the sky was going to fall. He thought that the sky would come crushing down on his head. He also started to fear that the ground would sink and bury him alive. This time, he was so afraid that he could no longer eat.
“Oh no!" Dan You yelled. “This is terrible! I am surely going to die!   The sky will fall and the ground will sink!"
That night, he tried to get some sleep. But the thoughts wouldn't stop.  His mind was racing. He couldn't sleep at all. Instead, he spent the rest of the night pacing around his house.
In the morning, Li Xing came by his house to check on his friend. "Dan You!" he called out." Are you home?"
Dan You walked toward the front door. Li Xing could hardly believe his eyes. Dan You looked… terrible! His hair was all messy. His clothes were wrinkled. His eyes were dark and heavy with tiredness.
"Oh my! What's the matter, Dan You? You look sick!" said Li Xing. "I couldn't sleep all night," replied Dan You. “The sky is going to fall, and the ground is going to sink! We're all going to die!" Dan You's eyes widened in fear.
Li Xing sighed inwardly. Here we go again, he thought.
Then he said, “No, Dan You! We will all be okay," Li Xing reassured his friend. "The sky is part of the air that is all around us. You don't need to worry about it falling!"
“But what about the sun, the moon, and the stars?" asked Dan You. "Those can surely fall out of the sky!"
"Don't worry, my friend," said Li Xing. “They are far, far away. They will never hurt anyone. You can relax! The ground won't sink either. It's all made of rock. You stand on this solid ground every day. Giant animals like elephants walk across it every day. Yet, it has never sunk before. You have nothing to worry about!"
Hearing all this, Dan You realized how foolish he had been. Li Xing was right. His fears were silly. Of course, the sky wasn't going to fall! Of course, the ground wasn't going to sink! Everything would be all right. Probably. Dan You continued to look at tadpoles with suspicion.
The idiom “The man of Qi feared the sky might fall" is used to describe someone who has an imaginary fear.
                         Question
  Have you ever been afraid of something that probably wasn't going to happen?
            
  
                  The Swan Feather

The Tang Dynasty was a I mighty Chinese empire. Every few years, nearby states would send messengers to the capital, Chang'an. The messengers brought gifts for the emperor.
One year during Emperor Taizong's rule, a man named Mian Bogao was selected as one of the messengers. His journey was long. Chang'an was a thousand miles away!
The gift he carried was a beautiful and rare white swan. He kept it in a metal cage to make sure that it didn't fly away.
That was Mian Bogao's biggest fear. He didn't know what he would do if the swan flew away. What would he tell the emperor? He hated the thought of losing or hurting the swan. So he took great care of it. He made sure it ate well and always had enough water to drink. 
One day, Mian Bogao was traveling through a beautiful, green valley. He noticed a shimmering lake in the distance. Feeling the summer heat, he decided to stop by the lake.
When he arrived at the lake, he got down from his horse. He drank some water. How refreshing! He dipped a metal bowl into the lake and filled it with water. He put the bowl in front of the cage, so the swan could drink.
Then he noticed that the swan had become very dirty. It had been sitting in a cage for a dozen or so days. Its beautiful feathers weren't white anymore. Not only was it dirty, but it also looked sad. Feeling sorry for the swan, Mian Bogao carefully let it out of the metal cage. He brought the swan over to the lake, so he could quickly wash it. However, as soon as Mian Bogao finished washing the swan, it spread its wings and flew away.
He tried to grab the swan, but only managed to get a feather. A single feather! This was exactly what he had feared. He had lost the swan! What was he going to do? He began to panic. Surely, Emperor Taizong would punish him. He might be arrested!
Mian Bogao had to decide whether or not to continue on to Chang'an. He thought about it for a while. On the one hand, he didn't have anything to give to the emperor. On the other hand, he had already come very far. He decided to continue on his way. He picked up the feather and continued on his journey.
When Mian Bogao finally arrived in Chang'an, he entered the palace. He took out the white swan feather and presented it to the emperor. The other people in the room gasped. They were shocked. Only a feather? For the emperor? Mian Bogao told the emperor he could explain.
After Mian Bogao told the whole story, the emperor smiled. Sure, the feather wasn't an impressive gift. But Mian Bogao had put in a lot of effort to get the feather to Chang'an. It showed that he worshipped the emperor. The gift of Mian Bogao's dedication was better than a swan. Emperor Taizong accepted the feather and rewarded Mian Bogao. 
Today, the Chinese use the phrase “A feather from a thousand miles away; although the gift is light, the affection is deep." Its meaning is similar to the English phrase, “It's the thought that counts." The value of a gift is not measured by how expensive it is. It is the actions and the attitude of the gift-giver that gives a gift its meaning.
                   Question
What is the best present you've ever received? Why do you consider it the best?

            The Yellow Rock Old Man  

Zhang Liang was born into a noble family. His grandfather and father had served the rulers of the Han state. When the Han fell to the Qin, Zhang Liang ran away and hid in Xia Pi. 
One day, Zhang Liang noticed an old man sitting on the edge of the Yu Shui bridge. Zhang Liang watched as the old man tossed his shoe over the bridge.
“Hey you! You there! Boy! Go get my shoe!" the old man yelled at Zhang Liang.
How rude, Zhang Liang thought. But he's an elder, I should respect and help him.
Zhang Liang got the shoe and handed it to the old man.
The old man stuck his foot out at Zhang Liang.
"Put it on! Put the shoe on my foot. What are you waiting for?" cried the old man.
Zhang Liang was shocked.
Such rudeness. How dare he talk to me like that? he thought.
He is an old man. I should respect and help him, he told himself. 
Zhang Liang put the shoe on the old man.
The old man got up. He let out a small chuckle. Then he began to walk away. Suddenly, the old man turned around and started walking back toward Zhang Liang.
“This youth is worth teaching." the old man said as he stood right in front of Zhang Liang. “Come back in five days. Meet me here on the bridge."
"And come early!" he cried as he walked away again.
Five days later, Zhang Liang woke up early. He rushed to the bridge. He found the old man already there, waiting.
“I told you to be here early! You've kept me waiting!" the old man scolded. “Come back in five days! And this time, make sure you are early!" the old man told him angrily. Five days later, Zhang Liang woke up as the sun rose. He raced to the bridge. He found the old man sitting there again, waiting.
"“You call this early?" the old man scolded." “Come back in five days!"  
Five days later, after midnight, Zhang Liang rushed back to the bridge. He had to arrive before the old man.
This time he succeeded.  
When the old man arrived, he nodded and said, “This youth is worth teaching."
The old man handed a bundle wrapped in cloth to Zhang Liang. “After you read this, you can become a tutor to the ruler," the old man told him. He went on, “In ten years, the world will be in chaos. You can bring peace and prosperity to the empire." He continued, "Meet me again in l3 years at Mount Gu Cheng. I am the yellow rock at the foot of the mountain."
Then the old man began to walk away.
“Wait! What is your name?" called Zhang Liang.
"I am Huang Shi Gong," replied the old man right before he disappeared.
At home, Zhang Liang opened the bundle. Inside was a book called The Art of War by Tai Gong. He read and studied the book.
Years later, Zhang Liang became a military advisor to Liu Bang. In 206 BCE, Liu Bang overthrew the Qin Dynasty. He became the first emperor of the Han Dynasty.
Zhang Liang became known as one of the "Three Heroes of the Early Han Dynasty." Legend has it that 13 years after his meeting with the old man, Zhang Liang went to Mount Gu Cheng. There, he found a yellow rock at the foot of the mountain.
Today, the idiom “This youth is worth teaching" is used to praise a young person who shows promise.
                     Question
How did Zhang Liang prove that he was a youth worth teaching?

                Good or Bad?  

Long ago, an old man and his son lived in a faraway town near the Chinese border. They farmed the land and lived a mostly peaceful life.
One night, there was a terrible storm. Wind lashed the trees. An old elm crashed into the barn door. The frightened horse ran out of the barn, heading toward the hills. The old man and his son looked all over for the horse. 
 They walked through the dark fields, holding torches. They called to the horse and scattered sweet hay. Still, they could not find him. The entire time the old man kept saying, Perhaps losing our horse isn't such a bad thing." His son kept quiet. He didn't understand his father. 
They asked everyone about the missing horse. The townspeople answered politely, saying that they hadn't seen the horse, but would look out for him. They all pitied the old man and his son. “It must be terrible to lose such a beautiful animal," they said. But the old man insisted that losing the horse might not be a bad thing. The townspeople grew quiet. They didn't understand the old man.  
Indeed, it turned out to not be such a bad thing. The horse returned the next day, bringing with it a beautiful female horse. The townspeople congratulated the old man, telling him that he had good luck. The old man, however, responded, "Perhaps my horse returning is not such a good thing after all." The townspeople grew quiet. They didn't understand the old man.
As the days passed, the old man's son came to love the new horse. He rode it every day. When they raced, they flowed like the wind over the grass. But one day, as the old man's son was riding the horse, a large bird suddenly flew in front of them. The terrified horse stood up on two legs, pawing the air. The old man's son reached for his horse's mane but grabbed only air. He flew off the horse's back. He slammed into the hard ground. His leg broke. The old man ran to his son and carried him back to the house.
The townspeople expressed their sympathy to the old man. They were all very sorry. His son would never be able to walk without pain again. Yet unlike the townspeople, the old man said, "Maybe this is not such a bad thing after all." The townspeople grew quiet. They didn't understand the old man. 
A few months later, the Emperor of China passed through the town with his soldiers. There was a war raging near the border. All the able- bodied young men had to join the army. What the Emperor didn't say was that most of the young men would die in the fight.
However, because the old man's son was handicapped, he could not fight. He didn't have to join the army. Instead, he stayed home. He helped tend crops on the family farm. 
“See?" the old man said to the townspeople. "It all worked out in the end. My horse running away brought back the second horse. And that second horse stopped my son from going off to his death. So, in the end, it was good and lucky that these things happened." The townspeople cheered the old man's wisdom. At last, they understood him.
The moral of the idiom “An old man loses his horse" is that even bad things can have positive effects. There is a similar idiom in English. It is “Every cloud has a silver lining."
                     Question
  Describe a time when something that seemed bad actually helped you out.

             Peach Paradise  

The writer Tao Yuan Ming lived during the Eastern Jin Dynasty  (365-427AD). It was a time of war in China. Tao Yuan Ming wished everyone could stop fighting and live in peace. He dreamed of a fable. It went like this…
Once upon a time, a fisherman set out to explore a river. He got in his small boat and began to row. The fisherman rowed and rowed and rowed. He got so caught up in the rhythm of the rowing that he lost track of where he was. Still, he kept on rowing.
Along the way, the fisherman spotted some peach trees covered with flowers on the riverbank. Farther down the river, he saw more blossoming peach trees. "There must be hundreds of trees!" the fisherman gasped. 
 At the end of the river, the fisherman came upon a whole forest of blossoming peach trees. As he stepped off his boat, his feet sank in a carpet of peach petals. The sweet smell filled the air. “This is a peach paradise!" the fisherman cried. "I have never seen or smelled anything like it!"
He walked through the forest to see what else there was to see. At the end of the forest he found a mountain. At the base of the mountain was a tiny cave. The small opening was just wide enough to fit one person. A beam of light shone out from the cave. The edges of the beam were laced with colors of the rainbow. It felt magical.
“It's like that rainbow light is calling me into the cave," the fisherman whispered to himself.  
He crawled inside the tiny opening. It was difficult to see, but he kept crawling toward the light. The narrow tunnel started to get wider and wider. Finally, the fisherman was able to stand up. He walked out of the cave.
The land was lush and green. The sun shone more brightly than the  fisherman had ever seen. Birds chirped happy songs from the treetops.
The fisherman walked through farmland. The crops were healthy and strong. Then he came to a small village. Pretty houses stood neatly in rows. Each house had a small, neat garden with colorful flowers.
The fisherman walked up to some farmers. They greeted him warmly. “Hello. Where am I?" asked the fisherman.
"Good day, sir," said one farmer. “Welcome to our land."
“What is this place?" asked the fisherman. “Where am I?"
“This is our land. Our ancestors came here a long time ago," the farmer's friend explained.
“Your ancestors? Who or how long ago was that?" asked the fisherman.  “Ancestors from the Qin Dynasty," replied the farmer. “"There was a lot of fighting during that time. So, our ancestors left and found this land. We have lived here ever since." "We haven't met anyone from the outside world," said his friend. "What era is it now?"
“Jin Dynasty," replied the fisherman.
“Oh, Jin Dynasty. A long time must have passed," said the farmer. “Well, welcome to our land! Won't you stay a bit?" he asked.
The fisherman stayed for several days. He enjoyed every second of his time there. It was peaceful and filled with so much beauty.
When it was time to leave, the fisherman crawled through the cave. He walked through the peach blossom forest.  As he traveled, he left markers along the trail. He hoped that one day they would help him find his way back.
When the fisherman got back to his village, he told the officials all about his journey. They wanted to find this paradise.
The fisherman led a group down the river to show them the mysterious land. They rowed and rowed and rowed. They didn't see any peach blossoms. At the end of the river, they followed the fisherman's markers. They couldn't find the mountain, the cave, the farms, or the village. And they never did.
The idiom “The peach orchard beyond this world" is used to express an unexpectedly fantastic place, or paradise.
                     Question  
Why do you think the fisherman could not find the mysterious land again?

             Watch Your Back  
During the Spring and Autumn Period (770-476BCE), the rule of the Wu state wanted to attack the Chu state.
His advisors warned him not to do it. They believed Wu was not strong enough. They worried that Wu would be beaten by Chu. The Wu king got angry when he heard the warnings. He told his advisors that if they kept talking in this way, he would punish them.
The king's son, Prince You, did not agree with his father. He thought the advisors were right. But he did not dare to speak up against the king either. He came up with a plan to offer advice to the king
One day, Prince You walked into the royal court soaking wet. He held a slingshot in one hand.
“Ha ha!" laughed the king. "What happened, Son?"
“Forgive me, Father," replied Prince You. "I fell into a pond."
“How did you do that?" asked the king, still chuckling.
“I went to the garden this morning to practice using my slingshot," the  prince explained.
Prince You stepped back with one leg and held the slingshot up toward the sky. He closed one eye and pulled the cord back as if he were going to shoot.  He looked just like a sharp-shooter.
"I look strong and fierce, right Father?" the prince joked.
“Yes, you do," the king laughed. "Unbeatable."
“Yes, I was feeling very confident," replied the prince.
"I looked up in the trees, looking for a target. I saw a cicada chirping happily on a branch. But despite his happiness, there was something wrong with the cicada. Do you know what it was, Father?" asked the prince.
"No, what?" asked the king, curious to find out.
“The cicada had no idea," the prince explained, “that a praying mantis was sneaking up behind him!'
“Oh!” said the king. "Another hunter!"
“Yes," the prince replied. "The mantis raised his two arms, ready to strike. But there was something wrong with the praying mantis. Do you know what it was, Father?" "No, what?" asked the king, curious to find out.
"The mantis was ready to strike the cicada. He was so focused on his prey that he did not know a bird was lurking nearby. The bird was ready to pounce on his meal- the mantis!"
“Ha ha!" laughed the king. “Yet another hunter!"
“And there I was, with my slingshot aimed at the bird!" the prince continued.
The prince moved his slingshot as if he was focusing on a target. With one eye closed, he drew the cord back, preparing to shoot.
“Oh my! You were going to shoot the bird! He was your target!" the king cheered.
“Yes, I was very confident. I thought the bird was unaware that I was hunting him," the prince replied. “I knew I only had one shot to get it, so I moved back to get better aim. I stepped back, and back, and back…”
“And that's when I fell right into the pond!" the prince laughed.
The king burst into laughter. "You were foolish! You thought only about the gains in front of you. You forgot about the dangers behind you!" cried the king.
Suddenly, realization dawned on the king. He thought about his plans to strike the state of Chu. He understood what his son was trying to tell him. "I understand your point, my son," said the king. Then he called off his plans to attack Chu.
The idiom “Mantis stalks cicada, oriole behind" means to be so focused on doing something that you don't consider what might go wrong.
                      Question
Why do you think it was easier for prince You to tell his father a story than to tell him how he really felt about the attack on the Chu state?
                  节日童谣：春夏
                 Let's sing!
     Sing and dance with Tales of China's Celebrate and Sing: Spring and Summer. Filled with the joy of the holidays, this beautifully illustrated songbook and accompanying musical recordings will get the whole family singing and dancing.  Have fun together and pass on your traditions to the youngest members of the family with this collection of songs for the spring and summer holidays. Think about all the colorful lanterns you see during the Lantern Festival as you sing  “Lantern, Lantern." Feel the excitement of the beating drums in “See the Boats Go" for Dragon Boat Festival.
Each holiday will be extra special if you celebrate and sing!
The Spring Festival
        Lucky Money
How lucky are you? Let's sing about red envelopes!
Red, red envelopes Good luck, good luck envelopes
Red, red envelopes Good luck, good luck envelopes
Lucky money
Clink, clink, clink! 
 Lucky money
Clink, clink, clink!  
Lucky money
Clink, clink, clink! 
 Lucky money
Clink, clink, clink!
The Lantern Festival 
Lantern, Lantern  
Pretty lanterns shine so bright. Which colors do you like?
Lanterns, lanterns Make them bright. Red and blue and Yellow light
Lanterns, lanterns Make them bright. Red and blue and Yellow light
Red lantern Green lantern Yellow and blue!
Red lantern Blue lantern Me and you
Qingming Festival
kites
Let's fly kites!
Kites, kites, fly the kites Way up in the air.
Kites, kites, fly the kites Way up there.
Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! 
 Fly around Spin around All around.
Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! 
 Fly around Way up in the air.
The Dragon Boat Festival 
 See the Boats Co
Boom!
Hear the drums. See the dragon boats race.
Hear the drum go Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom!
See the boats go
Zoom! Zoom!
Zoom! Zoom!
Watch them go. Go! Go!  Win team, win! Row! Row!
Watch them go Go! Go!
Win team, win!  Row! Row!
Row! Row! Row! Row! Row! Row! Row!
Row! Row! Row! They win!
Yay!
The Double Seventh Festival
Bridge of Birds
Sing with the birds It's a time for love!
Wait, wait, wait
For the double seventh date.
Wait, wait, wait
For the double seventh date.
Birds build a bridge 
 To let me see my love.
Birds build a bridge 
Up in the stars above.
Craft Time
Let's make a drum!
What you need:  
Balloon
Safety scissors 
 Paper cup
2 chopsticks or drinking straws  
Markers
(if you want)
1. Fold the balloon in half.
2. Cut the balloon in half along the fold.
3. Stretch the round part of the balloon over the open cup.
4. Use your markers to decorate the cup.
5. Tap your chopsticks or drinking straws on the drum.
                     节日童谣:秋冬
                 Celebrate and Sing Fall and Winter
     Let's sing!
    Sing and dance with Tales of China's Celebrate and Sing: Fall and Winter. Filled with the joy of the holidays, this beautifully illustrated songbook and accompanying musical recordings will get the whole family singing and dancing.  Have fun together and pass on your traditions to the youngest members of the family with this collection of songs for the autumn and winter holidays. Little ones will want to cuddle up with grandparents while listening to "Grandpa, Grandpa" for the Double Ninth Festival. Watch them hop and sing “Pop, pop, pop!" with the New Year's Eve song, “Firecrackers."
Each holiday will be extra special if you celebrate and sing!
     The Mid-Autumn Festival
      Moon Cakes
      I'm hungry! Me too!
Are those moon cakes ready yet？Oh, here they come!
Moon cakes, moon cakes, 
 Yum! Yum! Yum!
Moon cakes, moon cakes, 
 So much fun!
Moon cakes, moon cakes,  
Save me some!
Moon cakes, moon cakes, 
 Yum!
Noon cakes for you
Noon cakes for me
Moon cakes for everyone!
Moon cakes for you  
Moon cakes for me
Moon cakes for everyone!  
Moon cakes for everyone!

The Double Ninth Festival 
 Grandpa, Grandpa
Remember your special ones with a special song.
Grandpa, Grandpa  
What do you see?  What do you see Above the trees?
Grandson, Grandson 
 Do you see
The big blue sky
Above the trees, when you..
Climb to the sky When we climb The mountain When we climb The mountain When we climb Up high, When you.
Climb to the sky
When we climb the mountain  
When we climb the mountain  
When we climb up high.
Dongzhi Festival
How many dumplings?
Everybody loves dumplings! 
How many can you eat?
Dumplings, dumplings  
When it's cold
I've got dumplings In my bowl.
Dumplings, dumplings 
 How many can you 
 Eat, Eat, Eat
Until you're full?
Laba Festival
 Beans
Let's eat Laba porridge.  Let's eat yummy beans!
Get some beans
Red and green
White and black ones too.
In a pot
Nice and hot Now well let Them stew.
The day is cold  
So get your bowl 
 Beans for me and you.
The day is cold
So get your bowl 
 Beans for me and you.
New Year's Eve
Firecrackers
Firecrackers are so fun!
Happy New Year!
Firecrackers 
 Pop, pop, pop!  Pop, pop, pop!  Pop, pop, pop! 
 Firecrackers 
 Pop pop, pop!  Happy New Year!
Firecrackers
Pop. pop, pop! Pop. pop, pop!  Pop, pop, pop!
Firecrackers
Pop, pop, pop!
Happy New Year!
1,2,3,4. Firecrackers!  1,2,3,4. Firecrackers!
Craft Time
Let's make a shaker!
What you need: 
 Paper plate
Markers
Stapler or tape 
 2 tablespoons of rice, dry red beans, or pasta
1. Fold the paper plate in half.
2. Use your markers to decorate the outside of the plate.
3. Put 2 tablespoons of rice, red beans, or pasta inside the folded plate.
4. Ask an adult to staple the plate closed along the curved edge or tape it closed.
5. Shake it to the music!

             
         The King of Lunch 
        Fox naps. Tiger watches. He is hungry. Tasty, thinks Tiger. "Wake up," he says. Fox wakes up fast. He sees big Tiger. He wakes up faster. "Hi! I am Fox.  ”
        "I am Tiger. It is time for lunch." "What's for lunch?" asks Fox. "You!" answers Tiger. Fox thinks fast. Tiger walks closer. Fox thinks faster. "I am the king of the jungle!" says Fox. He walks away. "I am not lunch."
Tiger thinks slowly, Is Fox the king? Fox says, "Everyone is scared of me! Watch and see!" Tiger thinks more slowly. He follows Fox.
Animals see Fox and Tiger. They hurry away! "You see?" says Fox.
Fox smiles. He says, "Everyone is scared of me. I am the king. I am not lunch!"
"I'm sorry," says Tiger. He hangs his head. "I see you are the king. He walks away slowly.
Fox walks home fast. He laughs and laughs. All the animals were scared of Tiger, not Fox!
          Question
Who is the clever one, Fox or Tiger?
The Farmer and the Stump
A farmer lived on a farm. He worked and worked and worked. He grew food He was happy. 
One day, the farmer was working in the field. He saw a rabbit. It ran and ran and ran. It ran into a tree stump.
The farmer picked up the rabbit. He cooked it for dinner. He ate and ate and ate. It was delicious.
The next day, the farmer went to the tree stump. He looked for a rabbit. He looked and looked and looked. He didn't work. He didn't eat. The farmer waited for a rabbit. He waited and waited and waited. He thought about a delicious dinner. He was hungry. He was not happy. The farmer sat by the stump for days. He sat and waited and looked. But he never saw another rabbit run into the stump.
     
               Question
The farmer waits and waits. How should he get dinner?
              The Old Man's Rice 
The old man has a big family. They are ready to eat supper. But the rice is still cooking. The old man says, "I like my rice. White rice is nice! But the rice is late. And I cannot wait!" Soon the rice is ready. The family eats. Everyone is happy. The old man wants more rice. He plants a field of rice. His son helps him. The old man is happy. He cannot wait for the rice to grow! That night the old man dreams about the rice. He cannot wait for the rice to grow! But the rice is slow. It has to grow! The old man wakes up. He goes to the field. He says, "I like my rice, White rice is nice! But the rice is late. And I cannot wait!"
He pulls up the plants! The next morning. the old man goes to the rice.  His son is with him.
"Look at the rice!" the old man says. "It is taller. I pulled it up. The son is sad. The rice plants cannot survive now. His son says, "I also like rice. White rice is nice! But when something is late, we must learn to wait. ”
The old man understands. Next time, he will be patient.
         
            Question
What does the old man learn?
         The Farmer's Fence
The farmer's neighbor sees the hole in the farmer's fence. He says, "A wolf can get through that hole. You have to fix it!" But the farmer says: "My sheep is already lost. Why fix the fence now?" The next morning the farmer counts five sheep. The sixth sheep is gone!
His neighbor tells him to fix the fence. But the farmer says: "My sheep is already lost. Why fix the fence now?"
Later the farmer sits with his sheep. Something worries him. He thinks about the broken fence. He thinks about the wolf. But the farmer says: "My sheep is already lost. Why fix the fence now?" That night the wolf takes another sheep.  Now the farmer has four sheep! The farmer says: "My sheep is already lost.  Why fix the fence now?" He thinks for a minute. He looks at his other sheep. They are still alive. They are afraid. They need his help.
Then he says: "I must fix the fence to save my sheep." And that is what he does.
                   The Monkeys Save the Moon
The monkeys sleep. They sleep in the trees. They sleep on the grass. They sleep by the well.
The youngest monkey rolls over. He opens one eye. He looks into the well. What does he see?
The moon is In the well. Oh, no! "Wake up! Wake up! The moon fell into the well!"
The monkeys wake up All but one. The old monkey sleeps. 
 The monkeys grab each other's feet. All but one make a chain of monkeys.
They reach into the well to save the moon. They can't reach it. They cry.
Boo Hoo!
The old monkey wakes up. He sees the chain of monkeys.
He yawns.
The old monkey looks up. "The moon is in the sky, My dears" He yawns  "Only the moon's reflection is in the well."
The monkeys CHEER!
They wave to the lady in the moon.
The youngest monkey sees her smile! The old monkey goes back to sleep. zzzZZZZ
               Question
Why do the monkeys make a chain?
            Too Many Suns
It is time to work in the fields. It is very hot. The workers can work under one sun.  One sun helps plants grow. One sun is not too hot for the workers.
But today there are ten suns in the sky!
Ten suns are a lot. Ten suns are too hot!
The workers see the hero Hou Yi. They ask him for help.
They say:
"Ten suns are a lot. Ten suns are too hot!"
Hou Yi picks up his bow and arrow. He shoots one of the suns. Still it is too hot.
The people say:
"Nine suns are a lot. Eight suns are a lot. Even two suns are a lot."
Hou Yi shoots eight more suns.
Soon there is just one sun. The people cheer.
They say:
"We love the sun, but we love just one. One sun is enough for everyone!"
Question
What are the two rhyming words on page 26?
           Moving a Mountain  
The old man lives on a farm. He works hard every day. His sons help him. His granddaughter helps him. His pig helps him!
He says:
"We dig and we plant all through the day.
And we don't let anything get in our way.
There is a tall mountain by the farm. The old man climbs the mountain to get to the village. It is hard.
He says:
"We work and we climb all through the day.
We don't let the mountain get in our way.”
The old man wants to move the mountain. His sons help him.
He says:
"We work and we dig all through the day.
We can't let this mountain get in our way.”
The old man digs and digs. He teaches his sons and grandsons to dig and dig.
He says:
"My grandchildren's children will dig every day.
This mountain will one day be out of the way.
The gods look down at the old man. They see him with his sons.
They say:
"The old man and his sons all through the day are working to move the mountain away.
The gods move the mountain!
The gods say to the old man: "You work and you work all through the day. We don't want that mountain to stand in your way. “
       
                    Question
Why did the old man want to move the mountain?
                 The Dragons' Eyes
Once there was a Chinese painter. He painted beautiful dragons. He painted the dragons in many colors. But he never painted their eyes. He said, "Paint the eyes, and the dragon flies."
One day, he painted four dragons on a long wall. The dragons had sharp teeth and claws. They had long tails. But they had white eyes.
He said, "Paint the eyes, and the dragon flies.
Many people came to see the painting. An old man looked at the dragons.  "All the dragons have white eyes," he said.
"Yes," said the painter. "Paint the eyes, and the dragon flies.
The people laughed at the painter. "That won't happen!" said the old man. "Paint the eyes!"
Then the painter said, "I will paint the eyes, and the dragon will fly." He painted black dots on the eyes of two dragons.
There was a loud CRASH and a BOOM! The two dragons came out of the wall. Their sharp teeth and claws came out. Then their long tails came out.  They flew up into the sky.
The people screamed. They looked back at the wall. The two dragons with white eyes were still on the wall. "I don't paint the eyes," said the painter.  "And now you know why.”
                       Question
How many dragons flew up into the sky?
                        
                             Preface
Welcome to the Wonders of China! Learn the stories of wonderful places. Take a trip of the imagination with Tales of China.   
Visit Yellow Mountain. How can a stone point to the sky? Learn the story.  
Visit the Great Wall. Who made it? 
      Visit Xi'an. Meet the heroes of the Clay Army.
      Visit Wuhan. Watch a bird dance. See an unusual thank you
      Visit Luoyang. Learn how anger made flowers bloom.
China is magical!
            A Stone for the Bridge  
Shan Fu builds bridges. Farmers walk across his bridges. Horses trot across his bridges. Children run across his bridges. Now, he is building a new bridge. But Shan Fu needs a lot of stone to finish the bridge.
He finds a big, big, big stone. He and his workers push it. They pull it. They cannot move it. His daughter, Little Jiao, wants to help. She pushes the stone. She pulls it. She cannot move it. Little Jiao thinks. At last she says,
"The man who moves the stone can marry me!"
Many men want to marry Little Jiao. They race by the unfinished bridge. They row by the unfinished bridge. They swim under the unfinished bridge. They push the stone. They pull it. Nobody can move it.
Little Jiao cries. An old man sees her crying.
“Hello," he says. "I am Iron Li. What's wrong?"
Little Jiao tells him what's wrong. “And I promise to marry the man who moves the stone."
“Go back to your father," Iron Li says. "No one is getting married." 
 Iron Li picks up the stone. The magic gourd makes it easy for him It is like picking up a piece of rice. He is not any old man. He is an immortal.
He flies to the bridge. Then he drops the stone. Boom!
Shan Fu and Little Jiao hear the boom! They run toward the bridge. They see Iron Li They stop. They watch.  
Iron Li is flying back to the bridge! He brings two more stones. Both are big, big, big! He drops one of the stones. Boom!
“That is all we need," yells Shan Fu. “Thank you!" yells Little Jiao.
Iron Li waves goodbye. He flies away with the last stone in his hand. He sees Yellow Mountain. He stops. It is the most beautiful thing he has ever seen. He only looks. He thinks of nothing. The stone slips from his grasp.
The stone falls. It falls and falls and falls.
Boom! It lands on the mountain. 
 The stone is still on Yellow Mountain. People call it The Feilai Stone.
                    Question
You meet Iron Li. He wants to help you. What do you ask him to do?
              The Walls  
Meng and Jiang live next door to each other. They like to grow plants. They grow beans. They grow cabbages. They grow gourds on their wall.
Meng picks a gourd. Jiang opens it. Inside is a baby girl! They name her Meng Jiang.
Years pass. Lady Meng Jiang is a young woman. She finds a man in the garden. She is not scared. He is kind. His name is Fan Qiliang.
He is hiding. Soldiers are forcing men to work on the Wall. Fan Qiliang is scared.
Lady Meng Jiang and Fan Qiliang talk by the beans. They hold hands by the cabbages. They fall in love by the gourd. Soon, they get married.
Months pass. One night, soldiers come to the door. 
 Pound! Pound! Pound!  
They pound on the door. "Fan Qiliang!" they call. “ You must build the Wall."
"No!" Lady Meng Jiang cries. she holds her husband's hands. The soldiers pull the husband and the wife apart. They take Fan Qiliang away. He must build the Wall. 
 Weeks pass. Lady Meng Jiang dreams of her husband. He is cold. He is sick.  He is dying at the Wall. He calls for her.
She wakes up. She hurries. She leaves for the Wall.
Days pass. Lady Meng Jiang walks by the hills. She walks by the sea. She reaches the Wall. But where is her husband?
She looks for him. A soldier stops her. He says her husband is dead. Lady Meng Jiang does not move.
Minutes pass. Then she begins to cry. She wails. Her cries are loud. Her cries are powerful. Each cry tears at the Wall. It cracks. It begins to fall.
The soldiers run. Brick by brick the Wall falls. It is loud. The Wall is wailing. The Wall is falling.
Seconds pass. The Wall is falling as far as Lady Meng Jiang can see. Then she sees her husband's body. She wants only to be with him. She runs past the fallen Wall. She runs to the sea. She throws herself into the sea. They are together again.
                       Question
What would you hope to see inside a gourd?
   
                The Clay Army 
Qin Shihuang is the emperor. He loves his life. He loves his army. He loves his power. He loves telling people what to do. There is one thing he doesn't love. His army cannot protect him forever.
He thinks. “I want my power forever," he says. He calls for Li Si. He loves telling Li Si what to do.
“Li Si! Bring me a thousand children," says the emperor. “When I die, they die too. You can bury them with me."
Li Si thinks. He does not want children to die. What can he do? “You have big, strong warriors. They protect you," he says. “But they cannot protect you forever."  
The emperor nods.
Li Si thinks. “We can build an army. It can protect you forever."
 The emperor nods.
Li Si says, “We can make the army of clay. We can bury them with you They can protect you forever."
The emperor nods. “Very well," he says. "Build the army of clay. I want big, strong warriors."
Li Si finds many craftsmen. The craftsmen build the clay warriors. But the big clay warriors break. They are too big.
The emperor is mad. He calls for Li Si. "Bring me the children. Bring me the craftsmen."
li Si thinks. What can he do? He must protect the children.
One craftsman calls on Li Si. "Big clay warriors break." he says. "But we can make the head. We can make the body. We can make the arms and legs."
Li Si thinks. "Then we put them together!" he says. "We can do it!" 
The craftsmen work hard. They make many big clay warriors. They make many big clay horses. After 39 years, the emperor has a big clay army. It can protect him forever. He is happy.
The big clay army protects the children too. Li Si is happy.
Today, the big clay army is in Xi'an. It is thousands of years old. It protects the emperor forever.
                  Question  
 Why was Li Si a hero?
          
              The Yellow Crane Tower
Old Man Zi'an walks around Wuhan. "Please, can I have something to drink?" he asks.  
But nobody gives him anything. They say, "No money, no drink!" 
The old man comes to a small wine shop. "Please, can I have something to drink?" the old man asks.
“Of course!" says Xin. He gives him a cup of wine. He is kind. 
Every day, the old man returns. Every day, Xin gives him a cup of wine. He likes to take care of the old man.
Then one day, the old man says he is leaving Wuhan. "Before I go, ” he says. “I want to give you a gift." 
 The old man takes out an orange peel. He uses it to draw on the wall.  Xin watches. What is the old man drawing?
Yellow lines become legs. Yellow lines become wings. Two yellow dots become bright eyes. It is a crane!
The old man claps his hands. The crane turns its head.
Both men clap. The crane taps its feet.
They clap more. The crane spreads its wings.
They clap and clap. The crane dips and swoops. What a dance! 
 Many people come to Xin's shop. They clap for the dancing crane. Some of them dance too. They buy lots of wine.
Ten years later, the old man returns.
“Zi'an!" Xin bows. “Because of you, every day there is dancing. And I am rich. Thank you so much, my friend."
The old man smiles. He takes out a flute, He starts to play. The music is magic. The music dips and swoops. It takes flight. The crane dips and swoops. The crane flies from the wall.  
It lands next to the old man. Xin daps. The old man and the crane bow.  
Then the old man climbs onto the crane's back. They fly into the sky.  
Everybody claps! Goodbye!  
Xin becomes an old man like Old Man Zi'an. He wants people to remember the crane. So, he builds a tower. It is upstanding like the crane. 
 Its lines dip and swoop like the crane.
We call it the Yellow Crane Tower!
            Question
  Does a crane dance?
     
             The Queen of Flowers  
Empress Wu lives in Luoyang. She has many servants. She likes to order the servants around. They must do just what she wants.  
Often, they get it wrong. Then she gets very angry. She shouts, "How dare you!" She punishes them. Her servants are scared of her. 
 Her servants plant many flowers. Empress Wu thinks they do it wrong.  There is a lot of shouting in the garden.
But not now. It is quiet. It is winter. The flowers cannot bloom. It is too cold.
Empress Wu wants flowers in her garden. She wants flowers in winter.  She wants them now!
She writes a poem. She shouts it at the flowers.
Listen, flowers! I order you to bloom!
Bloom tomorrow or meet your doom!
Please me or tomorrow you will turn to blackest ash, for you will burn! Even the flowers are scared of her.
The next morning, there are many, many flowers. Empress Wu looks at the flowers. She smiles.
There are red flowers. There are blue flowers. There are yellow flowers.  There are orange flowers.
She looks again. Where are the peonies? There are no peony flowers. She is very angry. Peonies are only flowers. But she is an empress!
“Peonies! How dare you! Where are your flowers?" she shouts. “Servants! Burn them all!” 
 The servants are scared. They burn all the peonies in the garden.  
But Empress Wu is still angry. She wants to punish all the peonies in Luoyang. She knows it is very cold on Mang Mountain. “Servants! Take all the peonies to Mang Mountain!"
The servants take all the peonies to Mang Mountain.
All winter, they do not bloom. But in spring, look! Fields of peonies on Mang Mountain! Peonies of different colors. There are purple peonies. There are pink peonies. There are white peonies, and more! 
 Today, Luoyang is famous for its peonies. You can see countless peonies on Mang Mountain. And no one has to order them to bloom!
                Question 
 Which flower is the peony? 
     
                         Tastes of China  
                        Preface
  Welcome to Tales of China's Tastes of China.
What is your favorite food? Can you cook it? Who cooked it first? The foods in this book come from all over China. 
See if you can answer these questions. 
 ● Why cook chicken in clay?
          Why shave noodles?
       ● How can you feed an emperor? 
       ● How can sticky rice save a kingdom?  
● How can tea help an emperor's mom? 
 Get ready to be surprised. These foods have tasty histories!
                A King-Sized Feast 
The guard calls to the people. “The emperor is coming! The army is coming!" How can the city feed them all?
“I have an idea," says a boy. 
“I have a big idea," says a short man.
“I have a bigger idea," says a tall woman.
Finally they agree. They will make the biggest meal! 
They all look for food. The short man goes to his farm. The tall woman goes to her barn. The boy goes to the sea. Everyone looks high. Everyone looks low.
The short man brings back beans. Some are so long he jumps rope with them!
The tall woman brings back mushrooms. She fills her arms. She stacks them on her head. She even juggles them!
The boy brings back crab. They walk with him, and it looks like a parade! Everyone brings lots of food!
Everyone makes a big fire. They start cooking.
The guard calls from the wall. "The army smells the good food. They are running. Hurry!"
The man stirs his pot fast. The woman stirs her pot faster. The boy stirs his pot the fastest.  
The food is ready. But there is a problem. Where do they put the food? The bowls are too small. 
 The man, the woman, and the boy all have the same idea. They all go to their house.
"After you, husband," says the tall woman.
“After you, son," says the short  man.  
The boy goes into the farmhouse. He comes back with a big wooden  basin.
“Put the food in here!" he says. 
 They add the food one layer at a time. First, radish. Then mushrooms and beans. Then pork, beef, and lamb. Then chicken. Then duck. Then crab. Finally, they add shrimp. The big wooden basin is full. They hope everything will taste good!
The guard welcomes the army. Everyone bows to the emperor. The emperor picks up his chopsticks. "Please, everyone join me."
Everyone eats and eats. The big wooden basin is empty. The emperor puts down his chopsticks. "Thank you for this delicious poon choi," he says.  
The man, the woman, and the boy smile. Everyone is full and happy!
                    Question
Which part of poon choi seems the best to you?
          The Niangao Wall 
Long ago, China was not one country. It was many. And they fought one another. There was war after war.
The King of Wu did not feel safe. He asked the people to build a wall. It would keep the capital city safe. It would keep other armies out. The people built the wall. It was strong. The people felt safe. They celebrated! But Prime Minister Wu Zixu worried. He knew the wall was strong. He knew armies could not come in. But what if an army stayed outside? No one could run away. No one could leave the city. The city did not grow much food. People would be hungry.
Wu Zixu spoke to the soldiers. "If an army comes, do not worry. Dig a hole under the wall. Do not forget."
The wars between the countries went on for a long time. Wu Zixu died.  And still the armies fought. The wall stayed strong. It kept other armies out. But one army did not give up. They stayed. The army could not get in. The people could not get out. The city did not grow much food.  The people were hungry.
A soldier remembered what Wu Zixu said about the wall. He told others.  The soldiers dug a hole under the wall. They dug and dug. The soldiers looked at the wall under the ground.
 The soldiers could not believe it. They dug. They looked closer. They still could not believe it. A soldier took a brick from the wall. He broke it. Everyone could see the brick. But no one could believe it. Inside the brick was sticky rice! Food at last!
Everyone ate the sticky rice. They ate and ate. The city was saved!
Wu Zixu was a wise man. He saved the capital city. And his sticky rice bricks? They were the first niangao!
                       Question 
What time of the year do you usually eat niangao?
               The Chicken in the Clay
One day, an old beggar was walking in the country. He was hungry. He had no food. He had no money.  He was begging.  
Then he saw a fat chicken.  It walked onto the road. The old man ran after it. The chicken ran fast. The old man ran faster.  He caught the chicken.  He put it under his arm.
He would soon eat dinner! But he was thirsty too.
The old man ran to the river. He bent down to take a drink of water. The chicken bit his arm! He put the chicken under his other arm. He bent down to take a drink of water. The chicken bit him again!
He put the chicken between his knees ... then he had an idea. The old man dug a hole. He pushed the chicken inside. He covered it with clay.
The old man took a drink of water. He took another. And another. Then he built a fire. He pulled the chicken out of the hole. The dead chicken was covered in clay.
But he had no pot! Then he had an idea. He put the clay-covered chicken in the fire. Then he waited and waited. The clay turned hard. The chicken cooked inside the clay.  
The old man couldn't wait. He pushed the chicken out of the fire. He hit the clay with a rock. Crack! He pulled the clay away. The chicken feathers came off with it! And the chicken smelled so good!
Soon he would eat dinner! But then he heard a voice behind him.  "Hello," a man said.
The old man turned around. His mouth fell open in surprise. He bowed. “Your... your Majesty!" he said.
“That chicken smells great," said the emperor. “May I join you?" “Of course," said the old man. "What's mine is yours."
The beggar and the emperor shared the chicken. They both loved it! When the emperor got home, he asked his cooks to make the beggar's chicken dish. Of course, at the palace, it was not called Beggar's Chicken. It was called Rich and Noble Chicken.
                     Question  
 Do you think the chicken tasted better at the river or in the palace?  Give a reason for your answer.
 
The Man Who Shaved Noodles
There was a knock at the door. The old couple looked out. There was an official from Kublai Khan!
“Emperor's order! Hand in your weapons!"
The old couple had no weapons. They gave him their kitchen knife. The official went to all the homes in Shanxi. He took their swords. He took their axes. He took their cooking knives! 
 He left one knife for every ten families. The families learned to share. They learned to chop their food fast!
One day, the old woman wanted to make noodles. She had noodle dough. She had a big pot of hot water. She had some vegetables. But she needed the knife. She had to cut the noodles.
"Husband, please go to our neighbor," she said. "She has the knife. Tell her I need it."
The old man went. The neighbor was busy. She had a lot of food to chop. She needed the knife too.
“Can you come back later? " she asked.
“Yes," said the old man. But his wife was waiting. And they were both hungry!
On his way home, the old man saw something. It was shiny. It was sharp.  The old man picked it up. He had an idea!
The old man went home.  He washed the metal. He picked up the noodle dough. He held it over the big pot. He moved the metal down the dough.
Swoosh! He shaved the dough. Plop! A noodle fell into the water.
The old woman laughed, surprised Her husband shaved more noodles Soon, their bowls were full.  
The noodles were fat in the middle. They were thin on the sides. They were chewy. They were tasty. The old couple had a great lunch. They took some noodles to their neighbor. She loved the noodles too. Soon, the shaved noodles were famous all over Shanxi!
                  Question 
 What kind of noodles do you like best?
            The Story of Longjing Tea
Emperor Qianlong travels around Zhejiang. He stops near Lion Peak. He looks at the green tea fields. The fields look beautiful. They smell even better.
The emperor watches the women in the fields. They pick the tea quickly and gracefully. They put the tea in their baskets.
The emperor starts to pick the tea too. He is slow. But soon, he picks faster.
Tea of Lion Peak.
Green sunshine.
Green moonlight
Green tea of life.
A man walks up, quickly. He bows. "What is it?" asks the emperor. "It's your mother," he says. "She is ill."
“We must go home!" the emperor says. He hurries. He puts the tea leaves into his sleeve.
Tea of Lion Peak.
Green sunshine.
Green moonlight.
Green tea of life.
At the palace, the emperor sees his mother. She looks tired.  “Son," she says quietly. “What is that lovely smell?"  
The emperor looks around. Then he looks in his sleeve. He knows what smells nice. It is the tea from Lion Peak!
"Let's drink tea, Mother," he says. "I picked it myself!" Servants get the tea ready.
Tea of Lion Peak.
Green sunshine.
Green moonlight
Green tea of life.
The emperor and his mother drink the tea. She closes her eyes and smiles. "This tea is wonderful, ” she says.
She opens her eyes, surprised. "I feel stronger! Where did you find this tea?"
The emperor smiles. "It's Longjing from Hangzhou," he says.
“Can I have more?" she asks. “Of course you can, Mother," says the emperor. “Even if I have to pick it myself!"
The emperor and his mother love the tea. Soon, all of China loves it too.
Tea of Lion Peak.
Green sunshine.
Green moonlight.
Green tea of life.
                  Question 
 people say, "There's nothing that a cup of tea can't fix." Do you think that drinking tea makes everything better? Why or why not?
          
                       Smart Kids  
                  Hello Readers!  
Welcome to Tales of China' Smart Kids! Do you like to solve problems? How about these?
      It is summer. You are in the dark. How can you read?
      You have a boat. You have an elephant. You are by a river. How can you weigh the elephant?
How can you tell ink from soy sauce?  
How can you tell if plums are ripe? 
 The smart kids in this book solve these problems and more.
                The Big Elephant
Cao Cao gets an elephant. His son Cao Chong is excited to see her. Cao Cao says, "She is big, and she is gray. But how much does the elephant weigh?"
Nobody knows how to weigh the elephant. Cao Cao says to his ministers, "She is big and eats a lot of hay. But how much does the elephant weigh?"
The ministers do not know. They cannot weigh her on a scale.
Cao Chong looks at the elephant. He says, "She is a good elephant. She can do lots of things. The ministers say, "She can work, and she can play! But how much does the elephant weigh?" The ministers ask Cao Chong for help. He knows what to do! "Put the elephant in a boat," he says.
They put the elephant in a boat.  Cao Chong marks the water level on the boat. Then he says, "She is big and she is gray. So the boat sinks down in the bay.”
The elephant gets off the boat. "Put some stones in the boat," Cao Chong says. They put stones in the boat. It sinks and reaches the water mark.
Cao Chong says, "We will soon find out today just how much the heavy stones weigh.
"Take out the stones. Then weigh them!" says Cao Chong. 
"That's how much the elephant weighs!
She is big, and she is gray. But how much does the elephant weigh? A lot!”
                   Question
What is the biggest animal you have ever seen?
                  Firefly Lights  
Che Yin loves to read!
He likes to learn new things. He reads all day long.
His father is very proud.
At night it gets dark. "May we turn on the light?" he asks his father.  "No," his father says. "I’m sorry. We cannot afford the lights. Still Che Yin loves to read! He likes to learn new things. Sadly, Che Yin goes inside. It is time to go to sleep, Still he wants to read! Che Yin loves to read! He likes to learn new things. Che Yin gets up early. It is bright outside. He can read again. He says, "I love to read. I like to learn new things.
In the evening it gets dark Che Yin sees some fireflies They fly. They light up the night. Che Yin has an idea
Che Yin catches some fireflies.
He says, "I love to read. I like to learn new things I also need light to read.  The fireflies are now Che Yin's light! He reads late into the night.
                     Question
Do you think that reading makes you smart? Why or why not?
                      Ink Eater 
Xizhi loved to write with his little stick Pen.
When he finished a word, he started writing again. Xizhi saw a big broom. It looked like a big brush pen He dipped the broom into a stream. He wrote with water.
Xizhi loved to write with his big broom pen.
When he finished a word, he started writing again.
Xizhi dreamed about writing. He talked about writing. He wrote and wrote.
Xizhi loved to write with his little brush pen.
When he finished a word, he started writing again.
"Xizhi!" Mama called. "Time to eat! The buns are done. They are hot.”
Xizhi loved to write with his little brush pen. But even Xizhi needed to eat now and then.
Mama walked in with a dish of hot buns. "Eat!" said Mama.
Xizhi did not look up. He dipped the bun into the ink pot!
Xizhi loved to write with his little brush pen.
He wrote, and he chewed, and he didn't notice his food.
"Silly boy! Your face!" Mama laughed.
Xizhi’s face was covered with ink!
Xizhi laughed. But he did not stop writing.
Write little Xizhi.
Write as much as you can. One day you’ll grow up to be a famous man!
  
                     Question
Why do you think Xizhi dipped his bun into the ink pot?
              The Bitter Plums
"Race with us!" Wang Rong's friends called. Wang Rong raced with his friends.
Wang Rong was not the fastest.
"Play tug of war with us!" Wang Rong's friends called.
Wang Rong played tug of war with his friends.
Wang Rong was not the strongest.
"Make funny faces with us," Wang Rong's friends called.
Wang Rong made funny faces with his friends.  Wang Rong was not the funniest.
"Climb the plum tree with us!" Wang Rong's friends called.
Wang Rong was very hungry, just like his friends. But Wang Rong did not  climb the tree.
"Look at this busy road!" Wang Rong called to his friends.
"There are so many people. There are so many plums. If the plums are so sweet, then there would be none.
"These plums are so bitter!" Wang Rong's friends called.
Wang Rong and his friends agreed.
Wang Rong was the smartest.
       
                Question
Do you think it is better to be strong or smart?

             Gan Luo and the Egg  
       Gan Luo's grandfather worries.
      "What is wrong？” Gan Luo asks.
"The emperor is mad at me, Grandfather tells him. "The emperor named a price to be paid. Find an egg that a rooster has laid."
"Where can I find a rooster's egg?" Grandfather cries. Mama worries.  Papa worries.
"We search and search for the price to be paid. But we only find eggs that a hen has laid."
"Where can we find this egg?" Mama and Papa cry. Uncle worries. Aunt worries.
"We bring gold and silver to trade. But no one has an egg that a rooster has laid."
Gan Luo is not worried. Gan Luo has an idea. "The emperor knew the deal that he made. Grandfather could Never find the price to be paid."
Gan Luo goes to see the emperor.
"Where is your grandfather?" the emperor asks.
"He is at home," Gan Luo says. "He is going to have a baby."
The emperor laughs. "A baby from a man can't be found, I'm afraid. It’s just like an egg that a rooster has laid." The emperor knows that Gan Luo is smart!
After more success, Gan Luo becomes the youngest prime minister. An egg from a rooster. A baby from a man. Gan Luo knew the emperor's plan!
          Question
What do you think about the emperor's demand?
            Li Ji Fights the Snake
A snake lives in a cave in Eastern Yue. It scares everyone. It eats sheep. It eats oxen: It gets bigger and bigger. Everyone hides from the scary snake.
The people say, " We are not strong. We are not brave. We fear the snake inside the cave. The snake eats all the sheep. It is still hungry. It eats all the oxen. It is still hungry. Then it eats nine girls! The people say, "We are not strong. We are not brave. We fear the snake inside the cave."
Li Ji wants to kill the snake. She practices kung fu. She asks for a dog. She asks for a sword.
Li Ji is strong. Li Ji is brave.  Li Ji does not fear the snake in the cave. Her parents say no. They do not want Li Ji to die. Still, she goes to the snake's cave.
Li Ji is strong. Li Ji is brave. Li Ji does not fear the snake in the cave. 
Li Ji puts sweet rice cakes outside the cave. The snake smells the rice cakes. They smell better than sheep. They smell better than oxen. The snake comes out of the cave. It eats the cakes. Li Ji is strong. Li Ji is brave. Li Ji does not fear the snake in the cave.
Li Ji and her dog fight the snake. The snake swings its tail. The snake hisses and bites. Li Ji swings her sword. She kills the snake!
Li Ji saves Eastern Yue! Li Ji is strong. Li Ji is brave.  Li Ji does not fear the snake in the cave.
Question
Do you think it was a smart thing for Li Ji to fight the monster snake? Why or why not?
          Sharing the Pears
Father has seven pears. He has seven sons. Perfect! But one pear is small. Father sets down the pears. Six sons run to the pears. One son does not run.  He is the sixth son. His name is Kong Rong. He is four. "Stop!" says Father. Six sons stop. Stop! Stop!  
Father takes a big pear. He gives it to Kong Rong. "No, thank you," says Kong Rong.
"Why?" Father asks.
"I respect my big brothers, “ says Kong Rong. "Big brothers get big pears.”
Father gives five sons five pears.  Eat! Eat! Eat! Now Father has two pears.
One is big. One is small. Father gives the big pear to Kong Rong.
"No, thank you, says Kong Rong. "Why?" Father asks.
"I take care of him," says Kong Rong. "A little brother gets a big pear. The little brother eats!  Eats! Eats!
Father gives the little pear to Kong Rong. "Thank you," says Kong Rong. He eats! Eats! Eats!
"Kong Rong," says Father. " You like to share the pears.” "You are a great  brother!"
            Question
Who gets the biggest pear at your house? Your mom or dad? Your grandparents? Your brother or sister? You?
             Saving a Friend  
Sima Guang and his friends play tag.  They run around a water vat.
"You can't get me!" calls a boy. He climbs up the water vat. He stands on the edge. "Be careful!" calls Sima Guang. “You don't know how to swim!" The boy waves to his friends. "You can't get me!" His foot slips.
He falls into the water.  Oh no! He doesn't know how to swim! Hurry! His friends must save him! What should they do?
Sima Guang looks around. He sees a big rock. He picks it up. It is very heavy.
The boy slips under the water. Oh no!
Sima Guang throws. the rock at the water vat CRACK!
He breaks the water vat! The water falls out. The boy falls out too!
"You saved me! I'm glad you got me," he says. "Thank you!"
      
                   Question
Who is the hero in the story? Why?

